Memorandum No. ___________
Issued To: __________________
WAYPOINT PRIVATE ACCESS FUND L.P.	
(formed as a Delaware limited partnership)
CONFIDENTIAL PRIVATE PLACEMENT MEMORANDUM
This Confidential Private Placement Memorandum (together with the Exhibits and Appendices hereto, this “Memorandum”) for Waypoint Private Access Fund L.P. (the “Fund”) is being circulated on a confidential basis. Each prospective subscriber for limited partnership interests (“Interests”) in the Fund must review this Memorandum and the agreement of limited partnership of the Fund (as it may be amended, restated, or supplemented from time to time, the “Partnership Agreement”) and should pay particular attention to the information set forth under the sections of this Memorandum entitled “Risk Factors” and “Conflicts of Interest” prior to subscribing for Interests. 




[DATE], 2023

 
I. EXECUTIVE SUMMARY
The Opto Platform Overview
Opto Investments, Inc., a Delaware corporation (along with its affiliates, “Opto”) created a proprietary digital alternative investment platform, through which Opto (i) offers registered investment advisers, individual high net worth investors and family offices digital access to a select assortment of highly vetted, institutional-quality private fund opportunities, without having to meet the high minimum capital contributions usually required from institutional investors, and (ii) develops and provides certain fund-related information technology-based platform solutions to Opto participants, such as digital fund subscriptions, “Know Your Customer” / Anti-Money Laundering services and portfolio analytics (collectively, the “Opto Platform”). 
Combining alternative investment and distribution expertise with advanced financial technology, Opto is poised to deliver enterprise solutions through the Opto Platform to some of the largest and most respected asset and wealth managers in the world. 
The Opto Platform provides investors accessible investment minimums, online access to intuitive displays of fund metrics, and electronic completion of all legal documentation. Opto’s financial, operational and technological expertise and experience provides a seamless experience for individual investors and a scalable point of access for financial advisors and fund managers. 
Opto seeks to leverage its alternative asset network to serially establish special purpose alternative private funds on the Opto Platform that are advised by Lonsdale Investment Management, LLC, a registered investment adviser and Opto affiliate, and established for the purpose of investing in – and providing their investors with select access and indirect investment exposure to – premier underlying alternative funds managed by third parties. 
Opto also manages an in house proprietary financial product warehouse, Lonsdale Bedrock Fund LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (the “Warehouse”), which acts as an initial investor in certain Opto-sponsored funds for the purpose of financing their initial capital commitments to underlying funds, typically with the intention of subsequently syndicating the Warehouse’s interests to qualified investors on the Opto Platform. 
The Opto team (See “The Opto Team” below) has extensive experience in investing in the alternative investments market. Lonsdale was founded in 2021. For more information, please visit optoinvest.com.
Sourcing Underlying Funds
The Opto diligence team has been actively investing in private equity, real estate, venture capital funds and other alternative assets. The diligence team consists of 3 investment professionals with experience investing in private markets, each person bringing diverse and complementary skill sets, as well as strong historical investment performance in their prior roles.  
Through this experience, the team has established a broad range of relationships and industry contacts that lead to a robust flow of potential investment opportunities. The team takes a pro-active approach to sourcing new investment opportunities which include referrals from managers, service partners, and existing or prior investor relationships. 
Due Diligence
The diligence team at Opto has developed a systematic process for screening and evaluating potential investments, leveraging their experience at some of the most prominent institutional investors. This multi-step process is structured to identify compelling opportunities quickly and eliminate unattractive ones as early as possible. For prospective opportunities, an initial screening is completed by one of the investment team members and discussed among the team on a weekly basis, with a focus on key characteristics of team, investment strategy and market dynamics, as well as specific product attributes and proposed economic and legal terms. If the team consensus is to proceed, full due diligence is completed. This process draws upon a wide range of available resources, both internal and external, to evaluate the criteria which are critical to the success of an investment. This includes, at a minimum: (i) evaluation of the underlying fund management team; (ii) review of market factors, such as size, growth opportunity, competition, and development trends; (iii) review of investment thesis and track record; (iv) reference calls; and (v) analysis on impact of market factors.
Once full due diligence is completed, a recommendation for investment is prepared by the sponsoring team members and presented for consideration in a formal investment committee process.
The Opto Team 
Matthew Malone. Mr. Malone has served as President and Head of Investment Management of Opto since September 2021. In this role, he is responsible for all investment selection and due diligence for the Opto platform and serves as Chair of Opto’s investment committee. Prior to this position, Matthew spent eight (8) years with FS Investments (previously known as Franklin Square Capital Partners) an asset management firm focused on alternatives with over USD 35 billion in assets under management across private credit, real estate, and other asset classes.  Matthew served multiple roles in its Product and Investment Management divisions including as Head of Due Diligence and Managing Director, Real Estate.  Matthew also served on FS Investment’s Management and New Product Committees. Before joining FS Investments, Matthew was a partner at Snyder Kearney LLC, a research and due diligence firm focused on alternative investments.  At Snyder Kearney, Matthew advised broker-dealer and investment advisor clients on tens of billions of dollars of various alternative investments, including hedge funds, private credit, private equity and real estate. Matthew holds a Bachelor of Arts in Economics from University of Maryland and a Juris Doctor from The George Washington University Law School.  Matt is a Chartered Financial Analyst (“CFA”) charterholder and served as the Chair of the CFA Society of Washington, DC and the President of the Alternative Direct Investment Securities Association.

Kamal Jafarnia. Mr. Jafarnia serves as Co-Founder and General Counsel of Opto Investments Inc. Mr. Jafarnia also served as General Counsel and Chief Compliance Officer at Artivest Holdings, Inc. and as Chief Compliance Officer for Altegris Advisors, LLC. Prior to Artivest, Mr. Jafarnia served as Managing Director for Legal and Business Development at Provasi Capital Partners LP. Prior to that, from October 2014 to December 2017, he served as Senior Vice President of W.P. Carey Inc. (NYSE: WPC), as well as Senior Vice President and Chief Compliance Officer of Carey Credit Advisors, Inc. and as Chief Compliance Officer and General Counsel of Carey Financial, LLC. Prior to joining W. P. Carey Inc., Mr. Jafarnia served as Counsel to two American Lawyer Global 100 law firms in New York. Between 2006 and 2012, Mr. Jafarnia served as a senior executive, in-house counsel, and Chief Compliance Officer for several alternative investment program sponsors, including, among others, American Realty Capital, a real estate investment program sponsor, and its affiliated broker-dealer, Realty Capital Securities, LLC. Mr. Jafarnia received his Juris Doctor from Temple University School of Law and Master of Laws (LLM) from Georgetown University. Mr. Jafarnia is a licensed attorney admitted to practice law in four states and the District of Columbia and has spent a majority of his career specifically as a regulatory compliance officer.

Jacob Miller. Mr. Miller is a Co-Founder and heads the Advisory Services practice at Opto Investments Inc.  Mr. Miller was previously at Bridgewater Associates. He has a passion for sensible long-term investing, systematizing investment processes, and distilling complex market dynamics into clear, logical linkages that help people understand goals and performance in intuitive and actionable ways.  Mr. Miller graduated with honors from the University of Chicago with a BA in Economics.  
Ryan VanGorder. Mr. VanGorder is Chief Executive and Chief Financial Officer of Opto Investments Inc. Prior to joining Opto, Mr. VanGorder was a Managing Director at BlackRock, leading finance in the Asia Pacific region. Mr. VanGorder has more than 20 years of financial services experience and began his career in 2001 at Quellos, a Seattle-based hedge fund-of-funds. Mr. VanGorder earned his undergraduate degree in Accounting from Fort Lewis College.  

 
II. EXECUTIVE SUMMARY OF TERMS
Certain terms of the Partnership Agreement are summarized below. The following summary is necessarily incomplete and qualified in its entirety by reference to the more detailed information appearing elsewhere herein, including under “SUMMARY OF FUND TERMS”, and the provisions of the Partnership Agreement. Capitalized terms used herein but not defined herein will have the meanings set forth in elsewhere herein.
The Fund	Waypoint Private Access Fund, LP, a Delaware limited partnership.
General Partner	Opto Custom GP 2023, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company.
Co-Investment Managers	The General Partner (on behalf of the Fund) has entered or will enter into a co-investment advisory relationship, whereby (i) Waypoint Wealth Counsel, LLC, a Georgia limited liability company (the “Waypoint Investment Manager”), will have discretion over the Fund’s investment of Capital Contributions by the Advisory Class Limited Partners and the Non-Advisory Class Limited Partners during the Commitment Period and (except as noted in clause (ii) below) the Investment Period, and (ii) to the extent the Warehouse continues to be a Limited Partner after the expiration of the Commitment Period, Lonsdale Investment Management, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company affiliated with the General Partner (the “Opto Investment Manager” and, together with the Waypoint Investment Manager, the “Investment Managers”), will have consent rights over the Fund’s investment of Capital Contributions by the Warehouse and other Limited Partners during the balance of the Investment Period.
Warehouse	Lonsdale Bedrock Fund LLC, a Delaware limited liability company and affiliate of the Opto Investment Manager and the General Partner. The Warehouse has made a Capital Commitment of $25,000,000 to the Fund, which is expected to be syndicated in part or whole to Limited Partners subsequently admitted to the Fund.
Investment Strategy	Opportunistically investing in private markets strategies through a variety of asset classes including, without limitation: private equity, venture capital, opportunistic real estate, credit, co-investments and/or other growth strategies.
Target Raise	$25 million, subject to the General Partner’s discretion to accept greater or lesser amounts.
Minimum Subscription	$250,000, subject to the General Partner’s discretion to accept lesser amounts.
Commitment Period	Initial Closing Date to December 31, 2024.
Investment Period	The Fund’s investment period will commence on the Initial Closing Date and continue until the earliest to occur of (i) the date on which all Capital Commitments (including the Reserve Commitments) have been drawn and/or committed or allocated to specific investments or earmarked for the payment of Organizational and Offering Expenses and Operating Expenses or to fund reserves, (ii) the eighteen-month anniversary of the Final Closing Date or (iii) the termination of the co-investment management agreement between the General Partner on behalf of the Fund and the Waypoint Investment Manager.
Term	Six-month anniversary of the last Underlying Fund, unless earlier terminated in accordance with the Partnership Agreement.
Management Fee	During the Investment Period: (a) for each Advisory Class Limited Partner, the product of 0.25% per annum multiplied by such Advisory Class Limited Partner’s Capital Commitment (excluding its Reserve Commitment and regardless of its Unfunded Commitment), and (b) for each Non-Advisory Class Limited Partner, the product of 1.0% per annum multiplied by such Non-Advisory Class Limited Partner’s Capital Commitment (excluding its Reserve Commitment and regardless of its Unfunded Commitment); and 
After the expiration of the Investment Period: (a) for each Advisory Class Limited Partner, the product of 0.20% per annum multiplied by such Advisory Class Limited Partner’s allocable share (based on relative Fund Percentage Interests) of the Fund NAV, and (b) for each Non-Advisory Class Limited Partner, the product of 0.90% per annum multiplied by such Non-Advisory Class Limited Partner’s allocable share (based on relative Fund Percentage Interests) of the Fund NAV.
Preferred Return	1.2x MOIC
Carried Interest Rate	5% in respect of Advisory Class Limited Partners, and
10% in respect of Non-Advisory Class Limited Partners.




 
III. GENERAL NOTICES
Prospective investors must review this Memorandum and should pay particular attention to the information set forth herein in the sections entitled “Risk Factors” and “Conflicts of Interest.” All capitalized terms used herein but not otherwise defined will, unless indicated otherwise, have the meanings set forth in the Partnership Agreement. 
The sole objective of the Fund will be to invest in a portfolio of underlying private fund vehicles managed by their respective general partners and investment advisers (collectively, the “Underlying Fund Managers”), together with (a) any parallel funds, alternative investment vehicles or similar entities that the Underlying Fund Managers may create to accommodate or mitigate legal, tax, regulatory or other investment requirements or conditions, and (b) any co-investments (i) directly into assets or individual Portfolio Investments (as defined below) wholly or partially owned by an Underlying Fund, an Underlying Fund Manager or another third party, or (ii) indirectly made through private investment funds sponsored or managed by an Underlying Fund Manager, the General Partner, the Investment Managers or any other third party sponsor (or both (i) and (ii), as the context requires) (collectively, the “Underlying Funds” and each, an “Underlying Fund”). Subject to the limitations described herein, the Fund may invest, in such amounts and at such times, in the Underlying Funds, as may be determined from time to time pursuant to the co-investment advisory authorities of Waypoint Wealth Counsel, LLC and Lonsdale Investment Management, LLC (together, the “Investment Managers”) as described herein. 
Opto Custom GP 2023 LLC, a Delaware limited liability company that serves as the Fund’s general partner (the “General Partner”), or the Investment Managers expect to provide investors in the Fund with copies of the confidential private placement memorandum, marketing deck, fund fact card or any other marketing or sales materials, as applicable, of any Underlying Fund or any supplement(s) thereto or amendments or restatements thereof, or copies of the constituent documents of each Underlying Fund (collectively, the “Underlying Fund Documents”); provided, that, notwithstanding the foregoing, the General Partner and the Investment Managers are under no obligation to (and may elect not to) do so, and their ability to do so may be limited by confidentiality and similar restrictions within the Underlying Fund Documents. Further, investors in the Fund will not be entitled to receive copies of any reports, notices, or other information provided by any Underlying Fund to the Fund, and the Fund’s investors will not have any right to confer with or ask questions of the Underlying Fund Managers in connection with the investors’ decision to invest in the Fund. 
During the course of the offering, the General Partner or the Investment Managers will provide to each prospective investor and such investor’s representatives and advisors, if any, the opportunity to ask questions and receive answers concerning the terms and conditions of this offering and to obtain any additional information that the Fund may possess or can obtain without unreasonable effort or expense that is necessary to verify the accuracy of the information furnished to such prospective investor. Any such questions should be directed to the Investment Managers or the General Partner. No person other than the Investment Managers and the General Partner has been authorized to give information or to make any representations concerning the Fund or this offering outside of this Memorandum, and if given or made, such other information or representations must not be relied upon as having been authorized by the Fund. 
[While neither of the Investment Managers is currently a client of, or an investor in a private fund advised by, any Underlying Fund Manager, the Investment Managers and their respective affiliates sponsor and manage private feeder funds or funds of funds (including the Fund) that are or may be expected to be investors in Underlying Funds. Additionally, when deemed appropriate by the applicable Investment Manager, the Fund will invest in Underlying Funds that are sponsored and managed by an Investment Manager or its affiliates, in which case the Underlying Fund Manager for such Underlying Fund would be such Investment Manager or its affiliates.] 
You understand that, as a result of these relationships, (a) each Investment Manager would be financially compensated for such arrangements, including by the Fund through payment of the Management Fee (which is calculated as described in “SUMMARY OF PRINCIPAL TERMS – Management Fee”), and (b) the existence of such compensation as well as the affiliated management between the Fund and Underlying Funds create conflicts of interest whereby, for example, such Investment Manager or its affiliates may be more inclined (i) to establish feeder funds or funds of funds (including the Fund) (A) for investment in securities of Underlying Funds sponsored or managed by the Underlying Fund Managers and their affiliates, than for investment in securities of funds sponsored or managed by other fund managers, and (B) upon terms and conditions more favorable to the Underlying Fund Managers and their affiliates than such Investment Manager or its affiliates would otherwise agree to in the absence of such compensation; (ii) to make positive statements about the Underlying Fund Managers, the Underlying Funds and their affiliates in order to encourage investors to make larger commitments to the securities offered by feeder funds or funds of funds (including the Fund) sponsored or managed by such Investment Manager and its affiliates or to the securities offered by Underlying Funds, thereby increasing the fees paid to such Investment Manager or its affiliates; to invest the assets of the Fund in an Underlying Fund managed by such Investment Manager or its affiliates rather than a third-party Underlying Fund Manager; or (iv) to vote or exercise consent rights, if any, in respect of interests in underlying securities held by feeder funds or funds of funds (including the Fund) in a manner more favorable to such Underlying Fund Managers and their affiliates than such Investment Manager or its affiliates would otherwise vote or exercise in the absence of such compensation.
The Interests have not been registered with, or approved or disapproved by, the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission or any other U.S. federal or state agency, or any non-U.S. governmental agency or regulatory authority or any securities exchange.  No agency, authority or exchange has passed upon the content, accuracy, completeness, adequacy or fairness of this Memorandum or the merits of an investment in the Fund. Any representation to the contrary is a criminal offense.
The Interests have not been and will not be registered under the U.S. Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the “Securities Act”) or the securities laws of any state. The offering contemplated by this Memorandum will be made in reliance upon an exemption from the registration requirements of the Securities Act for offers and sales of securities that do not involve any public offering, and analogous exemptions under state securities laws.  This Memorandum does not constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of an offer to buy nor will any sale of Interests be made in any jurisdiction in which the offer, solicitation or sale is not authorized or to any person to whom it is unlawful to make the offer, solicitation or sale. Accordingly, the Interests may not be offered or sold, directly or indirectly, and this Memorandum may not be distributed in any jurisdiction, except in accordance with the legal requirements applicable to such jurisdiction.  The Interests are subject to restrictions on transferability and resale and may not be transferred or resold, except as provided in the Partnership Agreement.  Accordingly, prospective investors should be aware that they will be required to bear the financial risks of an investment in the Interests for an indefinite period of time. The Fund will not be registered as an investment company under the U.S. Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended (the “Investment Company Act”).  There will be no public market for the Interests and there is no obligation on the part of any person to register the Interests under the Securities Act.  No person has been authorized to make any representations concerning the Fund or any Underlying Fund that are inconsistent with those contained in this Memorandum.
Prospective investors should read this Memorandum before investing in the Fund.  Ownership Interests in the Fund are not insured by the U.S. Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, and are not deposits, obligations of, or endorsed or guaranteed in any way by, any banking entity.
Although the Investment Managers intend to invest substantially all of the investable net assets of the Fund in the Underlying Funds (less reserves and certain short-term investments), the terms and conditions of an investment in the Fund are different from the terms of a direct investment in the Underlying Funds.  Prospective investors should carefully review this Memorandum, the Partnership Agreement and any other documents relating to the Fund that are available on the Opto Platform in their entirety prior to making any decision to invest in the Fund.  Except with respect to Opto Warehouse Transactions (as defined in “Summary of Principal Terms – Investment Objectives”), none of the Underlying Fund Managers are responsible for the formation or operation of the Fund.
No person is authorized to give any information or to make any representation not contained in this Memorandum in connection with the matters described herein, and, if given or made, such information or representation must not be relied upon as having been authorized.
The delivery of this Memorandum at any time does not imply that information contained herein is correct as of any time subsequent to the date hereof.
The Interests are available only to sophisticated investors willing and able to bear the economic risks of an investment therein. The Interests are speculative and involve a high degree of risk. There can be no assurance that the Fund will avoid substantial losses.
This Memorandum constitutes an offer only to the person to whom it has been delivered and only if delivery of this Memorandum has been properly authorized by the General Partner. Each prospective investor, by accepting delivery of this Memorandum, agrees to keep the contents hereof strictly confidential and to use it solely for the purpose of evaluating an investment in the Fund. This Memorandum has been prepared solely for the benefit of persons interested in the proposed sale of the Interests and any reproduction of this Memorandum, in whole or part, or the divulgence of any of the contents hereof without the prior written consent of the General Partner, is prohibited. Any contrary action may place the person or persons taking such action in violation of applicable securities laws. Notwithstanding the foregoing, each prospective investor may share this Memorandum with its professional consultants and advisers that are under the same confidentiality obligations with respect to the Memorandum.
Certain information contained in this Memorandum constitutes “forward-looking statements,” which can be identified by the use of forward-looking terminology such as “may,” “will,” “should,” “expect,” “anticipate,” “project,” “target,” “estimate,” “intend,” “continue” or “believe” or the negatives thereof or other variations thereon or comparable terminology.  Forward-looking statements are statements that are not historical facts, including statements about beliefs and expectations.  Any statement in this Memorandum that contains intentions, beliefs, expectations or predictions (and the assumptions underlying them) is a forward-looking statement.  These assumptions are based on plans, estimates, and projections, as they are currently available.  Forward-looking statements therefore speak only as of the date they are made, and none of the General Partner, the Investment Managers, or the Fund undertakes to update any of them in light of new information or future events.  Forward-looking statements involve inherent risks and uncertainties.  Due to various risks and uncertainties, including those set forth under the sections entitled “Risk Factors” and “Conflicts of Interest” in this Memorandum, actual events or results or the actual performance of the Fund or the Underlying Funds may differ materially and adversely from those reflected or contemplated in the forward-looking statements. 
If applicable, the Investment Managers intend to operate the Fund as a commodity pool operator (a “CPO”) exempt from registration with the U.S. Commodity Futures Trading Commission (“CFTC”) under CFTC Regulation 4.13(a)(3), on the basis that, among other things, (a) the Fund’s indirect trading in commodity interest positions through the Underlying Funds, if any, is limited so that either (i) no more than 5% of the liquidation value of the Fund’s portfolio is used as initial margin, premiums and required minimum security deposits to establish such positions, or (ii) the aggregate net notional value of the Fund’s indirect trading in such positions through the Underlying Funds, if any, does not exceed 100% of the Fund’s liquidation value, and (b) the Interests are exempt from registration under the Securities Act and are offered and sold without marketing to the public in the United States. Therefore, in such circumstances, unlike a registered CPO, the Investment Managers will not be required to provide prospective investors with a CFTC-compliant disclosure document, nor will the Investment Managers be required to provide Limited Partners with periodic account statements or certified annual reports that satisfy the requirements of CFTC regulations applicable to registered CPOs. In the event that the Investment Managers do not rely on the aforementioned exemption with respect to the Fund, the Investment Managers may avail themselves of certain disclosure, reporting and record-keeping relief under CFTC Regulation 4.7 or rely on another exemption. This Memorandum has not been reviewed or approved by the CFTC or the National Futures Association, the self-regulatory body of the CFTC.
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Memorandum, each prospective investor in the Fund (and each employee, representative, or other agent of the investor) may disclose to any and all persons, without limitation of any kind, the tax treatment and tax structure of the Fund, the Underlying Funds and any transactions entered into by the Fund or the Underlying Funds and all materials of any kind (including opinions or other tax analyses) that are provided to the prospective investor relating to such tax treatment and tax structure. As used in this paragraph, the term “tax treatment” refers to the purported or claimed U.S. federal, state or local income tax treatment and the term “tax structure” refers to any fact that may be relevant to understanding the purported or claimed U.S. federal, state or local income tax treatment, provided that, for the avoidance of doubt, (a) except to the extent otherwise established in published guidance by the U.S. Internal Revenue Service, the tax treatment and tax structure shall not include the name of, contact information for, or any other similar identifying information regarding, the Fund, the Underlying Funds or any of the investments of the Fund or the Underlying Funds (including the names of any employees or affiliates of the Fund or the Underlying Funds) and (b) this paragraph shall not limit the ability of a prospective investor to make any disclosure to such prospective investor’s tax advisors or to the U.S. Internal Revenue Service. The authorization of disclosure in this paragraph is retroactively effective to the commencement of the first discussions between either Investment Manager or its representatives and the prospective investor regarding the transactions contemplated in this Memorandum.
The contents of this Memorandum are not, and should not be construed as, investment, legal, or tax advice. Each prospective investor is urged to seek and rely on independent investment, legal, and tax advice concerning the consequences of investing in the Fund and its suitability for the prospective investor based on the prospective investor’s particular circumstances from an independent adviser.
Purchasers of Interests will not be limited partners (or similar equity holders) of any Underlying Fund, will have no direct interest in any Underlying Fund, will have no direct voting rights in any Underlying Fund, will not be parties to any Underlying Fund Document, and, accordingly, will not have any direct rights thereunder.  Further, purchasers of Interests will not be direct investors in the Underlying Funds, will not have privity of contract with any Underlying Fund, and may not have recourse against any Underlying Fund with respect to their investment in the Fund.  Although the Fund is being established to invest in the Underlying Funds, it is not an affiliate of any Underlying Fund Managers or Underlying Funds.  The offering of Interests in the Fund does not constitute and should not be considered an offering of Interests in the Underlying Funds.  
Potential investors should note that, except with respect to Opto Warehouse Transactions, none of the persons or entities responsible for the organization, control, management or operations of the Fund or any of its affiliates has the power to legally bind or commit the Underlying Funds or the Underlying Fund Managers. Moreover, except with respect to Opto Warehouse Transactions, none of the General Partner, the Investment Manager, the Fund, the Warehouse, the Fund’s administrator, or any of their affiliates has the right to participate in the control, management or operations of the Underlying Fund Managers, the Underlying Funds or any of their affiliates, or has discretion over the management or operations of the Underlying Fund Managers, the Underlying Funds or any of their affiliates, and they expressly disclaim any responsibility therefore or liability thereto.  Except with respect to Opto Warehouse Transactions, the Underlying Funds and the other Underlying Fund Managers’ investment funds are not affiliated with, but have, and may in the future have, other business relationships with, the Fund or their respective affiliates, including engaging in various lending and securities transactions, and no Underlying Fund Manager is responsible for the formation or operation of the Fund.  Interests are being offered and sold exclusively by the Investment Manager and/or its affiliates and not by the Underlying Funds or the Underlying Fund Managers.  Except with respect to Opto Warehouse Transactions, none of the Underlying Funds or the Underlying Fund Managers have participated or will participate in the offering of Interests, none of the foregoing has or shall have any responsibility for such offering or for the formation, control, management or operation of the Fund.  The offering of Interests should not be considered an offering of direct interests in any Underlying Fund.  Except with respect to Opto Warehouse Transactions, none of the Underlying Funds or the Underlying Fund Managers have endorsed, and none of them is or shall be responsible for the preparation or contents of, the Fund’s offering materials or the governing documents of the Fund, the form subscription agreement of the Fund, or any related agreements and instruments or any accompanying sales documentation (other than such information provided by any Underlying Fund Managers, which is referenced or incorporated in whole or in part in any such sales documentation, each as amended or supplemented from time to time), and none of the Underlying Funds or the Underlying Fund Managers have endorsed or made any recommendations, representations or warranties with respect to Interests in the Fund.  Furthermore, except with respect to Opto Warehouse Transactions, none of the Underlying Funds or the Underlying Fund Managers have made any representation or warranty, express or implied, with respect to the content, adequacy, fairness, correctness, accuracy, reasonableness or completeness of any of the information contained in this Memorandum, and they expressly disclaim any responsibility or liability therefor.  
Notwithstanding anything in this Memorandum to the contrary, the provisions in this Memorandum shall not be construed as to relieve (or attempt to relieve) any persons from liability (including liability under any U.S. federal securities law, with respect to which liabilities cannot be waived), to the extent (but only to the extent) that such liability may not be waived, modified or limited under applicable law, but shall be construed so as to effectuate the provisions herein to the fullest extent permitted by law.
Prospective investors should be aware that, although this Memorandum describes certain aspects of the Fund, it is not intended to be comprehensive. The “Summary of Principal Terms” hereof is subject to, and qualified by, the Partnership Agreement.  Prospective investors should pay careful attention to the caveats, risk factors and warnings included herein and in this Memorandum.
References to “$” and “dollars” are to the lawful currency of the U.S., unless the context indicates otherwise.  Any performance information set forth in this Memorandum is in dollars unless otherwise specified.
 
IV. DIRECTORY

Fund
Waypoint Private Access Fund L.P.
335 Madison Avenue, Suite 5B
New York, NY 10017
Administrator
Gen II Fund Services, LLC
805 3rd Ave 24th Floor 
New York, NY 10022
Auditor
Deloitte & Touche LLP
30 Rockefeller Plaza
New York, NY 10012-0015



	General Partner
Opto Custom GP 2023 LLC
335 Madison Avenue, Suite 5B
New York, NY 10017
Co-Investment Managers
Lonsdale Investment Management, LLC
335 Madison Avenue, Suite 5B
New York, NY 10017
Waypoint Wealth Counsel, LLC
722 Montana Road NW, Bldg 400-775
Atlanta, GA 30327
U.S. Legal Counsel
Alston & Bird LLP
1120 South Tryon Street, Suite 300
Charlotte, NC 28203-6818



 
V. TABLE OF CONTENTS
Page(s)
SUMMARY OF PRINCIPAL TERMS	1
RISK FACTORS	44
CONFLICTS OF INTEREST	74
CERTAIN INCOME TAX CONSIDERATIONS	77
ANTI-MONEY LAUNDERING AND COUNTERING OF TERRORIST AND PROLIFERATION FINANCING	88
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION	89
APPENDIX A  FORM OF SUBSCRIPTION BOOKLET	90
APPENDIX B  NOTICES TO INVESTORS IN CERTAIN JURISDICTIONS	91

 
WAYPOINT PRIVATE ACCESS FUND L.P.
SUMMARY OF PRINCIPAL TERMS
The following is a summary of the principal terms of Waypoint Private Access Fund L.P. (the “Fund”). This Confidential Private Placement Memorandum (this “Memorandum”) is not intended to be comprehensive and is qualified in its entirety by the terms and information set forth in the agreement of limited partnership of the Fund, as it may be amended, restated or supplemented from time to time (the “Partnership Agreement”), and the Form of Subscription Booklet contained as Appendix A hereto, as amended from time to time (the “Subscription Booklet”), relating to the purchase of limited partnership interests of the Fund (the “Interests”). 
All capitalized terms used herein but not otherwise defined have, unless indicated otherwise, the meanings set forth in the Partnership Agreement. Each prospective investor must review this Memorandum and the Partnership Agreement and complete the Subscription Booklet in connection with such prospective investor’s investment in the Fund. In the event that the terms described in this Memorandum are inconsistent with or contrary to the terms of the Partnership Agreement, the Partnership Agreement shall prevail.
The General Partner or the Investment Managers expect to provide investors with a copy of the Confidential Private Placement Memorandum, marketing deck, fund fact card or any other marketing or sales materials, as applicable, of any Underlying Fund (as defined below) or any supplement(s) thereto or amendments or restatements thereof, or copies of the constituent documentation of any Underlying Fund (as it may be further amended, restated or supplemented from time to time, an “Underlying Fund Agreement” and, collectively with the placement memorandum, marketing deck, fact card or other marketing or sales materials, the “Underlying Fund Documents”); provided, that notwithstanding the foregoing, the General Partner and the Investment Managers are under no obligation to (and may elect not to) do so, and their ability to do so may be limited by confidentiality and similar restrictions within the Underlying Fund Documents. 
FUND	Waypoint Private Access Fund L.P., formed as a Delaware limited partnership.
An investment in the Fund is not equivalent to an investment in the Underlying Funds. The General Partner (as defined below) and its affiliates may, in their discretion, form other funds to invest indirectly in any Underlying Fund, including for the purpose of providing certain investors that are ineligible to participate in the Fund the opportunity to invest indirectly in such Underlying Fund.
Parallel or Feeder Funds (as defined below) may be organized in the future at the sole discretion of the General Partner and its affiliates. Such Parallel or Feeder Funds may invest substantially all of their assets directly in or in parallel with the Fund. Parallel or Feeder Funds may have the same or different terms (including terms that are more favourable) than those described herein. 
Interests in the Fund are denominated in U.S. Dollars. Prospective investors should consult their own advisors regarding the U.S. and foreign tax consequences of an investment in the Fund.
GENERAL PARTNER	Opto Custom GP 2023 LLC (the “General Partner”), a Delaware limited liability company, serves as the general partner of the Fund. The General Partner is an affiliate of the Investment Manager and the Warehouse (each as defined below). 
CO-INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT AGREEMENTS	The General Partner, on behalf of the Fund, has entered or will enter into a co-investment advisory relationship whereby investment management authorities will be bifurcated between Waypoint Wealth Counsel, LLC, a Georgia limited liability company (the “Waypoint Investment Manager”), and Lonsdale Investment Management, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company and affiliate of the General Partner (the “Opto Investment Manager” and together with the Waypoint Investment Manager, the “Investment Managers”), as described below.
The General Partner has appointed or will appoint (i) the Waypoint Investment Manager as co-investment manager of the Fund pursuant to a co-investment management agreement between the General Partner and the Waypoint Investment Manager (as amended, restated or supplemented from time to time, the “Waypoint Co-Investment Management Agreement”), and (ii) the Opto Investment Manager as co-investment manager of the Fund pursuant to a co-investment management agreement between the General Partner and the Opto Investment Manager (as amended, restated or supplemented from time to time, the “Opto Co-Investment Management Agreement” and together with the Waypoint Co-Investment Management Agreement, the “Co-Investment Management Agreements”). (See “Co-Investment Management Agreements” below).
Pursuant to the Co-Investment Management Agreements and the Partnership Agreement, during the Commitment Period (as defined below), the General Partner, at the direction of the Waypoint Investment Manager, which shall have discretion over the Fund’s investments during the Commitment Period, will cause the Fund to make one or more capital commitments (including follow-on capital commitments) to one or more Underlying Funds, which investments will be funded solely by Capital Contributions (as defined below) by the Advisory Class Limited Partners and the Non-Advisory Class Limited Partners (each as defined below) and not the Warehouse (as defined below). 
After the expiration of the Commitment Period (or such earlier date mutually agreed to by the Investment Managers), if the Warehouse Withdrawal (as defined below) has occurred (i.e., the Warehouse ceases to be a Limited Partner), the General Partner, at the direction of the Waypoint Investment Manager, will cause the Fund to make one or more capital commitments or follow-on capital commitments to one or more Underlying Funds as directed by the Waypoint Investment Manager during the balance of the Investment Period.
If, however, the Warehouse Withdrawal has not occurred (i.e., the Warehouse continues to be a Limited Partner) upon expiration of the Commitment Period, then for the balance of the Investment Period the General Partner will only cause the Fund to make additional capital commitments or follow-on capital commitments to Underlying Funds if such additional investments are mutually agreed to by the Investment Managers, and such investments will be funded by Capital Contributions by the Warehouse and other Limited Partners based on relative Fund Percentage Interests following the Warehouse Equalization (as defined below), subject in each case to the purpose and investment strategy of the Fund as described herein and any limitations contained in the Co-Investment Management Agreements and the Partnership Agreement.
The General Partner may terminate either of the Co-Investment Management Agreements based on certain for-cause events described therein, and each Co-Investment Management Agreement provides the applicable Investment Manager with broad exculpation and indemnification rights, in particular with respect to the activities of the other Investment Manager. 
In the event the Waypoint Co-Investment Management Agreement is terminated, then, inter alia, (i) the Waypoint Investment Manager (a) will not be entitled to payment of any Management Fees relating to any period following the date of such termination, (b) will remain entitled to its share of the Carried Interest Distributions for the duration of the Fund; (ii) the Investment Period will terminate immediately; and (iii) the Management Fees otherwise payable to the Waypoint Investment Manager will instead be paid to the Opto Investment Manager, unless and until another co-investment manager is retained on behalf of the Fund. (See “Management Fees” and “Fund Distributions; Carried Interest” below).
The Investment Managers are responsible for exercising the Fund’s rights with respect to its investments in the Underlying Funds as described herein. Except as described herein, the Investment Managers are not required to consult with or obtain the approval of any Limited Partner (as defined below) in exercising the Fund’s rights to invest in the Underlying Funds. 
Except with respect to Opto Warehouse Transactions (as defined in “Investment Objectives” below), none of the Underlying Funds, the Underlying Fund Managers, or any of their respective affiliates will be involved in, oversee, or have any responsibility for the business, operations, investments, or investment decisions of the Fund, the General Partner, the Investment Managers, the Warehouse, or any of their respective affiliates.
Likewise, except with respect to Opto Warehouse Transactions, none of the Fund, the General Partner, the Investment Managers, the Warehouse, or any of their respective affiliates are affiliated with or have the right to participate in, or discretion over, the control, management, or operation of any of the Underlying Funds, the Underlying Fund Managers, or their respective affiliates, and none of the Underlying Funds, the Underlying Fund Managers, or their respective affiliates are responsible for the offering of Interests in the Fund described herein. 
INVESTMENT OBJECTIVE; OPTO WAREHOUSE TRANSACTIONS; ROLE OF THE WAREHOUSE	The Fund was organized for the purpose of, and will focus on, investing in private markets strategies through indirect investments in a variety of asset classes including, without limitation, private equity, venture capital, opportunistic real estate, credit, co-investments and/or other growth strategies (the “Growth Strategy”).  
In deploying the Growth Strategy, the Fund will make capital commitments to, and acquire limited partnership interests (or similar equity interests) in, a portfolio of underlying private fund vehicles managed by their respective general partners and investment advisers (collectively, the “Underlying Fund Managers”), together with (a) any parallel funds, alternative investment vehicles or similar entities that the Underlying Fund Managers may create to accommodate or mitigate legal, tax, regulatory or other investment requirements or conditions, and (b) any co-investments (i) directly into assets or individual Portfolio Investments (as defined below) wholly or partially owned by an Underlying Fund, an Underlying Fund Manager or another third party, or (ii) indirectly made through private investment funds sponsored or managed by an Underlying Fund Manager, the General Partner, the Investment Managers or any other third party sponsor (or both (i) and (ii), as the context requires) (collectively, the “Underlying Funds” and each, an “Underlying Fund”), and to make certain Liquid Investments (as defined below) in connection therewith. (See “Status as Fund of Funds” below). 
The Fund will seek to deploy capital across a diversified set of Underlying Fund Managers, those with established long-term track records and others pursuing emerging strategies.  The Investment Managers believe this approach will serve to mitigate risk while providing exposure to potential additional growth. Subject to the limitations described herein, the Fund may invest, in such amounts and at such times, in the Underlying Funds, as may be determined from time to time by the applicable Investment Manager in its sole discretion.
Other than assets held in the Liquid Investments (as defined below) or otherwise held for reserve as described herein, the Fund intends to invest substantially all of its investable net assets (potentially including the Reserve Commitments and subject to Reinvestable Proceeds (each as defined below)) in:
•	Primary Offerings of Private Equity Underlying Funds: primary offerings of limited partnership interests or shares (or similar instruments) of Underlying Funds that are focused on making minority and control investments in growth, lower middle market, and middle market companies through privately negotiated transactions using a range of financial instruments, including, without limitation, common and preferred equity, convertible securities, subordinated debt and warrants or other instruments;
•	Primary Offerings of Venture Capital Underlying Funds: primary offerings of limited partnership interests or shares (or similar instruments) of Underlying Funds that are focused on making seed and early series round investments in early-stage companies;
•	Opportunistic Real Estate Underlying Funds: primary offerings of limited partnership interests or shares (or similar instruments) of Underlying Funds that are focused on making opportunistic investments in real estate; 
•	Credit Focused Underlying Funds: primary offerings of limited partnership interests or shares (or similar instruments) of Underlying Funds that lend to private companies by investing in corporate debt, structuring credit facilities and utilizing other methods and instruments to make credit available to corporate borrowers; and
•	Co-Investments: direct co-investment in assets or individual Portfolio Investments wholly or partially owned by an Underlying Fund, Underlying Fund Manager or another third party, or indirectly through a private investment fund sponsored or managed by an Underlying Fund Manager, another third-party, the Investment Managers, the General Partner or its affiliates, which pursues co-investments as its investment strategy.
These and other investment strategies may allow certain Underlying Fund Managers the flexibility to use leveraged or short-sale positions to take advantage of perceived inefficiencies across the global capital markets and are referred to as “alternative” strategies in contrast to the long-only limited-leverage investment programs of certain conventional hedge funds or registered investment companies such as mutual funds.
It is anticipated that the Underlying Funds generally may modify their investment strategies and objectives from time to time without the consent of the Fund or the Limited Partners. If an Underlying Fund modifies its investment strategy or objective and provides notice thereof to the Fund, the applicable Investment Manager may, in its sole discretion, cause the Fund to take no action, or, to the extent practicable, cause the Fund to redeem part or all of its investment from the applicable Underlying Fund, in each case without notice to or the consent of any Limited Partner.
The determination to categorize (or recategorize) a particular Underlying Fund within one of the target investment strategies of the Fund is in the sole discretion of the applicable Investment Manager, and such Investment Manager also may choose to redefine, add, or subtract strategy descriptions from time to time, in each case without the consent of the Limited Partners.
The Fund is designed to enable Eligible Investors (as defined below) to obtain indirect exposure to the investment strategies of the Underlying Funds. Except as otherwise noted herein (including, without limitation, for Liquid Investments, which are expected to be made for cash-management purposes, and for co-investment opportunities), it is not anticipated that the Fund will make investments outside of its investments in the Underlying Funds. Each Limited Partner will participate in the Fund’s investments by way of its Capital Contributions (defined below) in respect of its Capital Commitment (and, as applicable, its Reserve Commitment) (in each case as defined below).  
The Investment Managers expect to secure the Fund’s investment opportunity in certain of the Underlying Funds through the Warehouse’s Capital Commitment to the Fund. As described in additional detail in the “Fund Closings” section below, the Fund is seeking additional investor commitments such that, upon the admission of additional Limited Partners, the Warehouse’s Capital Commitment will be cancelled, in whole or in part, and its Capital Contributions returned. For purposes of clarity, the Capital Contributions of such additional Limited Partners will also be used by the Fund to pay fees and expenses of the Fund.  (See “Organizational and Offering Expenses” and “Operating Expenses” below) thereby reducing the amount of such Limited Partner’s Capital Contributions ultimately invested by the Fund into the Underlying Funds. (See Risk Factors – Multiple Levels of Fees and Expenses).
It is intended that, as of the Final Closing Date, the Fund will have made aggregate capital commitments to the Underlying Funds in an amount substantially, but not fully, equal to the aggregate Capital Commitments (potentially including the Reserve Commitments and subject to Reinvestable Proceeds (as defined below)), with the balance reserved for expenses, liabilities and/or any other obligations of the Fund, as determined by the General Partner in its discretion (though no assurances can be given that such reserved amounts will be sufficient to pay any such expenses or cover any such obligations); provided, however, there is no assurance that the Fund will be able to make any particular amount of capital commitments to one or more Underlying Funds. Because the Fund expects to invest substantially all of its net investable assets (potentially including the Reserve Commitments and subject to Reinvestable Proceeds) in the Underlying Funds, investors in the Fund will be subject both to the restrictions and risks applicable to investors in the Fund and to substantially the same restrictions and risks applicable to investors in the Underlying Funds.  
[It is further anticipated that the Fund may invest in one or more Underlying Funds that are managed by the Opto Investment Manager and in which an affiliate of the Opto Investment Manager acts as an anchor investor or otherwise holds a substantial economic interest (each such investment, an “Opto Warehouse Transaction”). If the General Partner believes that a proposed Opto Warehouse Transaction by the Fund would constitute a “principal transaction” under Section 206(3) of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940, as amended (the “Advisers Act”), the General Partner will seek the prior written consent of the Waypoint Investment Manager as described in “Conflicts of Interest” below.] 
If the Fund so invests in an Underlying Fund that is sponsored and managed by the Opto Investment Manager or its affiliates, the Underlying Fund Manager for such Underlying Fund would be the Opto Investment Manager or its affiliates.
UNDERLYING FUNDS; PORTFOLIO INVESTMENTS	The investments by the Underlying Funds, in which the Fund will participate (a) indirectly through its limited partner interests (or similar equity interests) in the Underlying Funds, or (b) directly in the context of a co-investment offered by the Underlying Funds or Underlying Fund Managers (as applicable), are referred to herein as the “Portfolio Investments.”   
Because alternative investment strategies may be risky, the Investment Managers believe it is prudent for the Fund to generally invest in Portfolio Investments through Underlying Funds (as opposed to directly) organized as limited partnerships, corporations or other vehicles providing limited liability to their investors. This structure is intended to limit the effect that losses incurred by any one Underlying Fund may have on the assets of the Fund generally by limiting the Fund’s amount at risk to the amount invested in such Underlying Fund.
Limited Partners are indirectly subject to all the risks, opportunities, fees, and expenses of the Underlying Funds by virtue of the Fund’s status as an interest holder in each of the Underlying Funds and as a result should carefully read this Memorandum (including all exhibits and supplements hereto) and the Partnership Agreement in their entirety before making an investment decision of whether to invest in the Fund.
STATUS AS FUND OF FUNDS	The Fund is designed to be a “fund of funds” that seeks returns while also seeking to provide diversification for its investors by investing substantially all of its investable net assets in the Underlying Funds. Because the Underlying Funds are expected to follow alternative investment strategies (whether hedged or not) in pursuit of the Growth Strategy, generally through closed-end capital structures often described as “private equity funds,” the Fund’s investment program may be referred to as a “fund of private equity funds,” even though the Fund may target investment in private funds with investment strategies consistent with the Growth Strategy that are not squarely within a traditional private equity investment program.
This offering is not for a direct investment in the Underlying Funds, and an investment in the Fund is not equivalent to an investment in the Underlying Funds. The offering of Interests in the Fund described herein does not constitute a direct or indirect offering of any interests in the Underlying Funds. 
A Limited Partner will not be an investor in the Underlying Funds, will have no direct economic or other interest in the Underlying Funds, and will have no voting rights in the Underlying Funds. A Limited Partner’s legal rights and remedies will be limited to those it holds against the Fund and the General Partner. A Limited Partner will receive reports and information from the Fund only and will not be entitled to receive any reports or other information directly from the Underlying Funds.  
Investors in the Fund will not be entitled to receive a copy of the Underlying Fund Documents, except to the extent the Investment Manager discloses the Underlying Fund Documents to them in its sole discretion (and to the extent permitted to do so pursuant to the Underlying Fund Documents). Further, investors in the Fund will not be entitled to receive copies of any reports, notices, or other information provided by the Underlying Funds to the Fund, and investors will not have any right to confer with or ask questions of the Underlying Fund Managers in connection with the investors’ decision to invest in the Fund.
Furthermore, an Underlying Fund may itself be a “fund of funds,” which will indirectly subject a Limited Partner to additional multiple layers of fees, costs and expenses incurred below the Underlying Fund level. In such case, fees, costs and expenses will be charged at the levels of the Fund, the Underlying Fund and the Portfolio Investment (which may also be a private fund vehicle) levels.  In this connection, the Fund has made, or prior to the Initial Closing (as defined below) will make, a $2,500,000 commitment to an Underlying Fund, which itself is a fund of funds, from the Capital Contributions of the Warehouse.
INVESTOR SUBSCRIPTIONS	Each prospective investor in the Fund must confirm in its Subscription Booklet that such prospective investor has reviewed and understood this Memorandum.
A prospective investor may subscribe for an Interest as a limited partner of the Fund (each such subscribing investor, if admitted to the Fund, a “Limited Partner” and, collectively with the General Partner and the Warehouse, the “Partners”) by completing the Subscription Booklet and sending such Subscription Booklet to the General Partner, provided that the Fund is under no obligation to accept subscriptions to the Fund by Eligible Investors or any other prospective investor to become Limited Partners, and the General Partner may terminate the Fund and the offering of Interests for any reason and in its sole discretion at any time prior to the Initial Closing or any Subsequent Closing (each as defined below).
ELIGIBLE INVESTORS	Investment in Interests involves significant risks and is suitable only for sophisticated investors that have substantial financial resources in relation to their investment in Interests, can bear the financial risk of their investment for an indefinite period of time and understand the particular risk factors and tax consequences of their investment.
To be eligible to subscribe for Interests, a prospective investor will be required to represent and verify that such investor is (i) an “accredited investor,” as defined in Regulation D promulgated under the Securities Act and (ii) a “qualified client,” as defined in Rule 205-3 of the Advisers Act. 
The Interests are primarily designed for, and will be offered in a private placement to, investors that are U.S. persons and are either taxable investors or U.S. tax-exempt investors that are not sensitive to the incurrence of “unrelated business taxable income (“UBTI”).  Non-U.S. persons will not be permitted to invest in the Fund without the approval of the General Partner. If an investor becomes a non-U.S. person after investing in the Fund, adverse tax consequences could result for the investor and the investor should promptly notify the General Partner. 
Any U.S. tax-exempt investors sensitive to the incurrence of UBTI and any prospective non-U.S. investors should consult their own tax advisors regarding the application of the UBTI and the ECI/CAI rules (as defined and discussed in more detail below) before determining whether an investment in any Parallel or Feeder Fund, or in the Fund directly, is appropriate based on their specific circumstances. Such prospective investors should also consult with their tax advisors concerning any additional measures to mitigate UBTI and ECI/CAI, such as establishing their own investment vehicles. For the avoidance of doubt, none of the Fund, the General Partner, the Investment Managers or any of their respective affiliates is obligated to establish any such Parallel or Feeder Funds or otherwise limit the potential incurrence of UBTI or ECI/CAI.
Each prospective investor that is able to verify the above requirements and meet any additional eligibility requirements shall be deemed an “Eligible Investor.”
A prospective investor that is a U.S. tax-exempt person should notify the General Partner before investing in the Fund.
TARGET RAISE 	The Fund is seeking a minimum of $25 million in Capital Commitments by Limited Partners other than the Warehouse, which has made or will make a $25 million Capital Commitment to the Fund as a Limited Partner thereof for the purpose of funding the initial investments of the Fund in Underlying Funds. As described herein, the Warehouse’s Interest is expected to be syndicated to Limited Partners admitted to the Fund; provided that the General Partner may accept aggregate Capital Commitments from such Limited Partners of a greater or lesser amount at the Initial Closing or one or more Subsequent Closings.  
Interests in the Fund are being offered on a first come, first served basis, provided that, the aggregate commitments will ultimately depend on the amount the Fund is able to raise, the amount accepted by the Underlying Funds and other limitations imposed by applicable law.  
ADVISORY CLASS AND NON-ADVISORY CLASS LIMITED PARTNERS	The Fund is offering Advisory Class (as defined below) Interests only to certain advisory clients of the Waypoint Investment Manager, in its capacity as a registered investment adviser separate and apart from its relationship to such client by way of the Fund, and such advisory clients will not pay any placement fees in connection with their investments in the Fund.
In the event that an Advisory Class Limited Partner (as defined below) subsequently terminates the advisory relationship with the Waypoint Investment Manager, in its capacity as such Limited Partner’s investment adviser separate and apart from its relationship to such Limited Partner by way of the Fund, during the term of the Fund, the Management Fee rate (as defined below) and Carried Interest Distribution rate borne by such Limited Partner will be adjusted to that of a Non-Advisory Class Limited Partner (as defined below) as of such termination date.
Neither the Waypoint Investment Manager nor any of its affiliates are responsible for the offering of Interests in the Fund described herein.
In exchange for serving as an Investment Manager, the Waypoint Investment Manager shall be entitled to a portion of the Management Fees with respect to Non-Advisory Class Limited Partners.  (See “Management Fees” below). Further, as discussed in “Fund Distributions; Carried Interest” below, the Waypoint Investment Manager will also receive a portion of the Carried Interest Distributions made in connection with Non-Advisory Limited Partners. 
CAPITAL STRUCTURE	The Fund may issue one or more classes, sub-classes, or tranches of Interests (each, a “Class”) to Limited Partners. The General Partner may, but will not be obligated to, cause the Fund to establish and issue a Class of Interests that corresponds to each class, sub-class, or tranche of underlying interests of each Underlying Fund invested in by the Fund.
Particular Classes of Interests may be offered by the Fund pursuant to one or more supplements to this Memorandum setting forth the terms of such offering to the extent different from those described in this Memorandum. Prospective investors in the Fund will be provided with copies of such supplements relating to the Classes in which they invest.
The Fund may establish one or more Classes of Interests that are subject to different terms (including, without limitation, different investment strategies, underlying investments, permissible leverage, Management Fees, brokerage commissions, distribution rights, and co-investment opportunities) at any time. Interests of each Class will rank pari passu with one another in all respects, unless otherwise specified. The issuance of such additional Classes of Interests will not require the consent of any Limited Partner.
The Fund currently offers two Classes of Interests: (a) the “Advisory Class”, which is generally only open to Eligible Investors who are existing advisory clients of the Waypoint Investment Manager without regard to any such relationship by way of the Fund; and (b) the “Non-Advisory Class”, which is open to all other Eligible Investors, certain of which may be introduced to the Fund by the General Partner and its affiliates.  Each of the Advisory Class and the Non-Advisory Class will rank pari passu with one another in all respects, except as otherwise discussed herein and in the Partnership Agreement.  Limited Partners holding Interests in the Advisory Class shall be referred to herein as “Advisory Class Limited Partners” and Limited Partners holding Interests in the Non-Advisory Class shall be referred to herein as “Non-Advisory Class Limited Partners.” 
In addition, the Fund has issued to the Warehouse the “Warehouse Class” of Interest, of which the Warehouse shall be the sole holder and which represents (and to the extent the Warehouse has unreturned Capital Contributions and an uncancelled Capital Commitment, will continue to represent) the Warehouse’s Interest in the Fund.  (See “Warehouse Withdrawal” and “Warehouse Equalization” below).
Notwithstanding the foregoing, the General Partner, in its sole discretion, may close any Class of Interests to new investment at any time. 
MINIMUM SUBSCRIPTION	Each Limited Partner generally will be required to agree to make a commitment to make Capital Contributions to the Fund in respect of such Limited Partner’s subscription for an Interest (a “Capital Commitment”) of at least $250,000; provided, that the General Partner may, in its sole discretion, admit an investor to the Fund whose Capital Commitment is less than $250,000.
The General Partner, in its sole discretion, may, for capacity or other reasons, limit the number of Limited Partners whose minimum subscription amount is $250,000, and require, as determined by the General Partner in its sole discretion, that other Limited Partners’ minimum subscription amount be greater than $250,000.
The General Partner reserves the right to limit the size of any Limited Partner’s ownership interest in the Fund, in a Class of Interest, or indirect interest in one or more Underlying Funds in excess of a specified amount or percentage (including to comply with applicable law) and to take any actions that it deems reasonable and appropriate under the circumstances to maintain the ownership interest of such Limited Partner below the relevant amount or percentage and to make such adjustment as it deems appropriate to reflect the operation of the foregoing.
RESERVE COMMITMENT	Each Limited Partner may, as determined by the General Partner in its sole discretion, be required to make additional Capital Contributions, up to a maximum aggregate amount equal to twenty percent (20%) of the amount of the Capital Commitment originally subscribed for by such Limited Partner (the “Reserve Commitment”), at any time during the term of the Fund and for any reason, including, without limitation, (i) to answer capital calls received by the Fund from any Underlying Fund, (ii) to pay or establish reserves for Fund Expenses, or (iii) to cover any shortfalls arising from the Default (as defined below) of, or the excuse or exclusion from funding of, one or more Limited Partners or the compulsory withdrawal of a Limited Partner’s Interest. 
References to a Limited Partner’s Capital Commitment will, unless otherwise specified, also refer to such Limited Partner’s Reserve Commitment as the context requires.
FUND CLOSINGS	The General Partner expects that there will be an initial closing (the “Initial Closing” on the “Initial Closing Date”) for the issuance of Interests to Limited Partners (other than the Warehouse) as soon as practicable on such date determined by the General Partner in its sole discretion. The General Partner may, in its sole discretion, schedule one or more subsequent closings (each, a “Subsequent Closing” on a “Subsequent Closing Date,” and the Subsequent Closing Dates, together with the Initial Closing Date, the “Closing Dates” and each, a “Closing Date”) to admit additional Eligible Investors into the Fund or allow existing Limited Partners to increase their Capital Commitments (and Reserve Commitments) at any time during the Commitment Period. The “Commitment Period” shall be the period beginning on the Initial Closing Date and ending on December 31, 2024 (the last Subsequent Closing Date, the “Final Closing Date”). If a Limited Partner makes an additional or follow-on Capital Commitment at any Subsequent Closing, such Limited Partner shall be required to, and shall be deemed to have made, an additional Reserve Commitment equal to twenty percent (20%) of such additional or follow-on Capital Commitment.
Eligible Investors may receive a supplement to this Memorandum before the applicable Closing Date detailing additional terms that will be applicable to Limited Partners that are admitted to the Fund at such Closing Date. 
The General Partner may admit additional Eligible Investors into the Fund or allow existing Limited Partners to increase their Capital Commitments (and Reserve Commitments) in one or more Subsequent Closings until the expiration of the Commitment Period. Closings Dates of the Fund are expected to (but may not, in the General Partner’s sole discretion) coincide with closings of one or more Underlying Funds.
On the Initial Closing Date and any Subsequent Closing Date, each Eligible Investor being admitted to the Fund or increasing its Capital Commitment and Reserve Commitment, as applicable, on or around the relevant Closing Date may be required to fund all or a portion of its Capital Commitment, Reserve Commitment, any allocable share of Overdraw Contributions (as defined below), and/or Cash-Out Contributions (as defined below). (See “Subsequent Closing Contributions and Payments”, “Warehouse Withdrawal” and “Warehouse Equalization” below). 
Each Limited Partner will be solely responsible for all of its own legal, tax and other counsels’ expenses and any out-of-pocket expenses incurred in connection with such Limited Partner’s subscription for or the maintenance of its Interest in the Fund.
SUBSEQUENT CLOSING CONTRIBUTIONS AND PAYMENTS	Each Limited Partner acquiring an Interest or increasing its Capital Commitment at any Subsequent Closing Date occurring prior to the Warehouse Withdrawal, will be required to make a Cash-Out Contribution as described in “Warehouse Withdrawal” below. 
In addition, each Limited Partner acquiring an Interest or increasing its Capital Commitment on any Subsequent Closing Date occurring after the Warehouse Withdrawal occurs will pay an amount to the Fund on such Closing Date equal to the sum of: (i) that portion of such Limited Partner’s entire Capital Commitment and Reserve Commitment that it would have been required to contribute had the entire Capital Commitment and Reserve Commitment been made at the Initial Closing (including any Overdraw Contributions that would have been required to be contributed), plus (ii) an amount (which will not be treated as a Capital Commitment, Reserve Commitment or Capital Contribution, and which will not be treated as a credit against or reduce the Capital Commitment or Reserve Commitment obligation of such Limited Partner) equal to the amount of interest that would accrue on the amount contributed pursuant to clause (i) computed from the date such Capital Commitments and Reserve Commitments were previously drawn down with respect to Limited Partners other than the Warehouse to the date of such Subsequent Closing at an annual rate equal to eight percent (8%) (or, in the General Partner’s discretion, such higher rate of catchup interest which may be specified in the relevant Underlying Fund Documents), assuming, for both of these purposes, that such Limited Partner’s entire Capital Commitment had been made at the Initial Closing Date (“Catch-Up Interest Payments”). Any such interest accrued on Capital Contributions with respect to Management Fees (as defined below) may be waived by the General Partner in its sole discretion.  
Unless the General Partner determines that the amount paid by each additional Limited Partner pursuant to the immediately preceding paragraph (other than amounts attributable to the Management Fee and interest thereon, and capital returned to the Warehouse as described below) will be retained by the Fund for the payment of (or to fund reserves for) Fund Expenses or to make capital contributions to the Underlying Funds or Liquid Investments, the General Partner will, in its sole discretion, return such amount to the previously admitted Limited Partners in proportion to their respective Fund Percentage Interests (as defined below), or to the Investment Manager in respect of the Management Fee, as applicable, and, other than Catch-Up Interest Payments, add back such amount to such Limited Partner’s Unfunded Commitment which will be subject to redraw by the Fund, and any amounts returned to such previously admitted Limited Partners or the General Partner will not be treated as a distribution.
The General Partner may, in its sole discretion, interpret and apply the provisions in the Partnership Agreement relating to Subsequent Closings in such manner as the General Partner deems necessary or appropriate to achieve a fair and equitable result for the Limited Partners in light of the intended economic arrangement, including by making adjustments to the Capital Accounts, all of which will be binding on all the Limited Partners.
WAREHOUSE WITHDRAWAL	Upon the admission of each Limited Partner admitted or increasing its Capital Commitment to the Fund on a Closing Date occurring prior to the Warehouse Withdrawal:
(i)	Such Limited Partner will make a Capital Contribution (a “Cash-Out Contribution”) in an amount equal to the product of (a) the quotient obtained by dividing such Limited Partner’s Capital Commitment by the uncancelled portion of the Warehouse’s Capital Commitment as of such date and (b) the unreturned Capital Contributions of the Warehouse; and
(ii)	Such Limited Partner’s undrawn Capital Commitment (after accounting for the Cash-Out Contribution) will cancel, on a dollar-for-dollar basis, the Warehouse’s remaining undrawn Capital Commitment.
In addition, to the extent such Limited Partner’s Cash-Out Contribution and Capital Commitment made on a Closing Date result in the Warehouse Withdrawal (i.e., a return of all the Warehouse’s Capital Contributions and the cancellation of its entire remaining Capital Commitment) as of such Closing Date, then the General Partner may further draw down on the Capital Commitments of, and/or make distributions to, the Limited Partners in such amounts as may be necessary to ensure that the unreturned Capital Contributions and uncalled Capital Commitment of each Limited Partner is, as a percentage of the unreturned Capital Contributions and uncalled Capital Commitments of all the Limited Partners, equal to the Fund Percentage Interests of the Limited Partners that would have resulted if the Warehouse had not been admitted as a Limited Partner of the Fund. 
Each Cash-Out Contribution made by a Limited Partner to the Fund will be further distributed by the Fund to the Warehouse as a returned Capital Contribution but will not thereby increase the Warehouse’s Capital Commitment. The Cash-Out Contribution and Warehouse Capital Commitment cancellation provisions described above will dilute the Warehouse’s Interest in the Fund at each Subsequent Closing. If the Warehouse receives a return of its aggregate Capital Contributions and its Capital Commitment is fully cancelled, the Warehouse will be deemed to be withdrawn as a Limited Partner from the Fund and have no further rights, duties or responsibilities as a Limited Partner (the “Warehouse Withdrawal”). 
Limited Partners admitted prior to the Warehouse Withdrawal will not be required to make Catch-Up Interest Payments with respect to such Limited Partner’s Cash-Out Contribution; provided, however, that, in lieu thereof, each such Limited Partner will be required to contribute such additional amounts as are necessary in the discretion of the General Partner to make the Warehouse whole on any commensurate tax obligations actually paid by Lonsdale Investment Technologies, Inc. (in its capacity as the sole member of the Warehouse) for which the Warehouse did not receive a corresponding distribution, in each case corresponding to the relevant portion of the Warehouse’s Interest being acquired by such Limited Partner.  
The General Partner may, in its sole and absolute discretion, make any adjustments to the drawdown, Capital Contribution and Capital Commitment provisions of the Partnership Agreement that it deems fair or equitable to ensure that each new Limited Partner admitted (or increasing its Capital Commitment) at a Closing Date as described above assumes such Limited Partner’s pro rata share of the Warehouse’s uncancelled Capital Commitment and makes its Cash-Out Contribution and any other Capital Contribution and Catch-Up Interest Payment required as described in “Subsequent Closing Contributions and Payments” above. The General Partner will make appropriate adjustments among the Capital Accounts of the Limited Partners to give effect to any such adjustments, which will be binding on all the Limited Partners. 
Until the earlier of the Warehouse Withdrawal and the expiration of the Commitment Period (or such earlier date mutually agreed to by the Investment Managers), the Warehouse will not be required to answer any drawdowns of its Capital Commitment but will continue to be a Limited Partner of the Fund (as the sole holder of the Warehouse Class) with respect to only the uncancelled portion of its Capital Commitment and unreturned Capital Contributions. 
WAREHOUSE EQUALIZATION	If the Warehouse Withdrawal occurs prior to the expiration of the Commitment Period, the Warehouse will be deemed to be fully withdrawn from, and no longer a Limited Partner of, the Fund and will have no further rights, duties or responsibilities with respect to any portion of its cancelled Capital Commitment or its returned Capital Contributions. 
If the Warehouse Withdrawal has not occurred prior to the expiration of the Commitment Period (or such earlier date as mutually agreed to by the Investment Managers), the General Partner will draw down on the Capital Commitments of, and/or make distributions to, the Limited Partners in such amounts as may be necessary to ensure that the unreturned Capital Contributions and uncalled Capital Commitment of each Limited Partner is, as a percentage of the unreturned Capital Contributions and uncalled Capital Commitments of all the Limited Partners, equal to the Fund Percentage Interests of the Limited Partners that would have resulted if the uncancelled Capital Commitment of the Warehouse as of the expiration of the Commitment Period (or such earlier date as mutually agreed to by the Investment Managers) were made as of the Initial Closing Date and drawn down on ratably thereafter with the Capital Commitments of the other Limited Partners (such equalization, the “Warehouse Equalization”). The General Partner may, in its sole discretion, interpret and apply the Warehouse Equalization provisions in the Partnership Agreement in such manner as the General Partner deems necessary or appropriate to achieve a fair and equitable result for the Limited Partners, including by making adjustments to the Capital Accounts, all of which will be binding on all the Limited Partners. For purposes of clarity, no drawdown of the Capital Commitment of the Warehouse in connection with the Warehouse Equalization will be subject to Catch-Up Interest Payments.
After the Warehouse Equalization and until the end of the Investment Period, the Opto Investment Manager will have consent rights over the Fund’s investment of Capital Contributions of the Warehouse and the other Limited Partners in any new or follow-on any Underlying Fund. Further, after the Warehouse Equalization, the Warehouse will continue to be a Limited Partner of the Fund, pari passu with the other Limited Partners, and the Warehouse’s undrawn Capital Commitment will be drawn down ratably with the other Limited Partners’ Capital Commitments for purposes permitted under the Partnership Agreement.
INVESTMENT PERIOD	The Fund’s investment period will commence on the Initial Closing Date and continue until the earliest to occur of (i) the date on which all Capital Commitments (including the Reserve Commitments) have been drawn and/or committed or allocated to specific investments or earmarked for the payment of Organizational and Offering Expenses and Operating Expenses or to fund reserves, (ii) the eighteen (18) month anniversary of the Final Closing Date, or (iii) the termination of the Waypoint Co-Investment Management Agreement (the “Investment Period”).
The Fund will be permitted to make new or follow-on capital commitments to Underlying Funds only during the Investment Period.
FUNDING OF SUBSCRIPTIONS	On each Closing Date, each Limited Partner being admitted thereat shall be required to fund all or part of the amounts set forth in “Fund Closings” above.  Thereafter, during the Investment Period each Limited Partner shall be liable to contribute (each, a “Capital Contribution”) to the Fund, on a pro rata basis according to its Fund Percentage Interest, such amounts determined by the General Partner including, without limitation, to (i) enable the Fund to fund capital calls made by the Underlying Funds (including, without limitation, to fund the Fund’s share of any fees or expenses of the Underlying Funds), and (ii) pay Fund Expenses (including any reserves therefor), as notified to such Limited Partner (each such notification, a “Capital Call”) at least five (5) Business Days (where “Business Day” means any day other than a Saturday, a Sunday or a legal holiday in the State of New York) prior to the date such funding is required (each such date, a “Capital Demand Date”), except as otherwise provided in the Partnership Agreement or as a shorter period may be necessary, as determined by the General Partner in good faith, for the Fund to satisfy a capital call from any Underlying Fund.  
Subject to adjustment as provided in the Partnership Agreement, each Limited Partner’s “Unfunded Commitment” will be equal to the positive difference, if any, between (i) the sum of the aggregate amount of such Limited Partner’s Capital Commitment and Reserve Commitment, minus (ii) the aggregate amounts previously funded by such Limited Partner in respect of Capital Calls previously issued to such Limited Partner (other than in respect of Catch-Up Interest Payments, Overdraw Contributions, and returned Capital Contributions), plus (iii) if required by the General Partner in its discretion, an amount equal to all distributions made by the Fund to such Limited Partner solely for the purposes of (x) meeting any obligation or liability incurred by the Fund (including, without limitation, any obligation of the Fund to make repayment of principal or interest under any Facility or to return to any Underlying Fund any distributions made to the Fund in accordance with the applicable Underlying Fund Agreement (including, without limitation, to satisfy any reinvestment, giveback or other return of capital obligation thereunder) or satisfy any tax liability or any obligation to provide indemnification to any person), and (y) maintaining the Fund’s reserves. Except as otherwise noted, references herein to a Limited Partner’s Unfunded Commitment will include such Limited Partner’s unfunded Reserve Commitment.
Following the expiration of the Investment Period, a Limited Partner’s Unfunded Commitment will remain subject to drawdown at any time by the Fund (i) to fund capital calls made by any Underlying Fund for any reason permitted under its Underlying Fund Agreement, (ii) to satisfy Fund Expenses (including, without limitation, to pay Management Fees, to fund any withholding or other tax liability, and to comply with any of the Fund’s obligations to provide indemnification to any person), (iii) to make Liquid Investments, and (iv) for any other purpose permitted in accordance with the Partnership Agreement. For purposes of clarity, if there has not been a Warehouse Withdrawal by the end of the Commitment Period (or such earlier date mutually agreed to by the Investment Managers), the Warehouse will be treated pari passu with other Limited Partners, including, without limitation, being subject to drawn downs for any of the above listed post-Investment Period purposes. Further, the General Partner may issue Capital Calls for post-Investment Period uses cited above without the consent of the Investment Managers.
Further, in addition to answering Capital Calls for its Unfunded Commitment, each Limited Partner will be obligated to answer Capital Calls for any Overdraw Contributions, as more fully described in “Overdraw Contributions” below.
The failure of a Limited Partner to fund capital in a timely manner in accordance with a Capital Call may subject such Limited Partner to Default, resulting in serious Default consequences, including, among other things, forfeiture and/or compulsory sale of its Interests at a price determined by the General Partner in its sole discretion. (See “Failure to Fund; Default; Shortfalls” below). 
FUND PERCENTAGE INTEREST	Each Limited Partner’s “Fund Percentage Interest” will be in an amount, expressed as a percentage, equal to such Limited Partner’s Capital Commitment divided by the aggregate Capital Commitments of all Limited Partners, adjusted, if necessary, if any Limited Partner has been subject to compulsory redemption from the Fund or becomes a Defaulting Limited Partner (as defined below), or whose Interest is otherwise excluded from such calculation, pursuant to the terms of the Partnership Agreement or this Memorandum.
PARALLEL OR FEEDER FUNDS	In order to facilitate investments by other investors, to accommodate any special legal, tax, regulatory or other needs, the General Partner may establish at its sole discretion parallel investment entities and/or feeder funds (collectively, “Parallel or Feeder Funds”) that will invest on similar terms and conditions as the Fund, subject to applicable legal, tax, regulatory or similar considerations. Parallel or Feeder Funds may be established at any time but are expected to be dissolved at or about the same time as the Fund. The General Partner or any Parallel or Feeder Fund may establish, and the term Parallel or Feeder Funds shall include, any entities (including entities taxed as C corporations) the General Partner determines are necessary to accommodate any special legal, tax, regulatory or other needs with respect to such Parallel or Feeder Funds.  Prospective investors should consult their own tax advisors regarding the potential for UBTI and ECI/CAI (each as defined below) before determining whether an investment in any Parallel or Feeder Fund, or in the Fund directly, is appropriate based on their specific circumstances. Such prospective investors should also consult with their tax advisors concerning any additional measures to mitigate UBTI or ECI/CAI, such as establishing their own investment vehicles (including their own blockers, if applicable). For the avoidance of doubt, none of the Fund, the General Partner, the Investment Managers or any of their respective affiliates is obligated to establish any such Parallel or Feeder Funds or otherwise limit the potential incurrence of UBTI or ECI/CAI.
OVERDRAW CONTRIBUTIONS	To the extent any Underlying Fund may call capital from the Fund without reducing the Fund’s unfunded capital commitment to such Underlying Fund pursuant to the applicable Underlying Fund Documents, the Fund will be permitted to make corresponding Capital Calls on the Limited Partners for Capital Contributions that will not reduce their respective Unfunded Commitments (the “Overdraw Contributions”) to satisfy such underlying capital calls, and the Limited Partners will be obligated to answer Capital Calls for Overdraw Contributions as provided under the Partnership Agreement. 
For purposes of clarity, in any case where the Fund is required to make capital contributions or other payments to, or otherwise in connection with its capital commitments to or investments in, any Underlying Fund that are outside or in excess of the Fund’s capital commitments to such Underlying Fund, the Limited Partners likewise will be required make corresponding Overdraw Contributions to the Fund in order to fund such underlying capital contributions or other payments. 
The General Partner may, in its good faith discretion and from time to time, determine which items, if any, for which capital is called by an Underlying Fund are in addition to, and will not reduce, the Fund’s capital commitments to such Underlying Fund, and such determination will bind the Limited Partners in respect of their obligation to make corresponding Overdraw Contributions pursuant to Capital Calls issued by the Fund.
Unless otherwise indicated in the Partnership Agreement, references to Capital Contributions will include Overdraw Contributions.
FAILURE TO FUND; DEFAULT; SHORTFALLS	If a Limited Partner fails to fully fund any amount specified in a particular Capital Call (the “Funding Amount”) when due or fails to perform or observe any term, covenant, condition, representation or warranty set forth in the Partnership Agreement or such Limited Partner’s Subscription Booklet (any such failure, a “Default”), a notice of Default shall be given to such Limited Partner (the “Defaulting Limited Partner”) by the General Partner.  With respect to a funding Default, if the Funding Amount is not received by the Fund within three (3) Business Days after the receipt of such notice of Default, in the General Partner’s sole discretion, such amount may bear interest payable to the Fund at the lesser of (i) the highest rate of interest permitted under applicable law or (ii) the per annum rate of interest as reported by the Wall Street Journal, from time to time, as the “prime rate” plus ten percent (10%) (any such interest charged, the “Default Interest”), from and after the Capital Demand Date relating to such Funding Amount until the earliest of (x) the payment of such Funding Amount, including any Default Interest, (y) the purchase or withdrawal of such Defaulting Limited Partner’s Interests (as described below), or (z) the conclusion of collection proceedings against such Defaulting Limited Partner.  Any Default Interest paid by a Defaulting Limited Partner shall not be applied to reduce such Defaulting Limited Partner’s obligations with respect to the Funding Amount payable in respect of a Capital Call by such Defaulting Limited Partner but shall be allocated among all Limited Partners that are not Defaulting Limited Partners pro rata in accordance with the Capital Contributions previously made by such other Limited Partners with respect to such Capital Call pursuant to the Partnership Agreement.
In addition, the General Partner will have the right, in its sole discretion, to pursue all remedies at law or in equity available to it with respect to the Default of a Defaulting Limited Partner, including but not limited to:  
(i)	causing the Defaulting Limited Partner to forfeit all or part of its Interests for no consideration (the “Defaulted Interests”); 
(ii)	permitting the admission to the Fund of the Warehouse and causing the Defaulting Limited Partner’s Defaulted Interests to be assumed by the Warehouse on such terms and conditions as determined by the General Partner in its sole discretion, which may include no consideration to the Defaulting Limited Partner with respect to such Defaulted Interests; 
(iii)	causing the Defaulting Limited Partner to sell all or any part of its Interests to another Limited Partner or any other person (including, without limitation, subject to applicable law, any of the Investment Managers, the General Partner, the Fund, the Warehouse, or any member, partner, shareholder, manager, director, officer, employee, agent or affiliate of any of them (each, an “Investment Manager Affiliate” and, collectively, the “Investment Manager Affiliates”)) immediately upon written notice at the Default Price (as defined below) for such Defaulted Interests; 
(iv)	compulsorily redeeming the Defaulting Limited Partner’s Defaulted Interests at a price determined, in its sole discretion, by the General Partner; 
(v)	requiring the Defaulting Limited Partner to immediately pay to the Fund up to the full amount of such Defaulting Limited Partner’s Unfunded Commitment, together with any Default Interest payable by such Defaulting Limited Partner (the payment of the Unfunded Commitment will be held by the Fund as security for, and will be applied against, the obligation of the Defaulting Limited Partner to fund additional amounts when required, and the payment of the Default Interest, may be used for any purpose deemed advisable by the General Partner in its sole discretion);
(vi)	to the extent permitted by applicable law, debiting up to the full amount of the Defaulting Limited Partner’s Unfunded Commitment from any account maintained by the Defaulting Limited Partner at any Investment Manager Affiliate (the payment of the Unfunded Commitment will be held by the Fund as security for, and will be applied against, the obligation of the Defaulting Limited Partner to fund additional amounts when required, and the payment of Default Interest, may be used for any purpose deemed advisable by the General Partner in its sole discretion); 
(vii)	causing the Fund to borrow money or otherwise incur indebtedness from any source (including, to the extent permitted by applicable law, from an Investment Manager Affiliate) in order to pay the defaulted Funding Amount and, at the election of the General Partner, in its sole discretion, (A) any such borrowing may be a separate obligation of the Defaulting Limited Partner and not of the Fund and may be secured by the obligation of the Defaulting Limited Partner to pay its Unfunded Commitment and the Defaulting Limited Partner’s Interests, and (B) any interest or other costs or expenses related to such indebtedness may be charged solely to the Defaulting Limited Partner; 
(viii)	requiring the Defaulting Limited Partner to pay all costs and expenses (including attorneys’ fees and collection costs) incurred by or on behalf of the General Partner and its respective affiliates or the Fund in connection with the Defaulting Limited Partner’s Default and the exercise of any of the remedies described herein; 
(ix)	offsetting any amounts payable by the Defaulting Limited Partner against any Fund Distributions (as defined below) payable to the Defaulting Limited Partner; 
(x)	causing the reduction of such Defaulting Limited Partner’s Capital Account (as defined below) by up to the aggregate amount of capital funded by such Limited Partner pursuant to Capital Calls made on or prior to the date that such Limited Partner became a Defaulting Limited Partner, and the amount of such reduction shall be credited to the Capital Accounts of non-Defaulting Limited Partners or such third parties designated by the General Partner; 
(xi)	causing the Defaulting Limited Partner to forfeit any realized or unrealized gains or profits relating to the Defaulting Limited Partner’s Interest; 
(xii)	causing the Defaulting Limited Partner to share in the net losses of the Fund, if any, to the extent of its Capital Account, but not in any of its net profits; 
(xiii)	commencing legal proceedings to compel the Defaulting Limited Partner to make the Funding Amount and any Default Interest; and/or
(xiv)	cooperating with the respective Underlying Fund Manager in any effort to exercise directly against the Defaulting Limited Partner any of the rights and remedies that may be exercised by such Underlying Fund Manager against a defaulting Underlying Fund limited partner as if such Defaulting Limited Partner was a defaulting Underlying Fund limited partner.
“Default Price” means an amount equal to ten percent (10%) of the lesser of (i) the positive balance, if any, of a Defaulting Limited Partner’s Capital Account; and (ii) the fair value of the Interests held by such Defaulting Limited Partner, as determined by the General Partner in its sole discretion, net of any Default Interest and other expenses, liabilities, costs, damages or losses incurred by any Investment Manager Affiliate or any Limited Partner in respect of such Defaulting Limited Partner’s Default, as determined by the General Partner.
If one or more Limited Partner commits a Default, it is intended that the General Partner will attempt to remedy any potential default of the Fund as a limited partner (or similar equity holder) of the Underlying Funds by conferring with the relevant Underlying Fund Managers and applying the default remedies available to the Underlying Fund Managers under the Underlying Fund Documents separately to such Defaulting Limited Partner (which may be in addition to any other remedies available to the General Partner under the Partnership Agreement). 
A Default by any Limited Partner may result in the default of the Fund vis-à-vis the Underlying Funds and subject the Fund (and all the Limited Partners) to the remedies which may result in adverse consequences to the Limited Partners.
ACCELERATED DRAWDOWNS FOR CERTAIN LIMITED PARTNERS	The General Partner may, in its sole discretion, request or require that certain Limited Partners (including, for example and without limitation, any Limited Partner previously declared a Defaulting Limited Partner or any Limited Partner with less than $250,000 in Capital Commitments) contribute up to 100% of such Limited Partner’s Unfunded Commitment to the Fund at the Initial Closing or on such other date(s) as determined by the General Partner in its discretion (in each case, a “Pre-Funding Limited Partner”). The excess of the amount of capital that a Pre-Funding Limited Partner has contributed to the Fund at any point in time over the amount that such Limited Partner would have been required to contribute to the Fund at such point in time had such Limited Partner’s Capital Commitment (including its Reserve Commitment) been drawn down other than pursuant to an accelerated drawdown, is hereinafter referred to as such Limited Partner’s “Excess Contribution.” 
Any Excess Contributions called by the General Partner will be set aside by the General Partner in reserve or, at the election of the General Partner, deposited with an escrow agent selected by the General Partner; will not accrue interest; and will not constitute a Capital Contribution or reduce any Pre-Funding Limited Partner’s Unfunded Commitment until, and only to the extent that, any Capital Contributions are required to be made by the applicable Pre-Funding Limited Partner pursuant to Capital Calls issued other than in connection with an accelerated drawdown.
LIQUID INVESTMENTS	Where the Fund draws down Capital Commitments and does not invest the relevant Capital Contributions in the Underlying Funds, or has received Underlying Fund Distributions (as defined below) that are not distributed to the Limited Partners, all such cash amounts not used to satisfy expenses may be used to establish reserves and invested in cash or cash equivalents, money market funds and short-term obligations of the U.S. government, its agencies and instrumentalities, or in any public or private pooled investment vehicle, whether or not such vehicle is registered under the Investment Company Act (“Liquid Investments”), for cash-management and other purposes, and are not expected to earn a substantial return.
CREDIT AND DEBT FACILITY	The General Partner may arrange for one or more credit or debt facilities for the Fund (or its subsidiaries) with third-party lenders or with the Warehouse (each, a “Facility”) to pay expenses and fees, make deposits and acquire assets through borrowings in lieu of, in advance of, or contemporaneously with, capital contributions. The Fund and/or any Parallel or Feeder Funds or other investment vehicles may be a borrower and/or guarantor with respect to the Facility. The Facility may be secured by, among other things, a pledge or assignment of the Unfunded Commitments of the Limited Partners, the deposit account into which the Limited Partners fund their Capital Contributions, any revenue streams of the Fund or any other assets as determined by the General Partner.  Limited Partners will be required to cooperate with the General Partner in securing the Facility, which may include among other things, providing the banks with financial information and other documentation reasonably and customarily required to obtain such facilities, and/or executing acknowledgements or other similar documents, as may reasonably be requested by the lenders. If the Warehouse provides a Facility to the Fund, it will be on arms’-length terms and conditions and the interest payable under such Facility will be at or below prevailing market rates.
COMPULSORY SALE OR REDEMPTION OF INTERESTS	The General Partner may, in its sole discretion, cause the redemption or sale of, in whole or in part, a Limited Partner’s Interest, or cause the withdrawal of a Limited Partner from the Fund, or take any other action which the General Partner has determined, in its sole discretion, exercised in good faith, to be necessary or desirable, if, at any time, the General Partner determines in its sole discretion that (i) the participation of such Limited Partner has caused, or that the continued participation of such Limited Partner may cause, the Fund, any Investment Manager Affiliate, any Underlying Fund, any Underlying Fund Manager or any of their respective affiliates, or any Portfolio Investment or potential Portfolio Investment to violate any law, rule or regulation, or has resulted or may result in the Fund, any Investment Manager Affiliate, any Underlying Fund, any Underlying Fund Manager or any of their respective affiliates, or any Portfolio Investment or potential Portfolio Investment to suffer material taxation, economic disadvantages or other materially adverse consequences, which they might not have suffered had such Limited Partner ceased to be a Limited Partner, in each case as determined by the General Partner in its absolute discretion exercised in good faith; (ii) any representation made by such Limited Partner in such Limited Partner’s Subscription Booklet, the Partnership Agreement, or any other agreements or documents executed by such Limited Partner in connection with the Fund was not true and accurate in all material respects when made or deemed made or all documents required to be delivered by, or consents or approvals required of, such Limited Partner under any such documents have not been so delivered or obtained; (iii) the interests in the Fund were acquired or are being held, directly or indirectly, by or for the account or benefit of any person in violation of the provisions of the Partnership Agreement or such Limited Partner’s Subscription Booklet, including, without limitation, for any person who is not an Eligible Investor or for any person who is subject to any U.S. sanctions related to or administered by the Office of Foreign Assets Control of the U.S. Department of the Treasury or any other trade, economic or other sanctions imposed by the United Nations or any other applicable governmental or regulatory authority; (iv) the Limited Partner is subject, or there is a reasonable likelihood that such Limited Partner will be subject to Title I of ERISA or Section 4975 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (the “Code”) or that the Limited Partner is or will be considered a person or entity that holds the assets of a Restricted Governmental Plan; (v) the holding of Interests by such Limited Partner will, or is likely to, cause the Fund to be treated as a “publicly traded partnership” under U.S. federal income tax laws or result in other adverse tax consequences; (vi) the holding of Interests by such Limited Partner will, or is likely to, cause any of the Fund, the General Partner, any Underlying Fund Manager or any of their respective affiliates to be required to register its Interests or other equity interests under the laws of any jurisdiction; (vii) the holding of Interests by such Limited Partner may cause any of the Fund, the General Partner, any Underlying Fund Manager or any of their respective affiliates to suffer any other regulatory or legal event which would, in the absolute discretion of the General Partner, frustrate or be likely to frustrate the establishment or purpose of any of the Fund, the General Partner, any Underlying Fund Manager or any of their respective affiliates; (viii) the holding of Interests by such Limited Partner has caused or may cause any Underlying Fund Manager to apply the mandatory withdrawal provisions with respect to the Fund, (ix) a Limited Partner engages in illegal conduct or gross misconduct which the General Partner determines could result in reputational harm to the Fund or any Investment Manager Affiliate, which the Fund or any Investment Manager Affiliate might not have suffered had such affected Limited Partner ceased to be a Limited Partner; or (x) such other circumstances have occurred or are likely to occur such that continued ownership of Interests by such Limited Partner would be prejudicial to the interests of any of the Fund, the General Partner, any Underlying Fund Manager or any of their respective affiliates, as determined in the absolute discretion of the General Partner. 
Any Limited Partner excluded from the Fund as described above may receive in full satisfaction of its Interest, an amount equal to the balance of its Capital Account (after all appropriate adjustments thereto, including deductions necessary to reflect any expenses, liabilities, costs, damages or losses incurred by any Investment Manager Affiliate and/or any Limited Partner as a result of such exclusion, as determined by General Partner in its sole discretion) as of the effective date of withdrawal, which amount will be paid by the Fund at the earliest time that the making of such payment would not be materially adverse to the interests of the Fund and other Limited Partners, as determined in good faith by the General Partner.
ORGANIZATIONAL AND OFFERING EXPENSES	The Fund, and thus the Limited Partners indirectly, will bear the Fund’s allocable share, as determined by the General Partner in its sole discretion, of all expenses incurred in connection with the formation of, and the offering of interests in, the Fund, any Parallel or Feeder Funds or other investment vehicles that may be established by the General Partner, including, without limitation all legal fees and expenses, the cost of producing and distributing offering memoranda, including this Memorandum, any related marketing materials, printing and mailing costs, filing fees and expenses, marketing and roadshow expenses and any other expenses related to the foregoing, and any costs and expenses of negotiating any documentation associated with the Fund, including, without limitation, any engagement agreements, side letters or other framework agreements relating to, the Fund (e.g., any engagement or anti-money laundering agreements governing the organization, offering or operation of the Fund) with the Underlying Fund Managers, the Waypoint Investment Manager, and any other referring investment adviser, broker or other parties whose clients may invest in the Fund (it being understood that the Fund is expected to provide usual and customary indemnities to the counterparties thereunder), and, if agreed by the General Partner, the cost of the legal fees and expenses incurred by such referring party, as well as such costs incurred by the General Partner or any of its affiliates, in connection with such negotiation and documentation, and all expenses associated with the General Partner’s or the Investment Managers’ negotiating, securing and documenting any Fund investment opportunity in and capital commitment to the Underlying Funds and the making of the Warehouse’s Capital Commitment to the Fund or a capital commitment to any Underlying Fund or assigning such commitment to the Fund (such allocable share, the “Organizational and Offering Expenses”).
The General Partner may, in its sole discretion, allocate or reallocate, or charge or reimburse, to the Fund certain organizational and offering expenses associated with one or more other fund vehicles with similar offering and governing documentation as the Fund established by the General Partner, the Warehouse and/or their affiliates, or allocate or reallocate, or charge or reimburse, any portion of the Organizational and Offering Expenses to or among the Fund and any such other vehicles, in any manner the General Partner may determine to be fair or equitable, taking into account, among other factors considered relevant in the General Partner’s discretion, the shared benefits derived by the Fund and such other vehicles from certain start-up costs and documentation utilized in common.
The General Partner may in its discretion cause the Fund to amortize certain of its Organizational and Offering Expenses over the 60-month period following the Initial Closing. The General Partner anticipates that Organizational and Offering Expenses will not exceed $250,000; provided, that, the General Partner does not make any guarantees as to the total Organizational and Offering Expenses.
Each Limited Partner will be solely responsible for all of its own legal, tax and other counsels’ expenses and any out-of-pocket expenses incurred in connection with such Limited Partner’s subscription for Interests to, or the maintenance of its Interests in, the Fund.
OPERATING EXPENSES	Subject to the Administrative Expense Cap (as defined below), if applicable, the Fund, and thus the Limited Partners, will also be responsible for all operating expenses of the Fund (the “Operating Expenses”).  Operating Expenses of the Fund borne by Limited Partners may be limited by the Administrative Expense Cap (as defined below) in certain circumstances. Operating Expenses of the Fund include, without limitation:
(i)	its own operational expenses, including, without limitation, administration, accounting, audit, reporting and tax preparation fees and expenses, and compliance expenses (including the fees and expenses of any Investment Manager Affiliate performing such functions in lieu of third-party service providers); principal, interest on and fees and expenses arising out of borrowings made by the Fund (including, without limitation, any costs related to arranging, establishing and maintaining any Facility); computer software, licensing, programming, and operating expenses; data processing costs; legal, regulatory and compliance fees and expenses (including the fees and expenses of any Investment Manager Affiliates performing such functions in lieu of third-party services providers); expenses incurred in connection with any restructuring, amendments or consents to the organizational documents of the Fund and/or the Underlying Funds; tax, litigation, indemnification, and other extraordinary expenses, interest expenses; expenses related to the initial and ongoing due diligence and monitoring of the Underlying Fund Managers and the Underlying Funds; and insurance expenses, custody fees, bank charges, and other investment and operating expenses;
(ii)	the operating expenses of the General Partner and the portion of any compliance, regulatory, filing, or regulatory inquiry expenses of the Investment Managers that would not have been incurred by the Investment Managers if the Fund did not exist (provided that, for the avoidance of doubt, the General Partner and the Investment Managers shall otherwise be responsible for all of their respective overhead expenses, including without limitation, office rent, employee salaries, and the cost of office equipment and utilities); and
(iii)	its pro rata share of any indemnification expenses incurred by the Underlying Funds.
With respect to any fiscal year in which the aggregate Capital Commitments (excluding the Reserve Commitments) of the Advisory Class Limited Partners and the Non-Advisory Class Limited Partners equal or exceed $25,000,000, the Fund (and the Limited Partners indirectly) will only bear Administrative Expenses (as defined below) for such year in an aggregate amount equal to 0.25% of the total Capital Commitments (excluding the Reserve Commitments) of Advisory Class Limited Partners and Non-Advisory Class Limited Partners (the “Administrative Expense Cap”). 
“Administrative Expenses” means the Fund’s (i) administration, accounting, audit, reporting and tax preparation fees and expenses, (ii) compliance fees and expenses (including the fees and expenses of any Investment Manager Affiliate performing such functions in lieu of third-party service providers) and (iii) insurance fees, premiums and expenses. 
For purposes of clarity, with respect to any fiscal year in which the aggregate Capital Commitments (excluding the Reserve Commitments) of the Advisory Class Limited Partners and the Non-Advisory Class Limited Partners are less than $25,000,000, the Fund (and the Limited Partners indirectly) will bear all of the Operating Expenses for such year including all Administrative Expenses. With respect to any fiscal year in which the aggregate Capital Commitments (excluding the Reserve Commitments) of the Advisory Class Limited Partners and the Non-Advisory Class Limited Partners are equal to or greater than $25,000,000, the General Partner, the Opto Investment Manager or their affiliates will bear Administrative Expenses for such year that exceed the Administrative Expense Cap.
The Organizational and Offering Expenses and the Operating Expenses (subject to the Administrative Expense Cap, if applicable) incurred by the Fund are collectively referred to herein as “Fund Expenses” and, subject to the provisions of “Organizational and Offering Expenses” above, generally will be allocated to, and borne by, the Limited Partners, based on their respective Fund Percentage Interest, provided that any such expenses may be allocated to, and borne by the Limited Partners in such manner as the General Partner determines in its sole discretion to be appropriate under the circumstances, and, where not allocable to all Limited Partners in proportion to their Fund Percentage Interest, may, as determined by the General Partner in its sole discretion, be charged to the Limited Partner(s) to which such fees and expenses are allocable, or paid by reducing the amounts distributable to such Limited Partner(s) (in which case, such amounts shall not otherwise be taken into account in making the determinations of the respective amounts to be distributed to the Limited Partners in accordance with “Fund Distributions; Carried Interest” below).  In addition, to the extent any such amount is paid by the Fund on behalf of a Limited Partner, such Limited Partner shall be deemed to have received a payment from the Fund, which payment shall be deemed to be a distribution with respect to such Limited Partner’s Interest in the Fund.
Expenses related to the Underlying Funds and payable by the Fund may be netted from distributions received from the Underlying Fund Distributions (as defined below) and otherwise distributable to Limited Partners in the form of Fund Distributions.  In addition, the General Partner may establish reserves from Underlying Fund Distributions in order to satisfy future expenses anticipated to be paid by the Fund or the General Partner (or the Investment Manager Affiliates).  
The amount of the Fund Expenses payable by the Fund in any year may exceed the net income of the Fund for such year and result in a loss for the Fund for such year.  Because the Limited Partners are investing in the Underlying Funds indirectly through the Fund, the Limited Partners will directly and indirectly bear the organizational, offering and operating costs, fees and expenses of the Fund and the Underlying Funds and, as a result, may be subject to higher organizational, offering and operating costs, fees and expenses than if the Limited Partners made investments in the Underlying Funds directly.  (See “Risk Factors – Multiple Levels of Fees and Expenses” below).
The General Partner, the Opto Investment Manager and their affiliates shall be entitled to be reimbursed by the Fund for any Fund Expenses incurred or advanced by any of them.
TECHNOLOGY FEE	In connection with the structuring and set-up of the Fund and the subscription by each investor for an Interest therein, Opto Investments, Inc. or its affiliates (collectively, “Opto”) typically charges a one-time up-front technology fee to each Limited Partner equal to 0.50% of such Limited Partner’s new or additional Capital Commitment (excluding its Reserve Commitment), which will generally be due and payable by such Limited Partner as of each applicable Closing Date (the “Technology Fee”). The Technology Fee does not form a part of the Organizational and Offering Expenses, nor does payment of the Technology Fee offset or reduce a Limited Partner’s Capital Commitment (or Reserve Commitment). 
However, in the case of the Fund, Opto has elected to waive the Technology Fee for all Advisory Class Limited Partners and Non-Advisory Class Limited Partners. 
MANAGEMENT FEES	Pursuant to the Investment Management Agreement, the Fund will pay to the Investment Managers an annual management fee (the “Management Fee”), calculated and payable quarterly in advance until the end of the term of the Fund.
The Management Fee payable by the Fund to the Opto Investment Manager (or the Waypoint Investment Manager as noted in clause (iii) below) with respect to each Limited Partner will be equal to: 
(i)	During the Investment Period: (a) for each Advisory Class Limited Partner, the product of 0.25% per annum multiplied by each Advisory Class Limited Partner’s Capital Commitment (excluding its Reserve Commitment and regardless of its Unfunded Commitment), and (b) for each Non-Advisory Class Limited Partner, the product of 1.0% per annum multiplied by each Non-Advisory Class Limited Partner’s Capital Commitment (excluding its Reserve Commitment and regardless of its Unfunded Commitment); and
(ii)	After the expiration of the Investment Period: (a) for each Advisory Class Limited Partner, the product of 0.20% per annum multiplied by each Advisory Class Limited Partner’s allocable share (based on relative Fund Percentage Interests) of the Fund NAV (as defined below), and (b) for each Non-Advisory Class Limited Partner, the product of 0.90% per annum multiplied by each Non-Advisory Class Limited Partner’s allocable share (based on relative Fund Percentage Interests) of the Fund NAV; 
(iii)	Provided that, pursuant to the terms of the Waypoint Co-Investment Management Agreement and except as otherwise noted herein, the Fund shall pay the Waypoint Investment Manager an amount equal to (a) in the case of clause (i)(b) 65% of the Management Fees payable with respect to Non-Advisory Class Limited Partners (i.e., 65 basis points of the 100 basis points charged), and (b) in the case of clause (ii)(b), 60% of the Management Fees payable with respect to Non-Advisory Class Limited Partners (i.e., 54 basis points of the 95 basis points charged).
The Management Fees in respect of any quarter shall be subject to adjustment to reflect Capital Commitments subscribed for after the date upon which the Management Fee for such quarter is calculated.
The Management Fee is exclusive of the amount of any Underlying Fund Management Fees (as defined below) payable in respect of the Fund as a limited partner (or similar equity holder) of the Underlying Funds, which the Limited Partners will indirectly bear. In addition, the Limited Partners will indirectly pay carried interest in respect of the Underlying Funds by virtue of the Fund being a limited partner (or similar equity holder) of the Underlying Funds.
To the extent the advisory relationship between an Advisory Class Limited Partner and the Waypoint Investment Manager terminates during the term of the Fund, such Limited Partner shall, as of the date of such termination, become a Non-Advisory Class Limited Partner and shall be subject to the terms and conditions of the Non-Advisory Class, including, without limitation, the applicable Management Fee rate and Carried Interest Distribution rate.
The Waypoint Investment Manager will not be entitled to payment of any Management Fees relating to any period following the date of termination of the Waypoint Co-Investment Management Agreement; provided that the Waypoint Investment Manager shall be entitled to all Management Fees accrued but not yet paid until the date of termination and, thereafter, the Management Fees otherwise payable to the Waypoint Investment Manager will instead be paid to the Opto Investment Manager, unless and until another co-investment manager is retained on behalf of the Fund.  The Waypoint Investment Manager shall promptly reimburse the Investment Manager for the Management Fees paid to the Waypoint Investment Manager related to any partial period from the date of termination of the Waypoint Co-Investment Management Agreement until the next quarter.  For purposes of clarity, notwithstanding the termination of the Waypoint Co-Investment Management Agreement, the Waypoint Investment Manager shall remain entitled to the Carried Interest Distributions for the duration of the Fund.
Each of the Investment Managers may, in its discretion, waive or defer all or part of the Management Fee in respect of any Limited Partner; thus, Limited Partners may pay different Management Fees, including Limited Partners within the same Class. It is anticipated that Limited Partners affiliated with the Investment Manager (including the General Partner and the Warehouse) will not bear Management Fees. Further, each of the Investment Managers may share its portion of the Management Fee with any other person in their sole discretion.
UNDERLYING FUND MANAGEMENT FEE AND CARRIED INTEREST	Pursuant to the applicable Underlying Fund Documents, (i) the Underlying Fund Manager or an affiliate thereof will receive a management fee (the “Underlying Fund Management Fee”) in satisfaction of which investors in such Underlying Fund (including the Fund) will be required to make pro rata contributions, and (ii) a portion of the profits of the Underlying Fund will be required in certain circumstances to be distributed or paid as carried interest to the Underlying Fund Manager or an affiliate thereof. Each Limited Partner will bear indirectly its pro rata share of the Underlying Fund Management Fee and any carried interest payable or distributable in respect of the Fund as an investor in each Underlying Fund (and, in respect of any Underlying Fund which is itself a “fund of funds,” any management fees and carried interest payable or distributable at such underlying level).
CAPITAL ACCOUNTS	The Fund will establish and maintain a separate capital account (a “Capital Account”) for each Limited Partner.  Each Capital Account will have an opening balance equal to the Limited Partner’s Capital Contributions, if any, as applicable. Each Capital Account will be increased by any amounts credited to, and decreased by any amounts debited to, such Capital Account, as set forth in the Partnership Agreement. Generally, tax allocations will follow book allocations. The General Partner may in its discretion adjust allocations and distributions to ensure that the distributions made or allocated are consistent with the economic arrangement set forth in the Partnership Agreement (including to adjust for any calculation errors or estimates).
FUND DISTRIBUTIONS; CARRIED INTEREST	Except as otherwise noted herein and subject to the Reinvestable Proceeds (as defined below), the General Partner will cause the Fund to make non-liquidating distributions (each, a “Fund Distribution”) as soon as practicable after the Fund receives a distribution from any Underlying Fund (each, an “Underlying Fund Distribution”) or from other Distributable Cash (as defined below) by tentatively apportioning all Distributable Cash to the Partners in proportion to their respective Fund Percentage Interests, and any such amounts initially apportioned to the General Partner will be distributed to the General Partner, and any such amounts apportioned to a Limited Partner will be distributed to such Limited Partner, all in the following order of priority:
(i)	Return of Capital: First, one hundred percent (100%) to such Limited Partner until the Fund has made cumulative distributions to such Limited Partner equal to its Capital Contributions; 
(ii)	Preferred Return: Second, 100% to such Limited Partner until it has received a preferred return equal to a 1.2 multiple of invested capital (i.e., a 1.2x MOIC);
(iii)	Catch-Up: Third, (A) if such Limited Partner is an Advisory Class Limited Partner, 100% to the General Partner until it has received distributions equal to 5%, or (B) if such Limited Partner is a Non-Advisory Class Limited Partner, 50% to each of the General Partner and the Waypoint SLP until each of them has received 5%, in each case of cumulative distributions (I) made to such Limited Partner with respect to clause (ii), and (II) made or being made to the General Partner and the Waypoint SLP with respect to such Limited Partner pursuant to this clause (iii); and 
(iv)	Carried Interest Distribution: Thereafter, (a) if such Limited Partner is an Advisory Class Limited Partner, 95% to such Limited Partner and 5% to the General Partner, and (b) if such Limited Partner is a Non-Advisory Class Limited Partner, 90% to such Limited Partner, 5% to the General Partner and 5% to the Waypoint SLP.  Distributions to the General Partner and the Waypoint SLP pursuant to clause (iii) above and this clause (iv) will be the “Carried Interest Distribution” to the General Partner and the Waypoint SLP, respectively.
For the avoidance of doubt, to the extent there exists any uncancelled Capital Commitment or unreturned Capital Contributions of the Warehouse with respect to the Warehouse Class of Interest, the Warehouse Class will not be subject to the Carried Interest Distributions (i.e., for purposes of clarity, the Warehouse Class will receive 100% of its ratable share of distributions after clause (ii) above). 
Any distributable amount will be reduced by applicable withholdings and by any amounts determined by the General Partner as necessary to cover, or set aside reserves for, Fund Expenses. 
As soon as practicable after the end of each fiscal year or such other period when a tax liability arises or occurs, including liabilities for estimated tax payments, the Fund may distribute to the General Partner and the Waypoint SLP to discharge their respective tax liabilities (including estimated tax liabilities), an amount equal to their respective deemed tax liabilities for such fiscal year or for such other relevant period with respect to income allocated to each of them by the Fund, and likewise may make similar tax distributions to Limited Partners in accordance with the Partnership Agreement (“Tax Distributions”).  The Fund may make Tax Distributions with respect to a fiscal year on an estimated basis during a taxable year, subject to adjustment at the end of the fiscal year.  For purposes of clarity, Tax Distributions will be deemed advances of (and will reduce) the amounts of Distributable Cash otherwise distributable to the General Partner, the Waypoint SLP, and/or the Limited Partners (as applicable).  Thus, the making of Tax Distributions may affect the general distribution scheme described in this Memorandum.  
During the Investment Period, the Fund, may, in the absolute discretion of the General Partner, recall, retain, reinvest or otherwise utilize any Underlying Fund Distributions, including, without limitation, any return of capital or profit distributions, for reinvestment in any Underlying Fund or to satisfy any obligations of the Fund (such amounts, “Reinvestable Proceeds”). After the Investment Period, the Fund may utilize Reinvestable Proceeds for any post-Investment Period uses enumerated under “Funding of Subscriptions” above. 
To the extent the General Partner causes the Fund to distribute Fund Distributions corresponding to such Underlying Fund Distributions, the Unfunded Commitments of the Limited Partners will be increased (potentially in excess of their respective Capital Commitments) by their allocable share of such Fund Distributions and be subject to recall by the General Partner.  If determined appropriate by the General Partner, cash receipts to be distributed to the Limited Partners or reinvested by the Fund may, pending such distribution or reinvestment, be invested in Liquid Investments.
To the extent the Fund at any time incurs any liability or obligation (including, without limitation, any obligation of the Fund to return to any Underlying Fund any distributions made to the Fund in accordance with the Underlying Fund Documents (including, without limitation, to satisfy any reinvestment, giveback or other return of capital obligation thereunder) or any tax liability or any obligation to provide indemnification to any person) (a “Fund Liability”), the General Partner may, in its discretion, upon not less than five (5) Business Days’ notice, require each Limited Partner (including, without limitation, any former Limited Partner) to return any distributions made to such Limited Partner (or former Limited Partner or any of its predecessors in interest), in an amount that seeks, to the extent practicable, to reverse the distributions to such Limited Partner and cause it to recontribute distributions equal to its Fund Percentage Interest of the Fund Liability, but in no event in excess of the aggregate amount of distributions actually received by such Limited Partner from the Fund. The obligation of a Limited Partner to return distributions made to such Limited Partner for the purpose of meeting the Fund’s liabilities and obligations with respect to a Fund Liability shall survive the liquidation and termination of the Fund. For purposes of clarity, the Limited Partner giveback shall not apply to any Carried Interest Distributions received by the Waypoint SLP.
The Underlying Fund Managers may make distributions in-kind to the Underlying Fund limited partners (including the Fund).  To the extent such in-kind distributions are received by the Fund from any Underlying Fund, the Fund may, in the General Partner’s sole discretion, and to the extent permitted by law, distribute such assets to the Limited Partners as a distribution in-kind or sell all or any portion of such assets and (a) distribute the net proceeds from such disposition to the Limited Partners, or (b) designate such sale proceeds of in-kind distributions as Reinvestable Proceeds.  Each Limited Partner acknowledges that proceeds received by it from any disposition of property otherwise distributable to it in-kind may be of lesser value than the in-kind property itself.  Any such distributions shall be considered Fund Distributions.
“Distributable Cash” means cash from net cash flow from operations, net distributable proceeds, and other cash determined by the General Partner, including any Underlying Fund Distributions at such times as the General Partner determines in its sole discretion to be available for Fund Distributions.
TRANSFERS OF INTERESTS	Interests are illiquid and may not be transferred, sold, exchanged, assigned (by way of security or otherwise), pledged, charged, mortgaged, gifted, encumbered or in any way alienated, transferred or disposed in any other form, in whole or in part, unless the conditions set out in the Partnership Agreement are met, and the General Partner has given its prior written consent, which may be granted or withheld in its sole discretion.  A transfer of Limited Partner Interests will not relieve the transferor of its obligations to the Fund (including any remaining Unfunded Commitment) unless otherwise agreed by the transferee and the General Partner.  (See “Risk Factors — Illiquidity of Investment; Lack of Transferability of Interests” below).
The applicable Limited Partner will be responsible for all costs associated with an attempted or realized transfer of any portion of its Interest, whether or not the General Partner consents to such transfer.  Such costs will include (a) the General Partner’s (or any Investment Manager Affiliate’s) costs of accounting for such transfers for U.S. federal, state, local or non-U.S. income tax purposes and any other related legal expenses incurred by the General Partner in its sole discretion (including the fees and expenses of any Investment Manager Affiliates for performing such functions in lieu of third-party service providers), as determined by the General Partner in its sole discretion, and (b) the amount of any transfer taxes due as a result of a Limited Partner’s transfer, if any.  (See “Risk Factors — Illiquidity of Investment; Lack of Transferability of Interests” below).
NO RIGHT TO REDEEM OR WITHDRAW	No Limited Partner will have a right to redeem its Interest or withdraw from the Fund.
UNDERLYING FUND
RESTRICTED PERSON 	If permitted pursuant to the applicable Underlying Fund Documents, an Underlying Fund may invest in “new issues” (“New Issues”), as defined under Financial Industry Regulatory Authority, Inc. (“FINRA”) rules. Pursuant to FINRA Rules 5130 and 5131, FINRA member firms are prohibited from selling New Issues to any account, such as an Underlying Fund, in which certain “restricted” or “covered” persons have a beneficial interest, subject to certain de minimis thresholds and other exemptions. Because the Fund will have a beneficial interest in each Underlying Fund, it may be required to make representations to an Underlying Fund concerning its status or the status of its Limited Partners as restricted or covered persons, in order to participate in New Issues. Accordingly, each Limited Partner will be required to provide information in its Subscription Booklet concerning its status as a restricted or covered person. The General Partner has discretion to determine a Limited Partner’s eligibility to participate in New Issues and may elect, on behalf of such Limited Partner or on behalf of the entire Fund, to fully participate, partially participate, or not participate at all in the profits and losses attributable to New Issues in its sole discretion, and such election will be binding on the Fund and the Limited Partners.
The Limited Partners understand that the General Partner expects to cause the Fund to elect not to participate in the profit or loss attributable to any “new issues” invested in by any Underlying Fund.
REPORTS	The Fund will furnish audited financial statements annually to all Limited Partners. Such audited financial reports will be delivered promptly after receipt of the audited financial statements from the Underlying Funds (or as soon as practicable thereafter), generally not to exceed 180 days after the end of the relevant fiscal year.
In addition, on a quarterly basis, each Limited Partner will be furnished with an account statement of the Fund. Limited Partners may also be provided summary reports concerning important information relating to the Underlying Funds, as the General Partner determines in its sole discretion. Such reports will disclose the net asset value of the Fund, which will be calculated quarterly and will equal the sum of all Liquid Investments held by the Fund and the value of the Fund’s collective investment in the Underlying Funds, as reported by the Underlying Fund Managers, less all direct and indirect liabilities (such as expenses and fees) of the Fund (the “Fund NAV”). 
To the extent that reports reflect valuations of Underlying Funds or Portfolio Investments, such valuations will be based solely on information provided by the Underlying Fund Managers, and the General Partner shall not have any responsibility for the content, accuracy, completeness or fairness of any information received from the Underlying Fund Managers.  Prospective investors should note that such data (i) will not necessarily accurately reflect the current or expected future performance of the Underlying Funds or their Portfolio Investments or the fair value of the Fund’s interest in the Underlying Funds, (ii) should not be used to compare returns among multiple private equity funds and (iii) any information about the Fund’s pro rata ownership interests or the performance of the Fund’s investment in any Underlying Fund will not be calculated, reviewed, verified or in any way sanctioned or approved by the Underlying Fund Managers.  (See “Risk Factors – Reliability of Valuations” below).
CONFIDENTIALITY	Each prospective investor, by accepting delivery of this Memorandum, is deemed to agree to keep the contents hereof and thereof strictly confidential.  This Memorandum has been prepared solely for the benefit of persons interested in the proposed sale of the Interests and any reproduction of this Memorandum, in whole or in part, or, except to the extent specifically authorized in this Memorandum in relation to certain tax matters or professional advisers, the divulgence of any of the contents hereof or thereof without the prior written consent of the General Partner is strictly prohibited.
In addition, the Limited Partners will be required to keep confidential and will not be permitted to disclose any information relating to the Fund, the Underlying Fund or any Underlying Fund Manager furnished to the Limited Partners from time to time; provided that a Limited Partner may be permitted to disclose such information in certain circumstances and to certain persons, including disclosure regarding U.S. federal or state income tax treatment and tax structure, as further described herein, in the Subscription Booklet, and in the Partnership Agreement.  Limited Partners shall be required to maintain the confidentiality of any information provided by any Underlying Fund Manager to the Fund and disclosed to the Limited Partners. 
The General Partner may elect to exercise its right to withhold information on a Limited Partner-by-Limited Partner basis, including (i) with respect to a Limited Partner that is subject to any “freedom of information,” “sunshine” or other law, rule or regulation that imposes upon such Limited Partner an obligation to make certain information available to the public, or (ii) to comply with requests from the Underlying Fund Managers with respect to the withholding of such information.  “Risk Factors – Protection of Confidentiality” below.
INDEMNIFICATION AND EXCULPATION	The Fund will, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, indemnify and hold harmless the General Partner, the Investment Managers, the “partnership representative” and the “designated individual” of the Fund (each within the meaning of the Bipartisan Budget Act of 2015), the Fund’s auditor, administrator and custodian, and each of their respective affiliates, and the former or current shareholders, partners, members, other equity holders, officers, directors, employees, legal representatives, or managers of each of them, and any liquidation representative (in each case, an “Indemnitee”), from and against any and all liabilities, obligations, losses, damages, fines, taxes and interest and penalties thereon, claims, demands, actions, suits, proceedings (whether civil, criminal, administrative, investigative or otherwise), costs, expenses and disbursements (including legal and accounting fees and expenses, costs of investigation and sums paid in settlement) of any kind or nature whatsoever and howsoever arising (collectively, “Claims and Expenses”) which may be imposed on, incurred by or asserted at any time against such Indemnitee in any way related to or arising out of the Partnership Agreement, the Fund, the Underlying Funds or the management or administration of the Fund or in connection with the business or affairs of the Fund or the activities of such Indemnitee on behalf of the Fund, except to the extent that it will have been determined by a non-appealable final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction that the Claims and Expenses are attributable to such Indemnitee’s actual fraud, wilful malfeasance or gross negligence. 
Furthermore, pursuant to the Investment Management Agreements, the Waypoint Investment Manager will indemnify and hold harmless the Opto Investment Manager and its affiliates for any acts or omissions on behalf of the Fund directed by the Waypoint Investment Manager, and the Opto Investment Manager will indemnify and hold harmless the Waypoint Investment Manager and its affiliates for any acts or omissions on behalf of the Partnership directed by the Opto Investment Manager.
Additionally, in connection with the Fund’s subscription for limited partnership interests in the Underlying Funds, the Fund will be obligated to agree to indemnify and hold harmless the Underlying Funds, the Underlying Fund Managers, and their affiliates pursuant to the terms of its subscription agreement to the Underlying Fund. 
TO THE EXTENT INDEMNIFICATION PROVISIONS PURPORT TO INCLUDE INDEMNIFICATION FOR LIABILITIES ARISING UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT, IT IS THE POSITION OF U.S. SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION (THE “SEC”) THAT SUCH INDEMNIFICATION IS AGAINST PUBLIC POLICY AND UNENFORCEABLE. Accordingly, neither the General Partner, the Investment Managers, nor any of their respective affiliates will be indemnified against liabilities arising out of violations of federal or state securities laws associated with the offer and sale of the Interests. However, indemnification may be allowed for settlements and related expenses of lawsuits alleging violations of securities laws and for attorneys’ fees and costs regarding the successful defense of any such action, provided a court approves such settlement and finds that indemnification of the settlement and related costs should be made, or approves indemnification of litigation costs if a successful defense is made, in each case after being apprised of the positions of applicable state securities administrators and the SEC with respect to indemnification for securities laws violations.
AMENDMENTS	The Partnership Agreement may at any time be amended by the General Partner with the approval of a majority in interest of Limited Partners, provided that, except as otherwise provided in the Partnership Agreement, without the consent of any Limited Partners affected thereby, no Limited Partner’s Capital Commitment shall be increased and no Limited Partner’s limited liability status under applicable law shall be impaired.  The Partnership Agreement may be amended without the consent of any Limited Partner in certain circumstances as provided in the Partnership Agreement, including, without limitation, to effect amendments, which the General Partner determines advisable in its sole discretion, to assure compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations and changes in connection with amendments to the Underlying Fund Documents. Any approval or consent of the Limited Partners required under the Partnership Agreement may be obtained by negative consent affording the Limited Partners at least five (5) Business Days to object. 
ASSIGNMENT OF INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT AGREEMENTS	The Investment Managers will not have the right to make an “assignment,” as such term is defined under Section 202(a)(1) of the Advisers Act and the rules promulgated thereunder, of the Investment Management Agreement to any person (except as permitted thereunder) without the consent of a majority in interest of the Limited Partners; provided that, to the extent a Limited Partner does not respond to a request for consent within the designated time period, such consent will be deemed given and deemed to satisfy the requirements of Section 205(a)(2) of the Advisers Act and the rules promulgated thereunder.
CONSENT OF THE LIMITED PARTNERS AND DEEMED CONSENT	Where the General Partner is seeking the consent of the Limited Partners as described above or otherwise, then, notwithstanding anything to the contrary set forth in this Memorandum, the General Partner shall be entitled to give five (5) Business Days’ notice of the request for such consent to the Limited Partner or relevant Limited Partners and, where no indication is actually provided in writing prior to the end of such period by such Limited Partner to the General Partner as to whether it is granting such consent or not, such failure to provide such indication shall, at the General Partner’s sole discretion, be construed as the Limited Partner’s consent to such matter.
VOTING UNDER THE UNDERLYING FUND DOCUMENTS	To the extent the Fund, as a limited partner (or similar interest holder) of each of the Underlying Funds, votes on an issue related to the affairs of an Underlying Fund, the Fund may vote or abstain the entirety of its interest in such Underlying Fund on such issue as directed by the General Partner in its sole discretion.  The General Partner may submit any such issue to the vote of the Limited Partners, in its sole discretion, in which case, the General Partner may, but is not obligated to, vote the Fund’s entire interest in each Underlying Fund so as to reflect the vote of the Required Limited Partners.
“Required Limited Partners” shall mean those Limited Partners that at the time in question have aggregate Fund Percentage Interests in excess of 75%, excluding from such calculation in both the numerator and the denominator the Interests held by (i) any Defaulting Limited Partner or a Limited Partner who is otherwise not permitted to vote under the terms of the Partnership Agreement and (ii) the General Partner, the Investment Managers and their respective affiliates.
Investors should note that, except with respect to Opto Warehouse Transactions, none of the Limited Partners, the General Partner or their respective affiliates will have the ability to control the management or operations of the Underlying Funds or any of its affiliates.  (See “Risk Factors – Investment in the Underlying Funds; Fund-of-Funds Structure” below).
MANDATORY WITHDRAWAL	In the event that the Fund is required or permitted to withdraw from, or reduce its interest in any Underlying Fund solely as a result of the participation in the Fund of one or more Limited Partners, the General Partner may cause such Limited Partners to redeem all or a portion of their Interests, in which case the Fund may distribute the net amounts received from such Underlying Fund in connection with the redemption or sale of the portion of the Fund’s interest in the Underlying Fund attributable to such Limited Partner(s) (less the amount of any expenses (including any applicable withholding taxes), liabilities, costs, damages or losses incurred by the Fund, the General Partner or any other Investment Manager Affiliate or any Limited Partner, as determined by the General Partner in its sole discretion) to such Limited Partner or Limited Partners in a withdrawal or redemption of all or a portion of its or their Interest(s) in the Fund.  However, there is no assurance that such mandatory withdrawal will be applied only to such Limited Partners, and accordingly, the Fund (and all the Limited Partners) may be subject to mandatory withdrawal pursuant to the Underlying Fund Documents, which may result in adverse consequences to all the Limited Partners.
RISK FACTORS	An investment in the Fund involves significant risks and will be illiquid on a long-term basis. Each Limited Partner bears the risk of losing its entire investment in its Interests. Prospective investors should carefully read this section and the “Risk Factors” and “Conflicts of Interest” sections of this Memorandum below. 
It is intended that the Fund will make aggregate capital commitments to the Underlying Funds in an amount substantially, but not fully, equal to the aggregate Capital Commitments (potentially including the Reserve Commitments and subject to Reinvestable Proceeds), with the balance reserved for expenses, liabilities and/or any other obligations of the Fund, as determined by the General Partner (though no assurances can be given that such reserved amounts will be sufficient to pay any such expenses or cover any such obligations).
As noted in this Memorandum, each Limited Partner will be required, from time to time, to contribute capital to the Fund and the Fund, in turn, may invest all or part of any such contributed capital in Liquid Investments, on a temporary or permanent basis, prior to, or in lieu of, investing such capital in the Underlying Funds, which Liquid Investments are not expected to earn a substantial return.  Moreover, Limited Partners may be required to make Capital Contributions to cover shortfalls resulting from, among other things, the Default, or the excuse or exclusion from funding of, one or more Limited Partners or the compulsory withdrawal of a Limited Partner’s Interest, and the Fund furthermore may, as an expense of the Fund, borrow funds under one or more financings, including a subscription line, to cover such shortfalls.  As a result, the returns achieved by the Limited Partners may be significantly lower than if such amounts had been invested directly in the Underlying Funds.  
Except with respect to Opto Warehouse Transactions, none of the Fund, the General Partner or any of the Investment Manager Affiliates will take part in the management of the Underlying Fund or have any control over its management strategies and policies.
This Memorandum and the Partnership Agreement must be carefully reviewed in their entirety before making an investment in the Fund.  Such information and descriptions have not been independently verified by the Fund, the General Partner, or any of their respective directors, officers, employees, members, partners, shareholders, controlling persons or affiliates.  Each Limited Partner, by subscribing for Interests, acknowledges and agrees that, except with respect to Opto Warehouse Transactions, none of the Underlying Funds or any Underlying Fund Manager is or shall be responsible for the preparation or contents of this Memorandum or the governing documents of the Fund, or any related agreements and instruments or any accompanying sales documentation (other than such information provided by any Underlying Fund Manager, which is referenced or incorporated in whole or in part in any such sales documentation), each as amended or supplemented, and none has passed upon or made any representation with respect to the adequacy or sufficiency of, this Memorandum or the information contained herein (including any appendices hereto) or the governing documents of the Fund, the form Subscription Booklet of the Fund, or any related agreements and instruments or any accompanying sales documentation, each as amended or supplemented (other than such information provided by any Underlying Fund Manager, which is referenced or incorporated in whole or in part in any such sales documentation).
Purchasers of Interests will not be limited partners of any of the Underlying Funds, will have no direct interest in the Underlying Funds, will have no direct voting rights in the Underlying Funds, will not be parties to any of the Underlying Fund Documents, and, accordingly, will not have any direct rights thereunder. Further, purchasers of Interests will not be direct investors in the Underlying Funds, will not have privity of contract with the Underlying Funds, and may not have recourse against any Underlying Fund with respect to such investment in the Fund.  Although the Fund is being established to invest in the Underlying Funds, it is not an affiliate of the Underlying Fund Managers or any Underlying Fund, except with respect to Opto Warehouse Transactions.  The offering of Interests in the Fund does not constitute and should not be considered an offering of interests in the Underlying Funds.  
Potential investors should note that, except with respect to Opto Warehouse Transactions, none of the persons or entities responsible for the organization, control, management or operations of the Fund or any of its affiliates has the power to legally bind or commit the Underlying Funds or the Underlying Fund Managers.  Moreover, except with respect to Opto Warehouse Transactions, none of the Fund, the Administrator, or any of their affiliates has the right to participate in the control, management or operations of the Underlying Funds or any of its affiliates, or has discretion over the management or operations of the Underlying Funds or any of its affiliates and they expressly disclaim any responsibility or liability thereto. Except with respect to Opto Warehouse Transactions, the Underlying Funds are not affiliated with, but have, and may in the future have, other business relationships with, the Fund or their respective affiliates, including engaging in various lending and securities transactions, and no Underlying Fund Manager is responsible for the formation or operation of the Fund.  Interests are being offered and sold exclusively by the General Partner and/or its affiliates and not by the Underlying Funds or the Underlying Fund Managers.  Except with respect to Opto Warehouse Transactions, none of the Underlying Funds or the Underlying Fund Managers have participated or will participate in the offering of Interests, and none of the foregoing has or shall have any responsibility for such offering or for the formation or operation of the Fund.  Except with respect to Opto Warehouse Transactions, none of the Underlying Funds or the Underlying Fund Manager will participate in the organization, control, management or operations of the Fund.  The offering of Interests should not be considered an offering of direct interests in any Underlying Fund.  Except with respect to Opto Warehouse Transactions, none of the Underlying Funds or the Underlying Fund Manager have endorsed, and none of them is or shall be responsible for the preparation or contents of, and none has passed upon or made any representation with respect to the adequacy or sufficiency of the Fund’s offering materials or the governing documents of the Fund, the form Subscription Booklet of the Fund, or any related agreements and instruments or any accompanying sales documentation (other than such information provided by any Underlying Fund Manager, which is referenced or incorporated in whole or in part in any such sales documentation, each as amended or supplemented).  Except with respect to Opto Warehouse Transactions, none of the Underlying Funds or the Underlying Fund Manager have endorsed or made any recommendations, representations or warranties with respect to Interests in the Fund.  Furthermore, except with respect to Opto Warehouse Transactions, none of the Underlying Funds or any Underlying Fund Manager has made any representation or warranty, express or implied, with respect to the content, adequacy, fairness, correctness, accuracy, reasonableness or completeness of any of the information contained in this Memorandum, and they expressly disclaim any responsibility or liability therefor.  No Underlying Fund Manager has any responsibility to update any such information.
Notwithstanding the immediately preceding paragraphs or anything in this Memorandum to the contrary, the provisions in this Memorandum shall not be construed as to relieve (or attempt to relieve) any persons from liability (including liability under any U.S. federal securities law, with respect to which liabilities cannot be waived), to the extent (but only to the extent) that such liability may not be waived, modified or limited under applicable law, but shall be construed so as to effectuate the provisions herein to the fullest extent permitted by law.
CONFLICTS OF INTEREST	Many of the Investment Manager Affiliates may engage in a broad spectrum of activities including financial advisory services, asset management activities, sponsoring and managing private investment funds, engaging in broker-dealer transactions, and other activities. In the ordinary course of business, many of the Investment Manager Affiliates engage in activities with respect to an Investment Manager Affiliate’s interests or the interests of their clients, which may conflict with the interests of the Fund, the Underlying Funds or the Limited Partners. 
Various potential and actual conflicts of interest may arise from the overall investment activities of the General Partner, the Investment Managers, and their respective affiliates for their own accounts and the accounts of others, some of which are noted herein. When making investment decisions where a conflict of interest may arise, the General Partner and the Investment Managers will endeavour to act in a fair and equitable manner as between the Fund and other clients.
The General Partner, the Investment Managers, or their respective affiliates may own, and continue to own, interests in, form investment vehicles, or make investments that compete with, compete for investments with, or hold investments in funds or managed accounts that compete with, the Fund and current or future Underlying Funds and Underlying Fund Managers and may take positions that are potentially contrary or adverse to the interests of the Fund and the Limited Partners.
The General Partner, the Investment Managers, or their respective affiliates are, or may in the future be, the sponsor, investment manager, or placement agent of other private investment funds or trusts, including new investment funds, trusts, or associations with investment objectives similar to that of the Fund or the Underlying Funds, which may invest in one or more of the Underlying Funds, other funds sponsored or managed by Underlying Fund Managers, or a competitor of any of them. The General Partner, the Investment Managers, or their respective affiliates may in the future acquire interests in one or more of the Underlying Funds, other funds sponsored or managed by Underlying Fund Managers, or a competitor of any of them.  In addition, the General Partner, the Investment Managers, or their respective affiliates, in their capacity as investment manager for such funds, may allocate to such funds investment opportunities that may have otherwise been available for investment by the Fund.
The General Partner, the Investment Managers, their respective affiliates and their directors, officers and employees may buy and sell securities or other investments for their own accounts, including interests in Underlying Funds, and may have conflicts of interest with respect to investments made by the Waypoint Investment Manager (with the consent of the Opto Investment Manager as applicable) on behalf of the Fund. As a result of differing trading and investment strategies or constraints, positions may be taken by directors, officers and employees of the Investment Managers or their respective affiliates that are the same as, different from or made at different times from positions indirectly taken by the Fund through its investments in the Underlying Funds. Consequently, each Investment Manager’s investment management activities may present conflicts between the interests of the Fund and those of such Investment Manager and, potentially, among the interests of various accounts managed by such Investment Manager, principally with respect to allocation of investment opportunities among similar strategies.  Future investment activities of each Investment Manager and its affiliates and their principals, partners, directors, officers or employees may give rise to conflicts of interest other than those described herein.
Personnel of each Investment Manager may serve as investment advisers to certain clients and registered and unregistered investment companies that may utilize an investment program that is substantively similar to, or different from, that of the Fund.  
The General Partner serves as general partner of the Fund and is obligated to act as a fiduciary in respect of all Limited Partners collectively and not in the interests of any Limited Partner individually.
By executing a Subscription Booklet, each prospective investor will be required to acknowledge and consent to all such actual and potential conflicts of interest and waive (to the maximum extent permitted by law) all claims with respect to any liability arising from the existence of any conflicts of interest with the General Partner, the Investment Managers, or their respective affiliates.
Further, if the Fund intends to invest in an Opto Warehouse Transaction that would constitute a “principal transaction” under Section 206(3) of the Advisers Act, the General Partner will seek the prior written consent of the Waypoint Investment Manager (or a majority in interest of the Limited Partners in certain circumstances as described below). 
The Waypoint Investment Manager has been appointed by the Fund to act as the party that will review and approve or disapprove (i) any transaction for which client consent may be required under Section 205(a) or 206(3) of the Advisers Act (including, without limitation, any potential Opto Warehouse Transaction in respect of which the General Partner may request the Waypoint Investment Manager’s consent), and (ii) any other transaction that may pose an actual or potential conflict of interest and in respect of which the General Partner in its discretion requests the Waypoint Investment Manager’s consent. To the fullest extent permitted by law, the Waypoint Investment Manager’s consent or approval of any such transaction shall constitute the consent or approval of the Fund and all the Limited Partners. In such capacity, the Waypoint Investment Manager has exculpation and indemnification rights as an Indemnitee as described in the section titled “Indemnification and Exculpation” above. Notwithstanding the foregoing, upon written notice to the General Partner, the Waypoint Investment Manager may elect to require the General Partner to pass through its request for client consent to a given transaction to the Limited Partners. Any such approval or consent of the Limited Partners may be obtained by negative consent affording the Limited Partners at least five (5) Business Days to object. In the event the Waypoint Co-Investment Management Agreement is terminated in accordance with the terms thereof, the General Partner will direct its request for client consent to a given transaction to the Limited Partners. (See “Conflicts of Interest” below).
CERTAIN UNITED STATES FEDERAL INCOME TAX CONSIDERATIONS	It is intended and expected that the Fund will be treated as a partnership for U.S. federal income tax purposes and not as an association or “publicly traded partnership” taxable as a corporation.  Based on this classification, the Fund generally will not be subject to U.S. federal income tax. However, as described below under “Audits,” partnership audit procedures implemented by the Bipartisan Budget Act of 2015 effective for tax years beginning after December 31, 2017, may result in a partnership being subject to U.S. federal income tax in certain cases. 
Partners will be furnished information on Schedule K-1 (and Schedules K-2 and K-3, as applicable (or equivalent reports)) for preparation of their respective U.S. federal income tax returns.  The furnishing of such information is subject to, among other things, the timely receipt by the Fund of tax information from the Underlying Funds.  It is likely that any Schedule K-1s (and Schedules K-2 and K-3, as applicable (or equivalent reports)) in respect of the Fund will not be available prior to April 15 (and may be available significantly later than April 15) and, accordingly, it is likely that each Partner will need to obtain extensions for the filing of any applicable tax returns at the federal, state, and local levels.  
An investment in the Fund may have the effect of requiring a Partner to pay income, franchise or other taxes, and file income or other tax returns, in each jurisdiction (including state, local and non-U.S. jurisdictions) in which the Fund directly or indirectly earns income, owns property or conducts business, or otherwise is deemed to have a taxable nexus, including, in each case, through its investment in the Underlying Funds.
The taxation of partners and partnerships is complex.  Special U.S. tax rules may apply to a Limited Partner’s indirect interest in the investments made directly or indirectly by the Underlying Funds, including in respect of investments in any debt obligations or other securities that have been issued or purchased at a discount, or that have imputed discount, pay-in-kind, dividend accruals or similar features, investments in controlled foreign corporations and/or passive foreign investment companies, and investments in certain flow-through entities.  
Each prospective investor is urged to consult its own tax advisor as to the tax consequences of an investment in the Fund.
ERISA AND OTHER EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLANS AND ACCOUNTS	Subject to the consent of the General Partner, Interests will generally not be purchased or held (directly or indirectly) by or on behalf of a (i) person or entity subject to Title I of ERISA, or Section 4975 of the Code, including, but not limited to, corporate pension and profit-sharing plans, “simplified employee pension plans,” Keogh plans for self-employed individuals (including partners), individual retirement accounts described in Section 408 of the Code, and medical benefit plans or (ii) Restricted Governmental Plans (collectively, “Plans”).  Each Limited Partner and the person making the decision to purchase or hold directly or indirectly any Interests in its fiduciary and individual capacity must represent that on each date on which any such Interest is purchased or held by or on behalf of such investor, whether the assets being used to purchase or hold the Interests are the assets of any Plan.  Governmental Plans that are not Restricted Governmental Plans may be permitted to purchase or hold Interests.
SIDE LETTERS	The Fund and/or the General Partner may enter into other written agreements (“Side Letters”) with one or more Limited Partners of the Fund. These Side Letters may entitle a Limited Partner to make an investment in the Fund on terms other than those described herein, in the Partnership Agreement, and in the Subscription Booklet. Any such terms, including with respect to (i) opting out of particular investments, (ii) reporting obligations of the Fund, (iii) transfers to affiliates, (iv) co-investment opportunities, (v) withdrawal rights due to adverse tax or regulatory events, (vi) consent rights to certain Partnership Agreement amendments, or (vii) any other matters, may be more favourable than those offered to any other Limited Partners. If the Fund and/or the General Partner enter into a Side Letter entitling a Limited Partner to opt out of a particular Underlying Fund or withdraw from the Fund, any election to opt out or withdraw by such Limited Partner may increase any other Limited Partners’ pro rata interest in that particular Portfolio Investment (in the case of an opt-out) or all future Portfolio Investments (in the case of a withdrawal).
COUNSEL TO THE OPTO INVESTMENT MANAGER	Alston & Bird LLP (the “Fund Legal Advisor”) represents the Opto Investment Manager and certain Investment Manager Affiliates, including other affiliated investment funds, in a variety of matters.  In connection with the organization or operation of the Fund, the Fund has not previously engaged, and it is not expected that the Fund will engage, counsel separate from counsel to the Opto Investment Manager.  The Fund Legal Advisor is not representing the prospective investors or Limited Partners.  In addition, the Fund Legal Advisor does not undertake to monitor compliance by the Fund, the Opto Investment Manager or any Investment Manager Affiliates with the investment program, valuation procedures and other guidelines set forth herein, nor does it monitor ongoing compliance with applicable laws.  In the course of advising the Opto Investment Manager and the Investment Manager Affiliates, there are times when the interests of the Limited Partners may differ from those of such entities.  The Fund Legal Advisor does not represent the Limited Partners’ interests in resolving those instances. In reviewing this Memorandum, the Fund Legal Advisor has relied upon information furnished to it by the Opto Investment Manager and the Investment Manager Affiliates and has not investigated or verified the accuracy and completeness of information set forth herein concerning the Fund.
The Fund Legal Advisor’s engagement by the Opto Investment Manager in respect of the Fund is limited to the specific matters as to which it is consulted by the Opto Investment Manager and, therefore, there may exist facts or circumstances which could have a bearing on the Fund’s (or the Opto Investment Manager’s) financial condition or operations with respect to which the Fund Legal Advisor has not been consulted and for which the Fund Legal Advisor expressly disclaims any responsibility.
AUDITORS	The General Partner has engaged Deloitte & Touche LLP to act as auditor to the Fund.
ADMINISTRATOR	Gen II Fund Services, LLC, or such other administrator selected by the General Partner from time to time (the “Administrator”).
AN INVESTMENT IN THE INTERESTS IS SPECULATIVE AND INVOLVES A HIGH DEGREE OF RISK. NO PROSPECTIVE INVESTOR SHOULD HAVE ANY NEED FOR ANY MONIES INVESTED IN THE FUND TO MEET CURRENT NEEDS OR ONGOING FINANCIAL REQUIREMENTS. EACH PROSPECTIVE INVESTOR MUST CAREFULLY ASSESS THE RISKS OF AN INVESTMENT IN THE INTERESTS BEFORE DETERMINING WHETHER TO SUBSCRIBE FOR INTERESTS.
 
RISK FACTORS
The Fund is intended for long-term investors who can accept the significant risks associated with investing in illiquid securities.  An investment in the Fund involves various risk factors, including the possibility of partial or total loss of the capital invested in the Fund, and prospective investors should not subscribe unless they can readily bear the consequences of such loss.  The following is a brief description of certain factors, which prospective investors should carefully consider along with other matters discussed elsewhere in this Memorandum prior to making an investment in the Fund.  The following, however, does not purport to be a comprehensive summary of all the risks associated with an investment in the Fund generally.  Rather, the following risk factors are only certain specific risks to which Limited Partners will be subject, which prospective investors should discuss in detail with their professional advisors.  
All investments involve the risk of the loss of capital. No guarantee or representation is made that the Fund will achieve any of its objectives, including any particular level of returns, or avoid substantial losses. 
The Fund intends to make capital commitments to the Underlying Funds.  The Underlying Funds may purchase certain instruments or utilize certain investment techniques that carry specific risks.
Accordingly, in addition to the risks associated with an investment in the Fund, Fund investors will also be subject indirectly to the risks associated with investments in the Underlying Funds. 
Furthermore, the Underlying Fund Managers may pursue a wide range of investment strategies or techniques, and the General Partner may not have knowledge of, and will have no ability to control, the Underlying Fund Managers’ pursuit of such investment strategies.  In addition, certain risks are inherent in the structure of the Fund itself. 
Except as otherwise expressly provided herein to the contrary, all references in this Memorandum to the discretion of, or actions to be taken by, or determinations to be made by, the General Partner, the Investment Managers or their respective affiliates shall be deemed to be in the sole and absolute discretion of such persons as more fully described in the Partnership Agreement, and each such person will be entitled to consider only such interests and factors as it desires and may consider its own interests and the interests of its affiliates and its determination shall be final, binding and conclusive as to all of the Limited Partners.  Whenever in this Memorandum such person is being required or permitted to make a decision or take an action in its “good faith,” such person will act under such express standard and will not be subject to any other or different standard imposed by law or any other agreement contemplated herein.
Any losses in the Fund will be borne solely by investors in the Fund. Ownership interests in the Fund are not insured by the U.S. Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, and are not deposits, obligations of, or endorsed or guaranteed in any way by, any banking entity.  
Investment in the Underlying Funds; Fund-of-Funds Structure. 
The Fund intends to invest substantially all of its investable net assets in the Underlying Funds and, in so doing, to act as a “fund of funds.”  The Fund will make a capital commitment to, and invest substantially all of its assets (net of reserves for any expenses and any other liabilities and obligations) in, the Underlying Funds. (See “General Business Considerations” below).  Except with respect to Opto Warehouse Transactions, none of the Underlying Funds, any Underlying Fund Manager or any of their respective affiliates is a sponsor or promoter of the Fund, and none of the Underlying Funds, any Underlying Fund Manager or any of their respective affiliates is responsible or answerable to the Investment Managers, the Fund or any Limited Partner for the content, accuracy, completeness, or fairness of this Memorandum.  Neither the General Partner, the Investment Managers nor the Fund takes any part in the management of the Underlying Funds or any Underlying Fund Manager or has any control whatsoever over their investment strategies or policies. Furthermore, other than information that is generally provided to prospective investors in the Underlying Funds, neither the General Partner, the Investment Managers nor the Fund expects to be informed of the Portfolio Investments proposed to be invested in by the Underlying Funds. Consequently, except with respect to Opto Warehouse Transactions, none of the General Partner, the Investment Managers, the Fund or any Limited Partner has any ability to predict the risk exposure level of the Fund’s investment in the Underlying Funds.
In general, the performance of each Underlying Fund is also expected to depend on the services of a limited number of key individuals, the loss of any or all of whom could significantly adversely affect an Underlying Fund’s performance. The terms of the Underlying Funds and the Underlying Fund Managers may change in the future.
Prospective investors should note that the Fund may issue Capital Calls either substantially in advance of a capital call notice being issued to the Fund by the Underlying Funds or in an amount greater than the current expenses and other cash needs of the Fund. Such amounts pre-funded by Limited Partners may be invested in Liquid Investments, which are not expected to earn a substantial return. In addition, prospective investors should further note that each Limited Partner may, as determined by the General Partner in its sole discretion, be required to make additional Capital Contributions in excess of its Capital Commitment, up to the sum of (i) such Limited Partner’s Reserve Commitment at any time during the term of the Fund and for any reason, as more fully described in “SUMMARY OF PRINCIPAL TERMS – RESERVE COMMITMENT,” and (ii) to fund Overdraw Contributions, as more fully described in “SUMMARY OF PRINCIPAL TERMS – OVERDRAW CONTRIBUTIONS”.
Notwithstanding anything in this Memorandum to the contrary, the provisions in this Memorandum shall not be construed as to relieve (or attempt to relieve) any persons from liability (including liability under any U.S. federal securities law, with respect to which liabilities cannot be waived), to the extent (but only to the extent) that such liability may not be waived, modified or limited under applicable law, but shall be construed so as to effectuate the provisions herein to the fullest extent permitted by law.
To the extent the Fund, as a limited partner (or similar interest holder) of the Underlying Funds, votes on an issue related to the affairs of the Underlying Funds, the Fund may vote or abstain the entirety of its interest in the Underlying Funds on such issue as directed by the General Partner in its sole discretion.  The General Partner may submit any such issue to the vote of the Limited Partners, in its sole discretion, in which case, the General Partner may, but is not obligated to, vote the Fund’s entire interest in the Underlying Funds so as to reflect the vote of the Required Limited Partners. 
Moreover, except with respect to Opto Warehouse Transactions, none of the Limited Partners, the General Partner, the Investment Managers or their respective affiliates will have the ability to control the management or operations of the Underlying Funds, the Underlying Fund Managers or any of their affiliates.  However, the Fund, as a limited partner (or similar interest holder) of the Underlying Funds, will have the ability to vote on any matter upon which the limited partners of the Underlying Funds are entitled to vote.
High Growth Industry Related Risks.
In pursuing the Growth Strategy, the Fund intends to have indirect investments in the securities of high-growth companies through Underlying Funds investing in such companies. These securities may be very volatile. In addition, these companies may face undeveloped or limited markets, have limited products, have no proven profit-making history, may operate at a loss or with substantial variations in operating results from period to period, have limited access to capital and/or be in the developmental stages of their businesses, have limited ability to protect their rights to certain patents, copyrights, trademarks and other trade secrets, or be otherwise adversely affected by the extremely competitive markets in which many of their competitors operate.
Expansion Risks. 
Additionally, there are potential risks associated with rapid economic growth impacting a potential high-growth companies. Business infrastructure, including logistics and supply chains, human resources and training, competition for real estate and locations, among others, may create bottlenecks for business growth, thereby delaying an underlying Portfolio Investment’s ability to achieve its projections and consequently reducing the value that may otherwise be achieved through the Growth Strategy. It is not possible for financial projections, upon which certain of the Fund's investment decisions are made, to account for all factors that may affect the ability of a company to grow its business as planned.
General Business Considerations.  
As previously noted, the Fund intends to invest substantially all of its assets in the Underlying Funds.  Investors should be aware that it is intended that the Fund will make aggregate capital commitments to the Underlying Funds in an amount substantially, but not fully, equal to the aggregate Capital Commitments (potentially including the Reserve Commitments and subject to Reinvestable Proceeds), with the balance reserved for expenses, liabilities and/or any other obligations of the Fund, as determined by the General Partner (though no assurances can be given that such reserved amounts will be sufficient to pay any such expenses or cover any such obligations).  Accordingly, negative effects on the business environment in which the Underlying Funds will operate will have a negative effect on the Fund.  
Limited Partners that are admitted (or increasing their Capital Commitments) at Subsequent Closings of the Fund will participate in the Fund’s existing investment, if any, in the Underlying Fund(s), which such investment may have appreciated or depreciated in value since other Limited Partners were admitted (or increased their Capital Commitments) to the Fund.  Although Limited Partners are expected to make additional payments of catchup interest to the Fund, there can be no assurance that such payments will reflect the fair value of the Fund’s existing investment, if any, in the Underlying Funds at the time such payments are made or such Limited Partners are admitted (or increase their Capital Commitments) to the Fund.
Further, each Limited Partner will be required, from time to time, to contribute capital to the Fund, and the Fund, in turn, may invest all or part of any such contributed capital in Liquid Investments, on a temporary or permanent basis, prior to, or in lieu of, investing such capital in the Underlying Funds, which Liquid Investments are not expected to earn a substantial return.  Moreover, Limited Partners may be required to make Capital Contributions to cover shortfalls resulting from, among other things, the Default, or the excuse or exclusion from funding of, one or more Limited Partners or the compulsory withdrawal of a Limited Partner’s Interest, and the Fund furthermore may, as an expense of the Fund, borrow funds under one or more financings, including a subscription line, to cover such shortfalls.  As a result, the returns achieved by the Limited Partners may be significantly lower than if such amounts had been invested directly in the Underlying Funds.
Default.  
The Investment Managers cannot currently predict the timing or amounts of Capital Calls that will be required to be answered by the Limited Partners. Such Capital Calls may be issued on an irregular basis. A Limited Partner that fails to fund its Unfunded Commitment, any of its Overdraw Contributions, or any other amounts required to be funded under the Partnership Agreement, pursuant to a Capital Call when due, is expected to suffer some or all of the negative consequences set forth under “SUMMARY OF PRINCIPAL TERMS – FAILURE TO FUND; DEFAULT; SHORTFALLS” above.  
The Fund may experience difficulty in making up for a shortfall from other sources should a Limited Partner Default on its obligation to fund its Capital Calls.  Other Limited Partners may be required to make additional contributions to replace such shortfall, thereby reducing the diversification of their investments and causing such Limited Partners to contribute additional capital sooner than they otherwise would.  Any Default by one or more Limited Partners could have an adverse effect on the Fund, its investments and the Interests of other Limited Partners.  The General Partner will have the right, in its discretion, to cover shortfalls arising from the Default of a Limited Partner in any manner General Partner deems appropriate under the circumstances (including, without limitation, through the use of a subscription line or other borrowing).
Default by the Fund. 
Prospective investors should note that, in the event the Fund is required to satisfy its indemnification obligations to the Investment Manager Affiliates or in the event of a Default by a Limited Partner or the compulsory redemption of a Limited Partner’s Interest, the Fund may, as a result, be unable to satisfy its indemnification or other obligations to the Underlying Funds, which would result in the default by the Fund, as a limited partner (or similar equity holder) of the Underlying Funds, and the Underlying Fund Managers may apply the default remedies to the Fund, which would have a material adverse effect on the Fund and the Limited Partners.  
Borrowing; Default under a Facility. 
The Fund may borrow money pursuant to a Facility or other loans from a third party or the Warehouse. Such borrowing provides the advantages of leverage but exposes the Fund to capital risk and higher current expenses. The Fund may provide collateral to the third party lender or the Warehouse from which it borrows including, without limitation, by pledging all or a portion of the assets of the Fund, the Capital Commitments, the deposit account into which the Limited Partners fund their Capital Contributions, any revenue streams of the Fund or any other assets as determined by the General Partner. If the Fund is required to delegate the rights to issue drawdown notices and to receive Capital Contributions to a third party or the Warehouse, this procedure will expose the Fund to the risk that, for whatever reason, including, without limitation, the default, insolvency, negligence, misconduct or fraud of such third party lender or the Warehouse, the Fund will not reacquire the ownership of such assets (the “Fund Assets”) upon the repayment by the Fund of such loans. Also, the Fund will be unable to reacquire such Fund Assets if the Fund defaults on such loans. The Fund’s failure or inability to reacquire such Fund Assets from the third party lenders or the Warehouse in whose name the Fund Assets are pledged in support of a loan could involve the Fund in protracted litigation and, potentially, result in the complete loss of such Fund Assets. While the General Partner will cause the Fund to borrow money only from banks it believes to be creditworthy, there can be no absolute certainty that such banks will return such Fund Assets to the Fund upon the repayment of such loans.
To the extent permitted by the Underlying Fund Documents, the Underlying Funds may also borrow funds. Such borrowings may require the applicable Underlying Funds to pledge all or a portion of the property of the Underlying Funds and/or the commitments to the Underlying Funds (including the Fund’s commitments to the Underlying Funds).
Compulsory Sale or Redemption of Interests.
The General Partner may, in its sole discretion cause the redemption or sale of, in whole or in part, a Limited Partner’s Interest, or cause the withdrawal of a Limited Partner from the Fund, or take any other action which the General Partner has determined, in its sole discretion, exercised in good faith, to be necessary or desirable under certain circumstances as more fully described under “SUMMARY OF PRINCIPAL TERMS — COMPULSORY SALE OR REDEMPTION OF INTERESTS” above, including if the General Partner determines that the continued participation of such Limited Partner may cause, the Fund, any Investment Manager Affiliate, the Underlying Funds, any Underlying Fund Manager or any of their respective affiliates, or any Portfolio Investment or potential Portfolio Investment to violate any law, rule or regulation, or if the General Partner determines that such Limited Partner is either a Restricted Governmental Plan or subject to Title I of ERISA of Section 4975 of the Code or in either case, reasonably likely to become so.  Such redemption or sale may cause the Limited Partner to realize a materially lower return than would be the case if such Limited Partner had not been required to redeem or sell its Interest.  A required or discretionary redemption of a Limited Partner’s Interest prior to funding the Limited Partner’s entire Capital Commitment could also have an adverse effect on the remaining Limited Partners.  (See “SUMMARY OF PRINCIPAL TERMS — FAILURE TO FUND; DEFAULT; SHORTFALLS” above).  The General Partner is authorized to seek reimbursement from a Limited Partner whose Interest has been caused to be redeemed or sold by the Limited Partner for losses incurred by the Fund from any actions or omissions of such Limited Partner.
Tax Risks.  
The taxation of partners and partnerships is complex.  There can be no assurance that the structure of the Fund, the Underlying Funds or the Portfolio Investments will be tax-efficient to any Limited Partner. For instance, a direct investment in the Fund may not be suitable for U.S. tax-exempt investors that are not willing to incur UBTI and non-U.S. investors that are not willing to incur ECI or CAI, and such prospective investors may consider investing in a Parallel or Feeder Fund, or may consider establishing a separate investment vehicle, such as a blocker, to invest in the Fund (subject to the approval of the General Partner). Prospective investors should also consider the potential state and local (and non-U.S.) tax consequences of an investment in the Fund. In addition to being taxed in its own state or locality of residence, a beneficial owner of an Interest may be subject to tax return filing obligations and income, franchise and other taxes in state and local (and non-U.S.) jurisdictions in which the Fund operates. The income earned by the Fund could be reduced by income and other taxes, including by way of withholding. In addition, special U.S. tax rules may apply to a Limited Partner’s indirect interest in the investments made directly or indirectly by the Underlying Funds, including in respect of investments in any debt obligations or other securities that have been issued or purchased at a discount, or that have imputed discount, pay-in-kind, dividend accruals or similar features, investments in controlled foreign corporations and/or passive foreign investment companies, and investments in certain flow-through entities, as well as to transactions undertaken directly or indirectly by the Underlying Funds, including certain derivative transactions.
The Fund may recognize income for tax purposes before, or without, receiving cash to distribute to Partners. Partners will be required to report in their tax returns their respective shares of the income, gains, expenses, and losses of the Fund without regard to the amount, if any, of distributions received.  Accordingly, U.S. federal income taxes on a Partner’s allocable share of the Fund’s income may exceed the amount of distributions to such Partner, if any, for a taxable year, so that Partners must be prepared to fund any tax liability from other sources.  
The Fund could be subject to tax and tax return filing obligations in non-U.S. jurisdictions in which the Fund may directly or indirectly invest. In addition, income from investments held directly or indirectly by the Fund could be reduced by withholding taxes or other taxes imposed by non-U.S. jurisdictions in which the Fund directly or indirectly invests, and there can be no assurance that any tax credits may be claimed with respect to such non-U.S. taxes incurred. Potential investors should consult their own tax advisors regarding the non-U.S. tax consequences of an investment in the Fund.
For U.S. federal income tax purposes, the Limited Partners will be treated as partners of the Fund. The Fund may not be able to deliver Schedules K-1 (and Schedules K-2 and K-3 (as applicable)) to Limited Partners prior to April 15 of each year, in which case Limited Partners will be required to obtain extensions for filing their federal, state and local income tax returns.
Tax laws and court and IRS interpretations thereof are subject to change at any time, possibly with retroactive effect.  Prospective investors are urged to discuss potential tax law changes with their tax advisors.
Each prospective investor is urged to consult its own tax advisor as to the tax consequences of an investment in the Fund.
Indemnity Obligation. 
The Fund will be required to indemnify the General Partner, the Investment Managers, the “partnership representative” and the “designated individual” of the Fund (each within the meaning of the Bipartisan Budget Act of 2015), the Administrator, the Fund’s auditor and custodian and each of their respective affiliates, and the former or current shareholders, partners, members, other equity holders, officers, directors, employees, legal representatives, or managers of each of them, and any liquidation representative, for liabilities incurred in connection with the affairs of the Fund. Any such indemnification (and the expenses thereof) will be in addition to the indemnification granted under the Partnership Agreement in respect of the Fund’s indemnity obligations and any indemnification granted under the Underlying Fund Documents. The Fund’s indemnification obligations may be funded by capital calls from the Limited Partners or through the return of distributions previously made to the Limited Partners (subject to the limitations on such recontribution obligations provided in the Partnership Agreement). In addition, the Fund’s assets, including any investments held by the Fund (including cash or cash equivalents), are available to satisfy all liabilities and other obligations of the Fund, including indemnification obligations. If the Fund becomes subject to a liability, including an indemnification liability, parties seeking to have the liability satisfied may have recourse to the assets of the Fund generally and not be limited to any particular asset, such as the asset representing the investment giving rise to the liability. The obligation to fund an indemnification claim will survive the dissolution of the Fund.
Multiple Levels of Fees and Expenses.  
The Limited Partners are investing in the Fund, which in turn will invest in the Underlying Funds, which themselves may be funds of funds. Accordingly, the Limited Partners will directly or indirectly bear their share of the organizational, offering, operating fees and expenses and other compensation (including, as applicable, management fees and carried interest) of the Fund and the Underlying Funds (and, if applicable, any blockers that are established and/or controlled by an Underlying Fund), and the Limited Partners will be subject to higher organizational, offering and operating fees and expenses than if the Limited Partners made investments in the Underlying Funds or Portfolio Investments directly. Similarly, Limited Partners are expected to directly or indirectly bear their share of the organizational, offering, operating fees and expenses (including taxes) associated with any Parallel or Feeder Funds established and controlled by the Fund, General Partner, Investment Managers or any of their respective affiliates, and such organizational, offering and operating fees and expenses may be higher than if the Limited Partners made investments in the Underlying Funds directly. 
Limited Rights of Limited Partners.  
Subject to certain limited rights of the Limited Partners as limited partners of the Fund, all as set forth in the Partnership Agreement, and certain limitations imposed by applicable law, the General Partner has full, exclusive and complete power and discretion, without the need for consent or approval of any Limited Partner, to make all decisions and do all things which it deems necessary or desirable in respect of the Fund.  Subject to applicable law, this power may be delegated in some or many respects to the General Partner’s affiliates, and the General Partner has, in fact, delegated many of its powers to the Investment Managers pursuant to the Investment Management Agreements. The rights of the Fund (as a limited partner (or similar equity holder) of the Underlying Funds) are similarly limited with respect to the management of the Underlying Funds.
Amendments. 
Certain terms governing the Partnership Agreement may generally be amended by the General Partner without the approval of any Limited Partner or with the approval of a Majority-in-Interest of Limited Partners. The changes reflected by such amendments may include changes in admissions and withdrawals of Limited Partners, corrections of ambiguous, false or erroneous provisions, changing the name of the Fund, additions to the representations, duties or obligations of the Fund or the General Partner or surrendering any right or power granted to the Fund or the General Partner therein, compliance with applicable laws and regulations, including, without limitation, to effect amendments, which the General Partner determines advisable in its sole discretion, to assure compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, exercise of any rights against a Defaulting Limited Partner, or the establishment and operation of any feeder funds.  Any such amendment or waiver may be considered adverse by the Limited Partners who did not support the amendment or waiver.
Lack of Independent Experts Representing Limited Partners.  
While the General Partner and the Opto Investment Manager have consulted with counsel, accountants and other experts regarding the structure and terms of the Fund, such counsel, accountants and other experts do not represent the Limited Partners. Alston & Bird LLP, which represents the Opto Investment Manager and certain Investment Manager Affiliates, does not represent the Limited Partners.
The General Partner urges each prospective investor to consult its own legal, tax and financial advisers regarding the desirability of investing in the Fund and its suitability for such prospective investor in view of such prospective investor’s particular circumstances and risk tolerances.
Reliability of Valuations.
The Underlying Funds are expected to rely on the Underlying Fund Managers for valuation of the Underlying Funds’ respective assets and liabilities. The Underlying Funds are expected to primarily hold securities and other assets that will not have readily assessable market values. In such instances, it is anticipated that the Underlying Fund Managers will determine the fair value of such securities and assets in their reasonable judgment based on various factors and may rely on internal pricing models.  The amount and timing of any carried interest received by the Underlying Fund Managers with respect to the Underlying Funds may depend in part on the value of such Underlying Funds’ assets and liabilities. If the valuations made by the Underlying Fund Managers are incorrect, the amount of any carried interest received by the Underlying Fund Managers, or the timing of receipt of carried interest, could also be incorrect.  Such valuations may not be indicative of what the actual fair market value of the Portfolio Investments made by the Underlying Funds would be in an active, liquid, or established market. The ultimate values of realized Portfolio Investments by the Underlying Funds may differ from the values reported by the Underlying Funds to the Fund and the Investment Managers and the ultimate amount realized from an investment in the Fund may differ from the value of Interests reported to Limited Partners.
Availability of Information.  
The Underlying Fund Managers are expected to have the right to limit the type and amount of information provided to the Fund in respect of the Underlying Funds’ operation and performance, thereby severely limiting the Investment Managers’ ability to verify initially or on a continuing basis any representations made by the Underlying Funds or the investment strategies being employed. This may result in significant losses to the Fund based on investment strategies and positions employed by the Underlying Funds or other actions of which the Investment Managers have limited or no knowledge. The Investment Managers will not have the ability to review or monitor the investments made by the Underlying Funds.  Recent events have highlighted the possibility that advisers to private funds may act in a manner so as to defraud investors.  
Annual Financial Information.  
The Fund will provide annual financial information to Limited Partners. However, since the nature and timing of that information is dependent, to a large extent, on the reporting activities of the Underlying Funds, there can be no assurance that the format of such information or the timing of its distribution will be sufficient for investors to determine their tax liability, if any, under the requirements of their respective jurisdictions or to make such determinations on a timely basis.  
Limited or No Operating Histories.  
The Fund has no operating history, and the Underlying Funds are expected to have no or limited operating history. Further, the results of previous investment vehicles managed by the Investment Manager Affiliates are not a guarantee or indication of future performance.  There is no assurance that the Underlying Fund Managers, the Fund or the Underlying Funds will achieve their investment objectives, and any investments in the Underlying Funds could result in a partial or total loss for the Fund and, in turn, the Limited Partners.  
Fraudulent Activities. 
The Investment Managers are not expected to be in a position to monitor the accuracy of information provided by the Underlying Fund Managers and their affiliates, including information that the Underlying Fund Managers or any of their affiliates may knowingly, negligently or otherwise withhold or misrepresent regarding the Underlying Funds’ performance, including the presence or effects of any fraudulent or similar activities (“Fraudulent Activities”), nor would it generally have the opportunity to discover such situations prior to the time the applicable Investment Manager discloses (or there is public disclosure of) the presence or effects of any Fraudulent Activities.  Accordingly, the Investment Managers cannot offer any assurances that the Underlying Fund Managers or their affiliates will not engage in Fraudulent Activities or that the Investment Managers will have the opportunity or ability to protect the Fund from suffering a loss because of any of the Underlying Fund Managers’ or any of their affiliate’s Fraudulent Activities.  There can be no assurance that the Underlying Fund Managers or the entities they advise will comply with all applicable laws and that assets entrusted to the Underlying Fund Managers or their affiliates will be protected.
Fund, Underlying Funds Not Registered.  
Neither the Fund nor the Underlying Funds will be registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended (the “Investment Company Act”). The Investment Company Act provides certain protections to investors and imposes certain restrictions on registered investment companies, none of which will be applicable to the Fund or the Underlying Funds. 
The Interests in the Fund and limited partnership interests (or similar equity interests) of the Underlying Funds have not been and will not be registered under the Securities Act or the securities laws of any State or any other jurisdiction.  The offering contemplated by this Memorandum will be made in reliance upon an exemption from the registration requirements of the Securities Act for offers and sales of securities that do not involve any public offering, and analogous exemptions under state securities laws.
Protection of Confidentiality.
As discussed under “SUMMARY OF PRINCIPAL TERMS – CONFIDENTIALITY,” Limited Partners will be required to keep confidential and will not be permitted to disclose any information relating to the Fund, the Underlying Funds or the Underlying Fund Managers furnished to the Fund that is subsequently disclosed to the Limited Partners from time to time.  To protect the sensitive nature of such information, the General Partner, in its discretion, may withhold all or certain information on a Limited Partner-by-Limited Partner basis, including, without limitation, to comply with requests from the Underlying Fund Managers with respect to the withholding of such information.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, or anything else contained in this Memorandum, Limited Partners may be permitted to disclose such information in certain circumstances and to certain persons, including disclosure regarding U.S. federal or state income tax treatment and tax structure, as further described herein.  
Accelerated Drawdowns for Certain Limited Partners.  
Excess Contributions called by the General Partner will be set aside by the General Partner in reserve or held in escrow. As a result, while held in reserve or escrow the Excess Contributions are expected to obtain nominal or no returns. Further, because Excess Contributions will not constitute a Capital Contribution or reduce any Pre-Funding Limited Partner’s Unfunded Commitment until, and only to the extent that, any Capital Contributions are required to be made by the Pre-Funding Limited Partners with Excess Contributions pursuant to capital calls issued to all Limited Partners, Excess Contributions will not be invested in the Underlying Funds (or, unless determined by the General Partner in its sole discretion, otherwise) and will not earn any return in respect of the Underlying Funds’ investments. Therefore, Pre-Funding Limited Partners that make Excess Contributions are expected to obtain a lower rate of return on their investment in the Fund than Limited Partners that are not Pre-Funding Limited Partners.
Laws and Regulations Governing the Internet. 
The future success of many, if not all, Underlying Funds and their Portfolio Investments, may depend upon the continued use of the internet as a primary medium for commerce, communication and business services. Changes in laws and regulations related to the internet or changes in the infrastructure of the internet itself may diminish the demand for Portfolio Investments’ products, including software solutions. U.S. federal, U.S. state or foreign government bodies or agencies have in the past adopted, and may in the future adopt, laws and regulations affecting the use of the internet as a commercial medium. Portfolio Investments may be required to modify their products in compliance with such changes in laws and regulations. Further, domestic and foreign government agencies and private organizations may begin to impose taxes, fees or other charges for accessing the internet or for the commerce conducted via the internet. Such charges and regimes could limit the growth of internet-related commerce or communications generally or reduce demand for internet-based products and business services, which may negative impact the Portfolio Investments.
Potential Ownership in the Opto Platform.
One or more of the Underlying Fund Managers (each, collectively with its affiliates and subsidiaries, a “Sponsor”) and/or the broker-dealer or investment adviser of an investor in the Fund (each, collectively with its affiliates and subsidiaries, such investor’s “RIA”), may directly or indirectly own a passive minority share of the outstanding equity securities of Opto Investments, Inc., which wholly owns each of the General Partner and the Opto Investment Manager. Any such relationship could create conflicts of interest whereby, for example, the Opto Investment Manager and its affiliates may be more inclined (i) to establish access funds or funds of funds (including the Fund) (a) for clients of an RIA, than for clients for other investment advisers or broker-dealers, (b) for investment in investment funds sponsored or managed by a Sponsor, than for investment in investment funds sponsored or managed by other fund managers, (c) than the Opto Investment Manager and its affiliates would otherwise be inclined to do so, or upon terms and conditions more favorable to a Sponsor or an RIA than the Opto Investment Manager and its affiliates would otherwise agree to; (ii) to make positive statements about the Sponsors, the Underlying Funds and their affiliates in order to encourage investors to make larger commitments to the securities offered by feeder funds or funds of funds (including the Fund) sponsored or managed by the Opto Investment Manager and its affiliates or to the securities offered by Underlying Funds, thereby increasing the fees paid to the Opto Investment Manager or its affiliates; or (iii) to vote or exercise feeder funds’ or funds of funds’ (including the Fund’s) consent rights, if any, in respect of its interests in an Underlying Fund in a manner more favorable to the applicable Sponsor or RIA than the Opto Investment Manager or its affiliates would otherwise vote or exercise in the absence of such compensation.
Co-Investment Opportunities.  
The General Partner and certain Underlying Funds may offer co-investment opportunities with respect to certain investments to be made by such Underlying Funds or otherwise and may allocate any such opportunities among interested parties in the General Partner’s or the applicable Underlying Fund Managers’ discretion or according to other methodologies. The General Partner may in its discretion offer to any person, including the Fund, the right to participate in all or any portion of any co-investment opportunities offered by the General Partner or the Underlying Funds.
Co-Investment Management Structure; Opto Investment Manager Consent Right
As more fully described in the “Summary of Terms – Co-Investment Management Agreements”, the General Partner, on behalf of the Fund, has entered or will enter into a co-investment advisory relationship whereby (i) the General Partner, at the direction of the Waypoint Investment Manager, which shall have discretion over the Fund’s investments during the Commitment Period, will cause the Fund to make one or more capital commitments or follow-on capital commitments to one or more Underlying Funds, which investments will be funded solely by Capital Contributions by the Advisory Class Limited Partners and the Non-Advisory Class Limited Partners and not the Warehouse, and (ii) to the extent the Warehouse continues to be a Limited Partner after the expiration of the Commitment Period, the Opto Investment Manager will have consent rights over the Fund’s investment of Capital Contributions of the Warehouse and the other Limited Partners during the balance of the Investment Period. 
In such circumstance, the Opto Investment Manager will be under no obligation to consent to any prospective Fund investment proposed by the Waypoint Investment Manager, and in the event the Opto Investment Manager does not consent to one or more such proposed Fund investments, no such Fund investments will be made. As a result, the Fund’s return profile could be materially altered and its returns negatively impacted. For example, such a lack of further Fund investments may significantly diminish the return potential of the Fund or result in excess concentration in earlier investments. Further, under such circumstances, if the Opto Investment Manager does not consent to one or more further Fund investments after the end of the Commitment Period, Limited Partners will not have a withdrawal right as a result thereof but will remain obligated to answer Capital Calls for the balance of their remaining Capital Commitments through the Investment Period and for post-Investment Period purposes.
Handling of Mail
Mail addressed to the Fund and received at its registered office will be forwarded unopened to the forwarding address supplied by the Fund to be dealt with.  None of the Fund, the General Partner or any of its or their directors, officers, advisors or service providers will bear any responsibility for any delay howsoever caused in mail reaching the forwarding address.  In particular the Directors of the General Partner will only receive, open or deal directly with mail which is addressed to them personally (as opposed to mail which is addressed just to the Fund).
Risks Associated with Private Equity Focused Underlying Funds
	Regulation and Enforcement of the Private Equity Industry.  The growth of the private equity industry, and the increasing size and reach of transactions has prompted additional government and public attention to the private equity industry and its practices.  In addition, numerous regulatory initiatives have been launched and significant legislations has been enacted as a result of the severe global market volatility and dislocations, financial institution failures and defaults and large financial frauds.  Regulation generally, as well as regulation more specifically addressed to the private equity industry, including tax laws and regulation, whether in the U.S. or outside of it, could increase the cost of acquiring, holding or divesting Portfolio Investments, the profitability of enterprises and the cost of operating the Underlying Funds, and in turn, the Fund, or the ability of an Underlying Fund to engage in certain transactions.  Additional regulation could also increase the risk of third party litigation.  The transaction nature of the business of the Fund exposes the Fund, the General Partner and the Investment Managers to these risks of third party litigation.  Under the Partnership Agreement, the Fund will generally be responsible for indemnifying the General Partner, the Investment Managers and their affiliates for costs they may incur with respect to such litigation.
General Economic and Market Conditions Risk for Private Equity Investments.  The Fund’s investment strategy will include investments in Underlying Funds that pursue or otherwise relate to private equity investment strategies, among other strategies. As such, the success of the Underlying Funds’ activities may be affected by general economic and market conditions, such as interest rates, availability of credit, inflation rates, economic uncertainty, changes in laws and national and international political circumstances.  These factors may affect the level and volatility of security prices and liquidity of the Underlying Funds’ investments.  Unexpected volatility or illiquidity could impair the Underlying Funds’ profitability or result in its suffering losses.
Difficulty of Locating Suitable Investments; Competitive Marketplace. The success of an Underlying Fund will depend on the ability of the applicable Underlying Fund Manager to identify suitable investments, to negotiate the purchase of these investments at a price and on terms acceptable to the Underlying Fund, to arrange the closing of appropriate transactions and to arrange the timely disposition of investments on favorable terms. There can be no assurances that there will be a sufficient number of suitable investment opportunities to enable an Underlying Fund to invest all of its committed capital in opportunities that satisfy the Underlying Fund’s investment objective or that such investment opportunities will lead to completed investments by the Underlying Fund. Additionally, identification of attractive investment opportunities generally will be subject to market conditions. An Underlying Fund may also face increasing competition for such opportunities over time. The investment opportunities an Underlying Fund identifies may be through auctions or limited auctions where there is a substantial amount of competition among prospective buyers of these companies, including other private equity firms. There can be no assurances that once an investment opportunity is identified the seller will select an Underlying Fund to make an investment. Further, even if an Underlying Fund is selected, there can be no assurances that the investment will still be deemed an appropriate investment opportunity for the Underlying Fund after due diligence is completed.
Control Person Liability. An Underlying Fund may hold controlling interests in certain Portfolio Investments. The exercise of control over a Portfolio Investment may impose additional risks of liability for environmental damage, product defects, pension and other fringe benefits, failure to supervise management, failure to withhold and make tax payments, violation of laws, and governmental regulation (including securities laws), and other types of liability for which the limited liability generally characteristic of business ownership may be ignored. If these liabilities were to arise, an Underlying Fund might suffer a significant loss. The exercise of control over a Portfolio Investment could expose the assets of the Underlying Fund to claims by the Portfolio Investment, its security holders, and its creditors. An Underlying Fund could still incur significant costs in defending those claims, even in the case that the Underlying Fund is a prevailing party.
Non-Controlling Investments. While an Underlying Fund may hold controlling interests in Portfolio Investments, it may also hold non-controlling interests in certain Portfolio Investments. As a condition of making non-controlling investments in Portfolio Investments, an Underlying Fund may seek to obtain appropriate shareholder rights to protect the Underlying Fund’s investment, or it may not be possible to obtain such rights in all cases. If an Underlying Fund does not have a controlling position or shareholder rights to protect its interests, it is possible the Portfolio Investment or other shareholders could take actions that negatively impact the value of the Underlying Fund’s investments or that prevent the Underlying Fund from disposing of its investments in the Portfolio Investment.
Nature and Illiquidity of Investments. It is anticipated that a substantial portion of some of the Underlying Funds’ investments will be highly illiquid, and there can be no assurances that an Underlying Fund will be able to realize a positive return on such investments. The illiquidity of such an Underlying Fund’s investments may be the result of several factors, including, without limitation, the following:
(i)	It is anticipated that such an Underlying Fund will generally invest in illiquid securities of privately held companies. Such an Underlying Fund may seek to generate returns by selling these securities in a private sale to a strategic buyer or to another private equity firm. There can be no assurances that such an Underlying Fund will be able to complete sales of Portfolio Investment securities at attractive prices and otherwise on acceptable terms and conditions.
(ii)	Such an Underlying Fund may also attempt to sell Portfolio Investment securities in a public offering. Any such public offering of securities would require a substantial investment of time and attention by the applicable Underlying Fund Manager and other key investment professionals and a substantial cash expense by the Portfolio Investment whose securities are being registered, in part because the laws of the United States and the various countries in which such securities may be offered, and the regulations of applicable securities exchanges.
Risks in Effecting Operating Improvements. In some cases, the success of an Underlying Fund’s investment strategy will depend, in part, on the ability of the Underlying Fund to restructure and effect improvements in the operations of a Portfolio Investment of such Underlying Fund. The activity of identifying and implementing restructuring programs and operating improvements at Portfolio Investments entails a high degree of uncertainty. There can be no assurance that the Underlying Funds will be able to successfully identify and implement such restructuring programs and improvements.
Investments Longer than Term. It is anticipated that some Underlying Funds may make certain investments that may not be advantageously disposed of prior to the date that such Underlying Fund will be dissolved, either by expiration of its term or otherwise. Although it is expected that the Underlying Fund Managers generally expect that investments by their Underlying Funds will be disposed of prior to dissolution of the Underlying Funds or be suitable for in-kind distribution at dissolution, an Underlying Fund may have to sell, distribute or otherwise dispose of investments at a disadvantageous time as a result of its dissolution. In addition, upon the dissolution of an Underlying Fund, it is expected that its Underlying Fund Manager generally will be required to use reasonable efforts to reduce to cash and cash equivalents such assets of the Underlying Fund as its Underlying Fund Manager or the liquidator shall deem it advisable to sell. There can be no assurances with respect to the time frame in which the winding up and the final distribution of proceeds of any Underlying Fund will occur, which in turn may affect the dissolution of the Fund.
Investments by Underlying Funds with Third Parties in Partnerships and Other Entities. Any Underlying Fund may co-invest with third parties through partnerships, joint ventures or other entities. Such investments may involve risks in connection with such third-party involvement, including the possibility that a third-party partner or co-venturer may have financial difficulties, resulting in a negative impact on such investment, may have economic or business interests or goals that are inconsistent with those of such Underlying Fund, or may be in a position to take (or block) action in a manner contrary to such Underlying Fund’s investment objectives. In addition, such Underlying Fund may in certain circumstances be liable for the actions of its third-party partners or co-venturers. Furthermore, if a co-venturer defaults on its funding obligations, such Underlying Fund may be required to make up the shortfall. Investments made with third parties in partnerships, joint ventures or other entities may involve carried interest and/or other fees payable to such third-party partners or co-venturers. In those circumstances where such third parties involve a management group, such third parties may receive compensation relating to such investments, including incentive compensation.
Operating and Financial Risks of Portfolio Investments. Companies in which an Underlying Fund invests could deteriorate as a result of, among other factors, an adverse development in their business, a change in the competitive environment or an economic downturn. As a result, companies which an Underlying Fund expects to be stable may operate at a loss or have significant variations in operating results, may require substantial additional capital to support their operations or to maintain their competitive position, or may otherwise have a weak financial condition or be experiencing financial distress. In some cases, the success of an Underlying Fund’s investment strategy will depend, in part, on the ability of the Underlying Fund to restructure and effect improvements in the operations of a Portfolio Investment. The activity of identifying and implementing restructuring programs and operating improvements at Portfolio Investments entails a high degree of uncertainty. There can be no assurance that an Underlying Fund will be able to successfully identify and implement such restructuring programs and improvements.
Investments in Restructurings. An Underlying Fund may make investments in restructurings that involve a Portfolio Investment that is experiencing or is expected to experience financial difficulties. These financial difficulties may never be overcome and may cause such Portfolio Investment to become subject to bankruptcy proceedings. Such investments could, in certain circumstances, subject such Underlying Fund to certain additional liabilities that may exceed the value of the original investment. For example, under certain circumstances, a lender who has inappropriately exercised control over the management and policies of a debtor may have its claims subordinated or disallowed or may be found liable for damages suffered by parties as a result of such action. In addition, under certain circumstances, payments by a Portfolio Investment to an Underlying Fund and distributions by such Underlying Fund to the Fund may be reclaimed, and in turn may be reclaimed from the Limited Partners, if any such payment or distribution is later determined to have been a fraudulent conveyance, preferential payment or similar transaction under applicable bankruptcy and insolvency laws. Furthermore, investments in restructurings may be adversely affected by local statutes relating to, among other things, fraudulent conveyances, voidable preferences, lender liability and the bankruptcy court’s discretionary power to disallow, subordinate or disenfranchise particular claims. Investments in restructurings involving non-U.S. Portfolio Investments may therefore be subject to additional risks because non-U.S. local statutes may be different or more uncertain than similar U.S. laws and regulations relating to bankruptcy and reorganizations.
Investments in Distressed Debt Securities. An Underlying Fund may make investments in distressed debt securities that are inherently speculative and subject to a high degree of risk. Portfolio Investments experiencing financial distress are often those operating at a loss or with substantial variations in operating results from period to period. Portfolio Investments experiencing financial distress may be involved in insolvency proceedings and have the need for substantial additional capital to support continued operations or to improve their financial condition and may have very high amounts of leverage. Distressed Portfolio Investments typically are in default under or have a significant risk of an inability to service their debt obligations, especially during an economic downturn or periods of rising interest rates, may not have access or more traditional methods of financing and may be unable to repay debt by refinancing. The value of distressed debt securities tend to be more volatile and may have increased price sensitivity to changing interest rates and adverse economic and business developments than other securities. Distressed debt securities are often more sensitive to company-specific developments and changes in economic conditions than other securities. Further, distressed debt securities are often unsecured and may be subordinated to senior debt.
Investments in Convertible Debt. An Underlying Fund may make investments in convertible debt securities to the extent that such investments are believed to offer potential for capital appreciation. There is not expected to be a minimum credit standard that is a prerequisite to an Underlying Fund’s investment in any security, and debt securities and preferred stock that offer potential for capital appreciation are unlikely to be investment grade. An Underlying Fund may invest in debt and preferred securities which are rated in the lower rating categories by the various credit rating agencies or in comparable nonrated securities. Securities in the lower rating categories and comparable non-rated securities are subject to greater risk of loss of principal and interest than higher-rated and comparable non-rated securities.
Nature of Certain Underlying Funds’ Investments. An Underlying Fund may invest in business enterprises involved in work-outs, liquidations, spin-offs, reorganizations, bankruptcies and similar transactions and the purchase of high risk receivables. In any investment opportunity involving such business enterprises, there exists the risk that the transaction in which such business enterprise is involved either will be unsuccessful, take considerable time or will result in a distribution of cash or a new security the value of which will be less than the purchase price to the Underlying Fund of the security or other financial instrument in respect of which such distribution is received. Similarly, if an anticipated transaction does not in fact occur, the Underlying Fund may be required to sell its investment at a loss. In addition, troubled company investments may be adversely affected by federal and state laws relating to, among other things fraudulent conveyances, voidable preferences, lender liability and a bankruptcy court’s discretionary power to disallow, subordinate or disenfranchise particular claims. Investments in securities or private claims of troubled companies made in connection with an attempt to influence a restructuring proposal or plan of reorganization in a bankruptcy case may also involve substantial litigation. Because there is substantial uncertainty concerning the outcome of transactions involving financially troubled companies in which an Underlying Fund may invest, there is a potential risk of loss by such Underlying Fund of its entire investment in such a company. An Underlying Fund’s investments in trade claims and high risk receivables may also entail special risks including, but not limited to, fraud on the part of the assignor of the trade claim, as well as logistical and mechanical issues that may affect the ability of the Underlying Fund or its agent to collect the claim in whole or in part.
Material, Non-Public Information. Certain employees of an Underlying Fund Manager or an Underlying Fund and/or its respective affiliates may acquire confidential or material non-public information or be restricted from initiating transactions in certain securities. Any such Underlying Fund may not be free to act upon any such information. Due to these restrictions, an Underlying Fund may not be able to initiate a transaction that it otherwise might have initiated and may not be able to sell an investment that it otherwise might have sold.
Bankruptcy of Portfolio Investments. An Underlying Fund may make investments in Portfolio Investments that may experience financial difficulties and become insolvent or file for bankruptcy protection. Various U.S. federal and state and non‐U.S. laws in connection with such bankruptcy proceedings could operate to the detriment of an Underlying Fund. There is also a risk that a court may subordinate an Underlying Fund’s investment to other creditors or require the Underlying Fund to return amounts previously paid to it by a Portfolio Investment that became insolvent or files for bankruptcy, a risk that could increase if the Underlying Fund has management rights in such Portfolio Investment.
Due Diligence of and Conduct at Portfolio Investments. It is anticipated that, before making Portfolio Investments, an Underlying Fund Manager will typically conduct due diligence that they deem reasonable and appropriate based on the facts and circumstances applicable to each portfolio investment. Due diligence may entail evaluation of important and complex business, financial, tax, accounting, environmental, social, governance and legal issues. When conducting due diligence and making an assessment regarding an investment, an Underlying Fund Manager is expected to rely on the resources available to it, possibly including information provided by the target of the investment and, in some circumstances, third-party investigations. Any due diligence investigation that an Underlying Fund Manager carries out with respect to any investment opportunity may not reveal or highlight all relevant facts that may be necessary or helpful in evaluating such investment opportunity. Moreover, such an investigation will not necessarily result in the portfolio investment being successful. There can be no assurance that attempts to provide downside protection with respect to portfolio investments will achieve their desired effect. There can be no assurance that an Underlying Fund Manager will be able to detect or prevent irregular accounting, employee misconduct or other fraudulent practices during the due diligence phase or during its efforts to monitor the portfolio investment on an ongoing basis or that any risk management procedures implemented by the Underlying Fund will be adequate. In the event of fraud by any Portfolio Investment or any of its affiliates, an Underlying Fund may suffer a partial or total loss of capital invested in that Portfolio Investment. An additional concern is the possibility of material misrepresentation or omission on the part of the Portfolio Investment or the seller. Such inaccuracy or incompleteness may adversely affect the value of an Underlying Fund’s securities and/or instruments in such Portfolio Investment. It is anticipated that an Underlying Fund generally will rely upon the accuracy and completeness of representations made by Portfolio Investments and/or their former owners in the due diligence process to the extent reasonable when it makes its investments but cannot guarantee such accuracy or completeness. Under certain circumstances, payments to an Underlying Fund may be reclaimed if any such payment or distribution is later determined to have been a fraudulent conveyance or a preferential payment. Consultants, legal advisors, appraisers, accountants, investment banks and other third parties may be involved in the due diligence process and/or the ongoing operation of an Underlying Fund’s Portfolio Investments to varying degrees depending on the type of investment. Such involvement of third-party advisors or consultants may present a number of risks, primarily relating to an Underlying Fund Manager’s reduced control of the functions that are outsourced.
Contingent Liabilities on Disposition of Investments. In connection with the disposition of an investment in a Portfolio Investment, an Underlying Fund may be required to make representations about the business and financial affairs of such Portfolio Investment typical of those made in connection with the sale of a business. Such Underlying Fund also may be required to indemnify the purchasers of such investment to the extent that any such representations are inaccurate or with respect to certain potential liabilities. These arrangements may result in the incurrence of contingent liabilities for which the Underlying Fund Manager of such Underlying Fund may establish reserves or escrows. In that regard, the Fund may be required to return amounts distributed to it to fund obligations of such Underlying Fund, including indemnity obligations, subject to certain limitations set forth in the operating agreement of such Underlying Fund. Any return of such amounts by the Fund may ultimately have to be funded by Limited Partners to the extent required under the Partnership Agreement.
Risks Associated with Venture Capital Focused Underlying Funds
Risk Inherent in Venture Capital Investments. The types of investments that some of the Underlying Funds will target involve a high degree of risk. Some of the Underlying Funds are expected to seek to make venture capital investments in companies and businesses that are in the early and growth stages of development. Such early-stage and growth-stage companies may include companies that utilize advanced science, technology, engineering, and/or mathematics to innovate in markets, in which the Underlying Fund Managers believe that the companies’ expertise and experience provide an edge in the sourcing, evaluation, and/or strategic advising and operation of the companies. However, such investing involves a high degree of business and financial risk that can result in substantial losses including the potential for a loss of an investor’s entire investment. In order for an Underlying Fund to succeed, it generally must be able to accurately identify potentially successful enterprises, a process which is difficult even for those with extensive experience in the field and/or extensive experience or expertise in the fields in which such companies operate. Portfolio Investments may be operating at a loss or with substantial variations in operating results from period to period and may need substantial additional capital to support expansion or to achieve or maintain a competitive position and such additional capital may not be available from any given source in any given case. Many of the companies targeted for investment by the Underlying Funds are expected to be founded on new technologies or developments which, assuming successful development of practical applications, will provide platforms for a variety of products that will not have been tested in the commercial markets. Accordingly, there can be no assurance that appropriate markets will exist for a Portfolio Investment’s products. Even if a market does exist, there can be no assurance that any Portfolio Investment will be profitable or that substantial losses will not occur. Even growth companies often experience unexpected problems in the areas of product or service development, manufacturing, marketing, financing, and general management, which, in some cases, cannot be adequately solved. In addition, such Portfolio Investments may require substantial amounts of financing which may not be available through institutional private placements or the public markets.
Venture Capital Industry Risks. Some of the Underlying Funds are expected to concentrate their investments in Portfolio Investments operating in the venture capital industry generally. Concentration in the venture capital industry may involve risks greater than those generally associated with more diversified funds and may experience significant fluctuations in returns. The venture capital industry is challenged by various factors, including rapidly changing market conditions and participants, new competing products and services and improvements in existing products and services. Some of the Underlying Funds’ Portfolio Investments may compete in this volatile environment. There is no assurance that products or services sold by such Portfolio Investments will not be rendered obsolete or adversely affected by competing products and services, new technologies or other challenges, or that such Portfolio Investments or the Underlying Funds will be able to adequately enforce intellectual property rights. Instability, fluctuation or an overall decline within venture capital industry may not be balanced by investments in other industries not so affected. If the venture capital industry declines or one of the Underlying Funds’ Portfolio Investments is unable to adequately enforce its intellectual property rights, returns to the Fund may decrease.
Certain venture capital companies may have asset and liability structures that are essentially monetary in nature and are directly affected by many factors, including domestic and international economic and political conditions, broad trends in business and finance, legislation and regulation affecting the national and international business and financial communities, monetary and fiscal policies, interest rates, inflation, currency values, market conditions, the availability and cost of short-term or long-term funding and capital, the credit capacity or perceived creditworthiness of customers and counterparties, and the level and volatility of trading markets. Such factors can impact customers and counterparties of venture capital companies and the value of their products and services. Fluctuations in interest rates, which affect the value of assets and the cost of funding liabilities, are not predictable or controllable, may vary from country to country and may impact economic activity in various regions.
The profitability of the venture capital industry generally may be adversely affected by a worsening of general economic conditions in domestic and international markets and by monetary, fiscal or other policies that are adopted by various governmental authorities and international bodies. Monetary policies have had, and will continue to have, significant effects on the operations, customers and results of venture capital companies. There can be no assurance that a particular venture capital company will not experience a material adverse effect on its net interest income in a changing interest rate environment. Factors such as the liquidity of the global financial markets, the level and volatility of prices of financial instruments, investor sentiment and the availability and cost of credit may significantly affect the activity levels of customers with respect to size, number and timing of transactions. A market downturn would likely lead to a decline in the volume of transactions that financial services institutions execute for their customers and thus lead to a decline in revenues from fees, commissions and spreads.
Within the venture capital industry, the development of products generally is a costly and time-consuming process. There can be no assurance that the product development efforts of the Portfolio Investments will be successfully completed, that specific products will be manufactured in adequate quantities at an acceptable cost and with appropriate quality, or that such products can be successfully marketed or achieve customer acceptance.
The venture capital industry is extremely competitive, and it is expected that competitive conditions therein will continue to intensify. Merger activity in the venture capital industry has resulted in, and is expected to continue to result in, larger companies and businesses with greater financial and other resources that are capable of offering a wider array of financial technology products and services than generally many be offered by the Portfolio Investments in which the Underlying Funds invests. The venture capital industry has become considerably more concentrated as numerous venture capital companies have been acquired by or merged into other institutions. Technological advances and the growth of ecommerce have made it possible for non-venture capital companies to offer products and services that have been traditionally offered by venture capital companies. It is also expected that cross-industry competition will continue to intensify.
Risk of Early-Stage Investments. Some of the Underlying Funds’ investment strategies, by their nature, will involve substantial business, financial, market and legal risks. Among these risks are the general risks associated with investing in companies at the early or growth-stage of development or with limited operating history, companies operating at a loss or with substantial variations in operating results from period to period, companies with the need for substantial additional capital to support expansion or to achieve or maintain a competitive position and companies dependent on new or developing technology. There generally will be little or no publicly available information regarding the status and prospects of these companies. Such companies may face intense competition, including competition from companies with greater financial resources, more extensive development, manufacturing, marketing and service capabilities and a larger number of qualified managerial and technical personnel. There can be no assurance that the development or marketing efforts of any particular Portfolio Investment will be successful or that its business will be profitable. There can be no assurance that the Underlying Fund Managers will correctly evaluate the nature and magnitude of the various factors that could affect the value of such investments. Prices of the investments may be volatile, and a variety of other factors that are inherently difficult to predict, such as domestic or international economic and political developments, may significantly affect the results of the Underlying Funds’ activities. As a result, the Underlying Funds’ performance over a particular period may not necessarily be indicative of the results that may be expected in future periods.
Certain Portfolio Investments may be unseasoned, unprofitable or have no established operating histories or earnings and may lack technical, marketing, financial and other resources. Less-established companies tend to have lower capitalization and fewer resources, and therefore, are often more vulnerable to financial failure. These companies may be dependent upon the success of one product or service, a unique distribution channel, or the effectiveness of its manager or management team. The failure of this one product, service or distribution channel, or the loss or ineffectiveness of a key executive or executives within the management team may have a materially adverse impact on such companies. Although the Underlying Fund Managers may seek to aid or influence certain of its investment companies, the Underlying Funds are not expected to have an active role in the day-to-day management of the Portfolio Investments in which they invest. To the extent that the management of a Portfolio Investment performs poorly, the applicable Underlying Fund’s investment in such company could be adversely affected. Furthermore, these companies may be more vulnerable to competition and to overall economic condition than larger, more established entities.
In early-stage enterprises, a major risk exists that a proposed service or product cannot be developed successfully with the resources available to the Portfolio Investment. There is no assurance that the development efforts of any Portfolio Investment will be successful or, if successful, will be completed within the budget or time period originally estimated. The services and products may also be subject to a high degree of technical obsolescence. There is no assurance that any Portfolio Investment can successfully develop future generations of its services or products. Additional funds may be necessary to complete such development, and there is no assurance that such funds will be available from any particular source.
The receptiveness of potential acquirers to the Underlying Funds’ Portfolio Investments is expected to vary over time and, even if a given Portfolio Investment is disposed of pursuant to a merger, consolidation or similar transaction, the applicable Underlying Fund’s stock, security or other interests in the surviving entity may not be marketable. The public market for high technology and other emerging growth companies is volatile. Such volatility may adversely affect the development of Portfolio Investments, the ability of the Underlying Funds to dispose of investments and the value of investment securities on the date of sale or distribution. In particular, the receptiveness of the public market to initial public offerings by the Underlying Funds’ Portfolio Investments may vary dramatically from period to period. An otherwise successful Portfolio Investment may yield poor investment returns if it is unable to consummate an initial public offering, the applicable Underlying Fund’s or the Portfolio Investment’s securities typically will be subject to contractual “lock-up”, securities law or other restrictions which may, for a material period of time, prevent the Fund from disposing of such securities. There can be no guarantee that any investment will result in a liquidity event through a merger, acquisition, public offering or otherwise, and there is a significant risk that some or all of the Underlying Fund’s investments will yield little or no return.
Dependence on Patents, Trademarks and Other Intellectual Property. Certain of the Underlying Funds’ Portfolio Investments may depend on intellectual property rights, including patents, trademarks and trade secret protection. The ability to effectively enforce patent, trademark and other intellectual property laws will affect the value of many of these Portfolio Investments. Within the venture capital industry, patent disputes are not infrequent and can preclude commercialization of products, and patent litigation is costly and could subject a Portfolio Investment to significant liabilities to third parties. The presence of patents or other proprietary rights belonging to other parties may lead to the termination of the research and development of a Portfolio Investment’s particular product. There can be no assurance that the Underlying Funds or any Portfolio Investment will be able to protect these rights or will have the financial resources to do so, or that competitors will not develop technologies substantially equivalent or superior to a company’s technologies. While piracy adversely affects Portfolio Investment revenue, the impact on revenue from outside the U.S. could be significant, particularly in countries where laws are less protective of intellectual property rights. The absence of harmonized patent laws makes it more difficult to ensure consistent respect for patent rights. Reductions in the legal protection for intellectual property rights could adversely affect Portfolio Investments.
Third-Party Infringement Claims. Some of the Underlying Funds or their Portfolio Investments may, from time to time, receive notices from others claiming the Underlying Funds or such Portfolio Investment has infringed their intellectual property rights. The number of these claims may grow because of the constant change in the technology industry, increased user-generated content, the extensive patent coverage of existing technologies, and the rapid rate of issuance of new patents. Additionally, Portfolio Investments may use “open source” software in their products or may use such software in the future. Such open source software is generally licensed by its authors or other third parties under open source licenses. Licensing authors or third parties may allege that a Portfolio Investment has not complied with the conditions of one or more of these licenses. To resolve these and other intellectual claims, the Underlying Funds and/or Portfolio Investments may enter into royalty and licensing agreements on terms that are less favorable than currently available, stop selling or redesign affected products, or pay damages to satisfy indemnification commitments with customers. These outcomes may cause operating margins to decline. In addition to money damages, in some jurisdictions plaintiffs can seek injunctive relief that may limit or prevent importing, marketing and selling products that have infringing technologies. In some countries an injunction can be issued before the parties have fully litigated the validity of the underlying patents.
Software Code Protection. Source code is often critical to companies in the venture capital sector. If an unauthorized disclosure of a significant portion of source code occurs, a Portfolio Investment could potentially lose future trade secret protection for that source code. This could make it easier for third parties to compete with such company products by copying functionality, which could adversely affect revenue and operating margins. Unauthorized disclosure of source code could also increase security risks (e.g., viruses, worms and other malicious software programs that may attack company products and services). Costs for remediating the unauthorized disclosure of source code and other cybersecurity branches, may include, among other things, increased protection costs, reputational damage and loss of market share, liability for stolen assets or information and repairing system damage that may have been caused. Remediation costs may also include incentives offered to company customers or other business partners in an effort to maintain the business relationships after a security breach.
Risks Associated with Co-Investment Focused Underlying Funds and Co-Investments Generally
General Risks of Co-Investments. When the Fund invests alongside other investors in a co-investment structure, the realization of investments made as co-investments may take longer than would the realization of investments under the sole control of the Underlying Fund (or the Fund, as applicable) because co-investors may require an exit procedure requiring notification of the other co-investors and possibly giving the other co-investors a right of first refusal or a right to initiate a buy-sell procedure (i.e., one party specifying the terms upon which it is prepared to purchase the other party’s or parties’ participation in the investment and the non-initiating party or parties having the option of either buying the initiating party’s participation or selling its or their participation in the investment on the specified terms). Co-investments may involve risks in connection with such third-party involvement, including the possibility that a third-party may have financial difficulties, resulting in a negative impact on such investment, or that the Fund may in certain circumstances be held liable for the actions of such third-party co-investor. Third-party co-investors may also have economic or business interests or goals that are inconsistent with those of the Fund or may be in a position to take or block action in a manner contrary to the Fund’s investment objective. In circumstances where such third parties involve a management group, such third parties may receive compensation arrangements relating to the co-investments, including incentive compensation arrangements, and the interests of such third parties may not be aligned with the interests of the Underlying Fund (or the Fund, as applicable). When the Fund makes direct investments in operating companies that are co-investments alongside Underlying Funds, the Fund will be highly dependent upon the capabilities of the applicable Underlying Fund Managers. The Fund may indirectly make binding commitments to co-investments without an ability to participate in the management and control of, and with no or limited ability to transfer its interests in, the pertinent operating company. In some cases, the Fund may be obligated to fund its entire direct investment in a co-investment up front, and in other cases the Fund may make commitments to fund investments from time to time as called by the Underlying Fund Manager or other fund participating in a co-investment. Generally, none of the Underlying Fund Manager, the Underlying Fund, the Investment Managers, the General Partner or the Fund will have control over the timing of capital calls or distributions received from such co-investments, or over investment decisions made in respect of such co-investments. When the Fund participates in a co-investment, the Fund generally will not have control over the underlying Portfolio Investment and will not be able to direct the policies or management decisions of such Portfolio Investment. Thus, the returns to the Fund from any such investments are expected to be more dependent upon the performance of the particular Portfolio Investment and its management, insofar as the Investment Managers, on behalf of the Fund, are not expected to be able to direct the policies or management decisions of such Portfolio Investment by way of its investment in the Underlying Fund.
Risks Associated with Credit Focused Underlying Funds
The Underlying Funds (And thus the Fund) are Exposed to Market Risks Beyond their Control. The market price of securities owned by the Underlying Funds may go up or down, sometimes rapidly or unpredictably. Securities may decline in value due to factors affecting securities markets generally or particular industries represented in the securities markets. The value of a security may decline due to general market conditions which are not specifically related to a particular company, such as real or perceived adverse economic conditions, changes in the general outlook for corporate earnings, changes in interest or currency rates, adverse changes to credit markets or adverse investor sentiment generally. The value of a security may also decline due to factors which affect a particular industry or industries, such as labor shortages or increased production costs and competitive conditions within an industry. During a general downturn in the securities markets, multiple asset classes may decline in value simultaneously. Equity securities generally have greater price volatility than fixed income securities. Credit ratings downgrades may also negatively affect securities held by the Underlying Funds. Even when markets perform well, there is no assurance that the investments held by the Underlying Funds will increase in value along with the broader market. In addition, market risk includes the risk that geopolitical events will disrupt the economy on a national or global level. For instance, terrorism, market manipulation, government defaults, government shutdowns, political changes or diplomatic developments and natural/environmental disasters can all negatively impact the securities markets, which could cause the Fund to lose value. Any market disruptions could also prevent the Fund from executing advantageous investment decisions in a timely manner.
Current market conditions may pose heightened risks with respect investments in income securities. Over the past several years, the U.S. Federal Reserve has maintained the level of interest rates at or near historic lows. However, more recently, interest rates have begun to increase as a result of the action that has been taken by the U.S. Federal Reserve, which has raised, and may continue to raise, interest rates. Changing interest rates may have unpredictable effects on the markets and the Underlying Funds’ Portfolio Investments. A general rise in interest rates may cause investors to move out of fixed income securities on a large scale, which could adversely affect the price and liquidity of fixed income securities. The Underlying Funds may be exposed to heightened interest rate risk as interest rates rise from historically low levels. Fluctuations in interest rates may also affect the liquidity of fixed income securities and instruments held by the Underlying Funds. Any further interest rate increases in the future could cause the value of any fund that invests in fixed income securities to decrease. As such, fixed income securities markets may experience heightened levels of interest rate, volatility and liquidity risk. If rising interest rates cause the Underlying Funds’ Portfolio Investments to lose enough value, the Underlying Funds could also face increased withdrawals, which could force the Underlying Funds to liquidate investments at disadvantageous times or prices, therefore adversely affecting the Underlying Fund and thus the Fund.
Exchanges and securities markets may close early, close late or issue trading halts on specific securities, which may result in, among other things, the Underlying Funds being unable to buy or sell certain securities or financial instruments at an advantageous time or accurately price its portfolio investments. In addition, the Underlying Funds may rely on various third-party sources to calculate their net asset value. As a result, the Underlying Funds may be subject to certain operational risks associated with reliance on service providers and service providers’ data sources. In particular, errors or systems failures and other technological issues may adversely impact the Underlying Funds’ calculations of their net asset value, and such net asset value calculation issues may result in inaccurately calculated net asset values, delays in net asset value calculation and/or the inability to calculate net asset value over extended periods. The net asset value may be unable to recover any losses associated with such failures.
Portfolio Investments May be Subject to Calls. Call risk refers to the possibility that an issuer may exercise its right to redeem a fixed income security earlier than expected (a call). Issuers may call outstanding securities prior to their maturity for a number of reasons (e.g., declining interest rates, changes in credit spreads and improvements in the issuer’s credit quality). If an issuer calls a security in which an Underlying Fund has invested, such Underlying Fund may not recoup the full amount of its initial investment and may be forced to reinvest in lower-yielding securities, securities with greater credit risks or securities with other, less favorable features.
Restricted Liquidity in Portfolio Investments May Reduce Returns. Some of the Underlying Funds may invest in illiquid investments. An illiquid investment is any investment that an Investment Manager reasonably expects cannot be sold or disposed of in current market conditions in seven calendar days or less without the sale or disposition significantly changing the market value of the investment. The Underlying Funds’ illiquid investments may reduce the returns of such Underlying Funds (and thus the Fund) because it may be difficult to sell the illiquid investments at an advantageous time or price. An investment may be illiquid due to, among other things, the reduced number and capacity of traditional market participants to make a market in fixed-income securities or the lack of an active trading market. To the extent that an Underlying Fund’s principal investment strategies involve derivatives or securities with substantial market and/or credit risk, such Underlying Fund will tend to have the greatest exposure to the risks associated with illiquid investments. Liquid investments may become illiquid after purchase by an Underlying Fund, particularly during periods of market turmoil. Illiquid investments may be harder to value, especially in changing markets, and if an Underlying Fund is forced to sell these investments to meet withdrawal requests or for other cash needs, such Underlying Fund (and thus the Fund) may suffer a loss. This may be magnified in a rising interest rate environment or other circumstances where investor withdrawals from fixed-income mutual funds may be higher than normal. In addition, when there is illiquidity in the market for certain securities, an Underlying Fund, due to limitations on illiquid investments, may be subject to purchase and sale restrictions.
Bond markets have consistently grown over the past three decades while the capacity for traditional dealer counterparties to engage in fixed income trading has not kept pace and in some cases has decreased. As a result, dealer inventories of corporate bonds, which provide a core indication of the ability of financial intermediaries to “make markets,” are at or near historic lows in relation to market size. Because market makers provide stability to a market through their intermediary services, the significant reduction in dealer inventories could potentially lead to decreased liquidity and increased volatility in the fixed income markets. Such issues may be exacerbated during periods of economic uncertainty.
Liquidity risk also refers to the risk of unusually high withdrawal requests, withdrawal requests by certain large holders of interests such as institutional investors or asset allocators, or other unusual market conditions that may make it difficult for an Underlying Fund to sell investments within the allowable time period to meet withdrawals. Meeting such withdrawal requests could require an Underlying Fund to sell securities at reduced prices or under unfavorable conditions, which would reduce the value of such Underlying Fund. It may also be the case that other market participants may be attempting to liquidate fixed income holdings at the same time as an Underlying Fund, causing increased supply in the market and contributing to liquidity risk and downward pricing pressure.
Differences in Valuation May Increase Volatility. The price that an Underlying Fund could receive upon the sale of any particular Portfolio Investment may differ from the Underlying Fund Manager’s valuation of the Portfolio Investment, particularly for securities that trade in thin or volatile markets or that are valued using a fair valuation methodology or a price provided by an independent pricing service. As a result, the price received upon the sale of a Portfolio Investment may be less than the value ascribed by the Underlying Fund Managers, and such Underlying Fund could realize a greater than expected loss or lesser than expected gain upon the sale of the Portfolio Investment. Pricing services that value fixed-income securities generally utilize a range of market-based and security-specific inputs and assumptions, as well as considerations about general market conditions, to establish a price. Pricing services generally value fixed-income securities assuming orderly transactions of an institutional round lot size, but may be held or transactions may be conducted in such securities in smaller, odd lot sizes. Odd lots may trade at lower prices than institutional round lots. An Underlying Fund Manger’s ability to value Portfolio Investments may also be impacted by technological issues and/or errors by pricing services or other third-party service providers.
Central Clearing Parties Could Fail.  Central clearing parties are highly capitalized.  Cleared transactions are supported by initial and variation margin.  As a result, failure of a central clearing party is highly unlikely.  If a central clearing party were to fail, however, the impact on the financial system in general and on the Underlying Funds’ positions in particular is uncertain and could affect a large portion of the market.
Risk of Leverage. The use of leverage (whether via swaps, borrowing or otherwise) creates an opportunity for increasing an Underlying Fund’s total return, but also for the potential of greater loss, in the net asset value of such Underlying Fund. It also increases the volatility of the net asset value of such Underlying Fund by magnifying both increases and declines in the value of such assets. Accordingly, any event which adversely affects the value of a Portfolio Investment by the Underlying Fund would be magnified to the extent that such Underlying Fund is leveraged. The cumulative effect of the use of leverage by an Underlying Fund in a market that moves adversely to such Underlying Fund’s Portfolio Investments could result in a substantial loss to the Underlying Fund, which would be greater than if such Underlying Fund were not leveraged. Any limitation on the availability of leverage will have a detrimental effect on the ability of an Underlying Fund to maintain the intended level of leverage. Any event which adversely affects the value of a Portfolio Investment held by an Underlying Fund would be magnified to the extent that such Underlying Fund is leveraged.  The cumulative effect of the use of leverage by an Underlying Fund in a market that moves adversely to its Portfolio Investment could result in a substantial loss which would be greater than if such Underlying Fund was not leveraged.
Additionally, borrowing will cost an Underlying Fund interest expense and other fees. The costs of borrowing may reduce an Underlying Fund’s return.  Borrowing may cause an Underlying Fund to liquidate positions when it may not be advantageous to do so to satisfy its obligations.
Fixed Income Securities May be Highly Speculative.  An Underlying Fund may invest in bonds or other fixed income securities, including without limitation, commercial paper, “distressed debt,” bank debt, asset-backed securities and “higher yielding” (including non-investment grade and, therefore, higher risk) debt securities.  The Underlying Fund will, therefore, be subject to credit, liquidity and interest rate risks and may also be subject to price volatility due to factors, such as interest rate sensitivity, duration, market perception of the creditworthiness of the issuer, general market liquidity, and issue level liquidity. Higher-yielding debt securities are generally unsecured and may be subordinated to certain other outstanding securities and obligations of the issuer or obligor of such securities, which may be secured on substantially all of the issuer’s assets.  The lower rating of debt obligations in the higher-yielding sectors reflects a greater probability that adverse changes in the financial condition of the issuer or in general economic conditions or both may impair the ability of the issuer to make payments of principal and interest. Non-investment grade debt securities may not be protected by financial covenants or limitation on additional indebtedness.  In addition, evaluation of credit risk for debt securities involves uncertainty because credit rating agencies throughout the world have different standards, making comparison across countries difficult.  Also, the market for credit spreads is often inefficient and illiquid, making it difficult to accurately calculate discounting spreads for valuing financial instruments.  It is likely that a major economic event, such as a recession or reduction of liquidity in the market could severely disrupt the market for such securities and may have an adverse impact on the value of such securities.  In addition, it is likely that any such economic event could adversely affect the ability of issuers of such securities to repay principal and pay interest thereon and increase the incidence of default for such securities.  Changes in interest rates may cause a decline in the market value of an investment.  With bonds and other fixed income securities, a rise in interest rates typically causes a fall in values, while a fall in interest rates typically causes a rise in values.  The risk of bonds can vary significantly depending upon factors such as the issuer and maturity.  For example, the issuer of a security or the counterparty to a contract may default or otherwise become unable to honor a financial obligation.  The bonds of some companies may be riskier than the stocks of others.
Corporate Debt Securities are Subject to a Variety of Risks. Corporate debt securities are subject to the risk of the issuer’s inability to meet principal and interest payments on the obligation and may also be subject to price volatility due to such factors as interest rate sensitivity, market perception of the creditworthiness of the issuer and general market liquidity. When interest rates rise, the value of corporate debt securities can be expected to decline. Debt securities with longer maturities tend to be more sensitive to interest rate movements than those with shorter maturities. In addition, certain corporate debt securities may be highly customized and as a result may be subject to, among others, liquidity and pricing transparency risks.
Interest Rate Fluctuations Could Adversely Affect an Underlying Fund’s Performance. The market value of bonds and other fixed income securities changes in response to interest rate changes and other factors. Interest rate risk is the risk that prices of bonds and other fixed-income securities will increase as interest rates fall and decrease as interest rates rise.
An Underlying Fund may be subject to a greater risk of rising interest rates due to the current period of inflation volatility. For example, if interest rates increase by 1%, assuming a current portfolio duration of ten years, and all other factors being equal, the value of an Underlying Fund’s investments in these positions would be expected to decrease by 10%. The magnitude of these fluctuations in the market price of bonds and other fixed income securities is generally greater for those securities with longer maturities. Fluctuations in the market price of an Underlying Fund’s Portfolio Investments will not affect interest income derived from instruments already owned by such Underlying Fund, but will be reflected in such Underlying Fund’s net asset value. An Underlying Fund may lose money if short-term or long-term interest rates rise sharply in a manner not anticipated by the Underlying Fund Manager.
To the extent an Underlying Fund invests in debt securities that may be prepaid at the option of the obligor (such as mortgage-backed securities), the sensitivity of such securities to changes in interest rates may increase (to the detriment of such Underlying Fund) when interest rates rise. Moreover, because rates on certain floating rate debt securities typically reset only periodically, changes in prevailing interest rates (and particularly sudden and significant changes) can be expected to cause some fluctuations in the net asset value of such Underlying Fund to the extent that it invests in floating rate debt securities.
These basic principles of bond prices also apply to U.S. Government securities. A security backed by the “full faith and credit” of the U.S. Government is guaranteed only as to its stated interest rate and face value at maturity, not its current market price. Just like other fixed-income securities, government-guaranteed securities will fluctuate in value when interest rates change.
In 2022 and during the first half of 2023, the U.S. Federal Reserve began raising short-term interest rates. To the extent an Underlying Fund or the Fund borrows money to make investments, its performance will depend, in part, upon the difference between the rate at which the Underlying Fund (or the Fund) borrows funds and the rate at which the Underlying Fund (or the Fund) invests those funds. As a result, such Underlying Fund (or the Fund) can offer no assurance that a significant change in market interest rates will not have a material adverse effect on its performance. In periods of rising interest rates, to the extent an Underlying Fund (or the Fund) borrows money subject to a floating interest rate, such Underlying Fund’s (or the Fund’s) borrowing costs would increase, which could adversely affect such Underlying Fund’s (or the Fund’s) performance. Further, rising interest rates could also adversely affect such Underlying Fund’s (or the Fund’s) performance if it holds investments with floating interest rates, subject to specified minimum interest rates (such as the Secured Overnight Financing Rate (“SOFR”) floor, as applicable), while at the same time engaging in borrowings subject to floating interest rates not subject to such minimums. In such a scenario, rising interest rates may increase an Underlying Fund’s (or the Fund’s) interest expense, even though its interest income from investments is not increasing in a corresponding manner as a result of such minimum interest rates. Changing interest rates may have unpredictable effects on markets, may result in heightened market volatility and may detract from an Underlying Fund’s (and the Fund’s) performance to the extent they are exposed to such interest rates.
Changes in Credit Ratings May Lead to Unexpected Losses. Some of the Underlying Funds may also be subject to credit risk, i.e. the risk that an issuer of securities in which it invests will be unable to pay principal and interest when due, or that the value of the security will suffer because investors believe the issuer is less able to pay.  Changes in an issuer’s credit rating or the market’s perception of an issuer’s creditworthiness may also affect the value of such Underlying Fund’s investment in that issuer. The degree of credit risk depends on both the financial condition of the issuer and the terms of the obligation.  An Underlying Fund could lose money if the issuer or guarantor of a fixed income security (including a security purchased with securities lending collateral), or the counterparty to a derivatives contract, repurchase agreement or a loan of portfolio securities, is unable or unwilling, or is perceived (whether by market participants, rating agencies, pricing services or otherwise) as unable or unwilling, to make timely principal and/or interest payments, or to otherwise honor its obligations. The downgrade of the credit of a security held by such an Underlying Fund may decrease its value. Securities are subject to varying degrees of credit risk, which are often reflected in credit ratings. However, ratings are only the opinions of the agencies issuing them, may change less quickly than the relevant circumstances and are not absolute guarantees of the quality of the securities.  Furthermore, the investments of the Underlying Funds may not be rated by any rating agency or may be below investment grade.  Some Underlying Funds will be more dependent upon the judgment of the Underlying Fund Managers as to the credit quality of such unrated securities.  A default, downgrade or credit impairment of any of its investments could result in a significant or even total loss of the investment. Measures such as average credit quality may not accurately reflect the true credit risk of an Underlying Fund.
Rising Interest Rates May Increase Volatility. When interest rates rise, certain obligations will be paid off by the obligor more slowly than anticipated, causing the value of these obligations to fall. Rising interest rates tend to extend the duration of securities, making them more sensitive to changes in interest rates. The value of longer-term securities generally changes more in response to changes in interest rates than shorter-term securities. As a result, in a period of rising interest rates, certain securities that an Underlying Fund may invest in, including Treasury Inflation-Protected Securities (TIPS), may exhibit additional volatility and may lose value. 
Falling Interest Rates May Affect Yields. When interest rates fall, certain obligations will be paid off by the obligor more quickly than originally anticipated, and an Underlying Fund may have to invest the proceeds in securities with lower yields. In periods of falling interest rates, the rate of prepayments tends to increase (as does price fluctuation) as borrowers are motivated to pay off debt and refinance at new lower rates. During such periods, reinvestment of the prepayment proceeds by the management team will generally be at lower rates of return than the return on the assets that were prepaid. Prepayment reduces the yield to maturity and the average life of the security.
Unrated, Low-Grade or Defaulted Debt Securities are Susceptible to Greater Risk. An Underlying Fund may invest in unrated, low grade, or defaulted debt securities which are subject to greater risk of loss of principal and interest than higher-rated debt securities.  An Underlying Fund may invest in debt securities which rank junior to other outstanding securities and obligations of the issuer, all or a significant portion of which may be secured on substantially all of that issuer’s assets.  An Underlying Fund may invest in debt securities which are not protected by financial covenants or limitations on additional indebtedness.  Low grade, unrated, and defaulted debt securities are more likely to react to developments affecting market and credit risk than are more highly-rated securities, which primarily react to movements in the general level of interest rates and credit markets.  Investors should be aware that ratings are relative and subjective and are not absolute standards of quality.  
Structured Securities May be Subject to a Greater Risk of Loss Than Less Complex Securities. An Underlying Fund may invest in interests in securitization vehicles organized and operated solely for the purpose of restructuring the investment characteristics of other debt securities (collectively, “Structured Securities”). This type of restructuring generally involves the deposit with or purchase by an entity, such as a corporation or trust, of specified instruments and the issuance by that entity of one or more classes of securities backed by, or representing interests in, the underlying instruments.  The cash flow on the underlying instruments may be apportioned among the newly issued security to create securities with different investment characteristics such as varying maturities, payment priorities and interest rate provisions and the extent of the payments made with respect to such securities is dependent on the extent of the cash flow on the underlying instruments.  Certain classes of such securities may be subordinated to the right of payment of another class.  Subordinated structured investments typically have higher yields and present greater risks than unsubordinated structured investments.  Many Structured Securities are highly complex instruments and may be sensitive to changes in interest rates, prepayment rates or both.  There is no guarantee that a liquid market will exist for any Structured Security that an Underlying Fund may wish to sell.
Structured Securities generally are limited or non-recourse obligations payable solely from underlying assets or collateral securities or the proceeds thereof.  Consequently, holders of Structured Securities must rely solely on distributions on the underlying assets or collateral securities or proceeds thereof for payment in respect of the Structured Securities.  The underlying assets are subject to, among other things, credit risks, liquidity risks, interest rate risks, market risks, operations risks, structural risks and legal risks and may fluctuate with the financial conditions of the underlying issuers and obligors.  In the event that issuers of the underlying collateral securities or obligors on the underlying assets default on their obligations, or distributions on the underlying assets or collateral securities are insufficient to make payments in respect of the Structured Securities, no other assets will be available for the payment of the deficiency.  There is no guarantee that liquidation of underlying assets and collateral securities will be sufficient to repay investors for their investment in such Structured Securities.
In addition, Structured Securities may involve risks different from those of the assets or securities underlying or backing such Structured Securities.  The failure by a servicer, sponsor or manager of a Structured Security to perform an adequate credit review of underlying assets or collateral securities or to otherwise fulfil its obligations with respect to a Structured Security may lead to the liquidation of, or default on, such Structured Security.  Such failures and defaults may have a negative impact on the return of the Structured Security and the performance of an Underlying Fund.
Mortgage- and Asset-Backed Securities Entail Specific Risks. Mortgage-backed securities (residential and commercial) and asset-backed securities represent interests in “pools” of mortgages or other assets, including consumer loans or receivables held in trust. Although asset-backed and commercial mortgage-backed securities (“CMBS”) generally experience less prepayment than residential mortgage-backed securities, mortgage-backed and asset-backed securities, like traditional fixed-income securities, are subject to credit, interest rate, prepayment and extension risks. An Underlying Fund may invest in asset-backed securities, including, but not limited to, interests in pools of receivables, loans, assets, leases, and mortgages (i.e., mortgage-backed securities).  These securities may be in the form of pass-through instruments or asset-backed obligations.  The securities, many of which are issued by nongovernmental entities and carry no direct or indirect government guarantee, present certain risks primarily because these securities may not have the benefit of a security interest in the related collateral.
Small movements in interest rates (both increases and decreases) may quickly and significantly reduce the value of certain mortgage-backed securities. An Underlying Fund’s investments in asset-backed securities are subject to risks similar to those associated with mortgage-related securities, as well as additional risks associated with the nature of the assets and the servicing of those assets. These securities also are subject to the risk of default on the underlying mortgages or assets, particularly during periods of economic downturn. Certain CMBS are issued in several classes with different levels of yield and credit protection. An Underlying Fund’s investments in CMBS with several classes may be in the lower classes that have greater risks than the higher classes, including greater interest rate, credit and prepayment risks.
Mortgage-backed securities may be either pass-through securities or collateralized mortgage obligations (“CMOs”). Pass-through securities represent a right to receive principal and interest payments collected on a pool of mortgages, which are passed through to security holders. CMOs are created by dividing the principal and interest payments collected on a pool of mortgages into several revenue streams (tranches) with different priority rights to portions of the underlying mortgage payments. Certain CMO tranches or other mortgage-backed securities like CMBS may represent a right to receive interest only, principal only or an amount that remains after floating-rate tranches are paid (an inverse floater). These securities are frequently referred to as “mortgage derivatives” and may be extremely sensitive to changes in interest rates. Interest rates on inverse floaters, for example, vary inversely with a short-term floating rate (which may be reset periodically). Interest rates on inverse floaters will decrease when short-term rates increase, and will increase when short-term rates decrease. These securities have the effect of providing a degree of investment leverage. In response to changes in market interest rates or other market conditions, the value of an inverse floater may increase or decrease at a multiple of the increase or decrease in the value of the underlying securities. If an Underlying Fund invests in CMO tranches (including CMO tranches issued by government agencies) and interest rates move in a manner not anticipated by the Underlying Fund Manager, it is possible that such an Underlying Fund could lose all or substantially all of its investment. Certain mortgage-backed securities in which an Underlying Fund may invest may also provide a degree of investment leverage, which could cause such Underlying Fund to lose all or substantially all of its investment.
The mortgage market in the United States has experienced difficulties that may adversely affect the performance and market value of certain of the Underlying Funds’ mortgage-related investments. Delinquencies and losses on mortgage loans (including subprime and second-lien mortgage loans) generally have increased and may continue to increase, and a decline in or flattening of real-estate values (as has been experienced and may continue to be experienced in many housing markets) may exacerbate such delinquencies and losses. Also, a number of mortgage loan originators have experienced serious financial difficulties or bankruptcy. Reduced investor demand for mortgage loans and mortgage-related securities and increased investor yield requirements have caused limited liquidity in the secondary market for mortgage-related securities, which can adversely affect the market value of mortgage-related securities. It is possible that such limited liquidity in such secondary markets could continue or worsen.
Asset-backed securities entail certain risks not presented by mortgage-backed securities, including the risk that in certain states it may be difficult to perfect the liens securing the collateral backing certain asset-backed securities. In addition, certain asset-backed securities are based on loans that are unsecured, which means that there is no collateral to seize if the underlying borrower defaults.
Dodd-Frank imposed significant changes to the legal and regulatory framework applicable to the asset-backed securities markets and securitizations, directing various federal regulators to engage in rulemaking actions aimed at dramatically reforming regulation of U.S financial markets. While many of the rulemakings required by Dodd-Frank have been finalized and are either effective or pending effectiveness, others remain to be finalized or even proposed. Further, many of the rules that have been finalized have been subject to modification or interpretation since their effective date, often times in order to clear up ambiguities present in the final rules.
Specific Risks associated with CMBS. An Underlying Fund may invest in pools or tranches of CMBS, including horizontal and other risk retention investments. The collateral underlying CMBS generally consists of commercial mortgages on real property that has a multifamily or commercial use, such as retail space, office buildings, warehouse property and hotels. CMBS have been issued in a variety of issuances, with varying structures including senior and subordinated classes. CMBS may also have structural characteristics that distinguish them from other securities.  The interest rate payable on these types of securities may be set or effectively capped at the weighted average net coupon of the underlying assets themselves.  As a result of this cap, the return to investors in such a security would be dependent on the relevant timing and rate of delinquencies and prepayments of mortgage loans bearing a higher rate of interest.  In general, early prepayments will have a greater impact on the yield to investors.  Federal and state law may also affect the return to investors by capping the interest rates payable by certain mortgagors. Certain CMBS may provide for the payment of only interest for a stated period of time.  In addition, in a bankruptcy or similar proceeding involving the originator or the servicer of the CMBS (often the same entity or an affiliate), the assets of the issuer of such securities could be treated as never having been truly sold to the originator to the issuer and could be substantively consolidated with those of the originator, or the transfer of such assets to the issuer could be voided as a fraudulent transfer. 
The credit markets, including the CMBS market, have periodically experienced decreased liquidity on the primary and secondary markets during periods of market volatility. Such market conditions could re-occur and would impact the valuations of an Underlying Fund’s investments and impair its ability to sell such investments if such Underlying Fund were required to liquidate all or a portion of its CMBS investments quickly. Additionally, an Underlying Fund’s investments, such as horizontal or other risk retention investments in CMBS, may have certain holding period and other restrictions that limit such Underlying Fund’s ability to sell such investments.
Sovereign Debt Risk. Sovereign debt risk is the risk that fixed income instruments issued by sovereign entities may decline in value as a result of default or other adverse credit event resulting from an issuer’s inability or unwillingness to make principal or interest payments in a timely fashion. A sovereign entity’s failure to make timely payments on its debt can result from many factors, including, without limitation, insufficient foreign currency reserves or an inability to sufficiently manage fluctuations in relative currency valuations, an inability or unwillingness to satisfy the demands of creditors and/or relevant supranational entities regarding debt service or economic reforms, the size of the debt burden relative to economic output and tax revenues, cash flow difficulties, and other political and social considerations. The risk of loss to an Underlying Fund in the event of a sovereign debt default or other adverse credit event is heightened by the unlikelihood of any formal recourse or means to enforce its rights as a holder of the sovereign debt. In addition, sovereign debt restructurings, which may be shaped by entities and factors beyond an Underlying Fund’s control, may result in a loss in value of such Underlying Fund’s sovereign debt holdings.
Collateralized Loan Obligations Involve a Variety of Risks.  Collateralized loan obligations (“CLOs”) are subject to credit, liquidity, prepayment and interest rate risks.  Adverse changes in the financial condition of an issuer or in general economic conditions or both may impair the ability of the related issuer or obligor to make payments of principal or interest.  Such investments may be speculative.  From time to time, the market for CLO transactions has been adversely affected by a decrease in the availability of subordinated financing for transactions, in part in response to regulatory pressures on providers of financing to reduce or eliminate their exposure to such transactions.  CLOs may invest in concentrated portfolios of assets.  The concentration of an underlying portfolio in any one obligor would subject the related CLO securities to a greater degree of risk with respect to defaults by such obligor and the concentration of a portfolio in any one industry would subject the related CLOs to a greater degree of risk with respect to economic downturns relating to such industry.
CLO securities are generally illiquid and dealer marks may not represent prices where assets can actually be purchased or sold in the market from time to time.  Accordingly, the mark-to-market value of CLOs may be volatile and the value of an investment in an Underlying Fund could likewise be volatile.  The value of the CLO securities may fluctuate with, among other things, the financial condition of the obligors or issuers of the underlying portfolio of assets of the related CLO, general economic conditions, the condition of certain financial markets, political events, developments or trends in any particular industry and changes in prevailing interest rates.  Consequently, holders of CLO securities must rely solely on distributions on the collateral or proceeds thereof for payment in respect thereof.  If distributions on the collateral are insufficient to make payments on the CLO securities, no other assets will be available for payment of the deficiency and following realization of the CLO securities, the obligations of such issuer to pay such deficiency generally will be extinguished.  The collateral may consist of high yield debt or other securities, which typically are rated below investment grade (or of equivalent credit quality).  High yield debt securities generally are unsecured (and loans may be unsecured) and may be subordinated to certain other obligations of the issuer thereof.  The lower ratings of high yield securities and below investment grade loans reflect a greater possibility that adverse changes in the financial condition of an issuer or in general economic conditions or both may impair the ability of the related issuer or obligor to make payments of principal or interest.  Such investments may be speculative.
Issuers of CLO securities may acquire interests in loans and other debt obligations by way of sale, assignment or participation.  The purchaser of an assignment typically becomes a lender under the credit agreement with respect to the loan or debt obligation; however, its rights can be more restricted than those of the assigning institution.  In purchasing participations, an issuer of CLO securities will usually have a contractual relationship only with the selling institution, and not the borrower.  The CLO generally will have neither the right directly to enforce compliance by the borrower with the terms of the loan agreement, nor any rights of set-off against the borrower, nor have the right to object to certain changes to the loan agreement agreed to by the selling institution.  The CLO may not directly benefit from the collateral supporting the related loan and may be subject to any rights of set-off the borrower has against the selling institution.  In addition, in the event of the insolvency of the selling institution, the CLO may be treated as a general creditor of such selling institution, and may not have any exclusive or senior claim with respect to the selling institution’s interest in, or the collateral with respect to, the loan.  Consequently, the CLO may be subject to the credit risk of the selling institution as well as of the borrower.
Collateralized Debt Obligations are Subject to Additional Risks. In addition to the typical risks associated with fixed-income securities and asset-backed securities, collateralized debt obligations (“CDOs”) carry additional risks including, but not limited to: (i) the possibility that distributions from collateral securities will not be adequate to make interest or other payments; (ii) the risk that the collateral may default or decline in value or be downgraded, if rated by a nationally recognized statistical rating organization; (iii) an Underlying Fund may invest in tranches of CDOs that are subordinate to other tranches; (iv) the structure and complexity of the transaction and the legal documents could lead to disputes among investors regarding the characterization of proceeds; (v) the investment return achieved by an Underlying Fund could be significantly different than those predicted by financial models; (vi) the lack of a readily available secondary market for CDOs; (vii) the risk of forced “fire sale” liquidation due to technical defaults such as coverage test failures; and (viii) the CDO’s manager may perform poorly.
Variable and Floating Rate Securities Involve Unique Risks. Variable and floating rate securities are securities that pay interest at rates that adjust whenever a specified interest rate changes and/or that reset on predetermined dates (such as the last day of a month or a calendar quarter). An Underlying Fund may invest in floating rate debt instruments (“floaters”) and engage in credit spread trades. Variable and floating rate securities generally are less sensitive to interest rate changes but may decline in value if their interest rates do not rise as much, or as quickly, as interest rates in general. Conversely, floating rate securities will not generally increase in value if interest rates decline. An Underlying Fund may also invest in inverse floating rate debt instruments (“inverse floaters”). An inverse floater may exhibit greater price volatility than a fixed rate obligation of similar credit quality.
Investments in Corporate Loans May Reduce an Underlying Fund’s (and the Fund’s) Liquidity. Commercial banks and other financial institutions or institutional investors make corporate loans to companies that need capital to grow or restructure. Borrowers generally pay interest on corporate loans at rates that change in response to changes in market interest rates such as SOFR or the prime rates of U.S. banks. As a result, the value of corporate loan investments is generally less exposed to the adverse effects of shifts in market interest rates than investments that pay a fixed rate of interest. However, because the trading market for certain corporate loans may be less developed than the secondary market for bonds and notes, the Underlying Funds, which invest in such loans, may experience difficulties in selling its corporate loans. Transactions in corporate loans may settle on a delayed basis. As a result, the proceeds from the sale of corporate loans may not be readily available to make additional investments or to meet the Underlying Fund’s withdrawal obligations. To the extent the extended settlement process gives rise to short-term liquidity needs, the Underlying Fund may hold additional cash, sell investments or temporarily borrow from banks and other lenders. Leading financial institutions often act as agent for a broader group of lenders, generally referred to as a syndicate. The syndicate’s agent arranges the corporate loans, holds collateral and accepts payments of principal and interest. If the agent develops financial problems, the applicable Underlying Fund, and thus the Fund, may not recover its investment or recovery may be delayed. By investing in a corporate loan, the Underlying Fund may become a member of the syndicate.
The market for corporate loans may be subject to irregular trading activity and wide bid/ask spreads. The corporate loans in which the Underlying Funds may invest are subject to the risk of loss of principal and income. Although borrowers frequently provide collateral to secure repayment of these obligations they do not always do so. If they do provide collateral, the value of the collateral may not completely cover the borrower’s obligations at the time of a default. If a borrower files for protection from its creditors under the U.S. bankruptcy laws, these laws may limit the applicable Underlying Fund’s rights to its collateral. In addition, the value of collateral may erode during a bankruptcy case. In the event of a bankruptcy, the holder of a corporate loan may not recover its principal, may experience a long delay in recovering its investment and may not receive interest during the delay.
Loan Participations and Assignments Involve Additional Risks. The Underlying Funds may invest in fixed-rate and floating-rate loans, which investments are generally in the form of loan participations and assignments of portions of such loans.  Participations and assignments involve special types of risk, including extension risk, prepayment risk, credit risk, interest rate risk, liquidity risk, and the risks of being a lender. Loans are subject to the risk that scheduled interest or principal payments will not be made in a timely manner or at all, either of which may adversely affect the value of the loan. In addition, the collateral underlying a loan may be unavailable or insufficient to satisfy a borrower’s obligation, and the Underlying Fund could become part owner of any collateral if a loan is foreclosed, subjecting such Underlying Fund to costs associated with owning and disposing of the collateral. If an Underlying Fund purchases a participation, it may only be able to enforce its rights through the lender, and may assume the credit risk of the lender in addition to the borrower.
Senior Loans Entail a Variety of Risks. To the extent an Underlying Fund invests in senior loans, including bank loans, the Underlying Fund may be subject to greater levels of credit risk, call risk, settlement risk and liquidity risk than funds that do not invest in such instruments. These instruments are considered predominantly speculative with respect to an issuer’s continuing ability to make principal and interest payments and may be more volatile than other types of investments. An economic downturn or individual corporate developments could adversely affect the market for these instruments and reduce the Underlying Fund’s ability to sell these instruments at an advantageous time or price. An economic downturn would generally lead to a higher non-payment rate, and a senior loan may lose significant market value before a default occurs. In addition, the senior loans in which an Underlying Fund invests may not be listed on any exchange and a secondary market for such loans may be less liquid than markets for other more liquid fixed income securities. Consequently, transactions in senior loans may involve greater costs than transactions in more actively traded instruments. Restrictions on transfers in loan agreements, a lack of publicly-available information, irregular trading activity and wide bid/ ask spreads, among other factors, may, in certain circumstances, make senior loans more difficult to value accurately or sell at an advantageous time or price than other types of securities or instruments. These factors may result in an Underlying Fund being unable to realize full value for the senior loans and/or may result in the Underlying Fund not receiving the proceeds from a sale of a senior loan for an extended period after such sale, each of which could result in losses to the Underlying Fund. Senior loans may have extended trade settlement periods, including settlement periods of greater than 7 days, which may result in sale proceeds not being immediately available to the Underlying Fund. If an issuer of a senior loan prepays or redeems the loan prior to maturity, the Underlying Fund may have to reinvest the proceeds in instruments that pay lower interest rates. Senior loans in which an Underlying Fund invests may be collateralized, although the loans may not be fully collateralized and the collateral may be unavailable or insufficient to meet the obligations of the borrower. An Underlying Fund may have limited rights to exercise remedies against such collateral or a borrower, and loan agreements may impose certain procedures that delay receipt of the proceeds of collateral or require the Underlying Fund to act collectively with other creditors to exercise its rights with respect to a senior loan. Because of the risks involved in investing in senior loans, an investment in the Underlying Fund, if it invests in such instruments, should be considered speculative.
Loans of Portfolio Securities May Expose an Underlying Fund to Losses.  The Underlying Fund may lend its portfolio securities.  By doing so, the Underlying Fund attempts to increase income through the receipt of interests on the loan.  In the event of bankruptcy of the counterparty to such a securities loan, the Underlying Fund may experience delays in recovering the loaned securities.  To the extent that the value of the securities lent by an Underlying Fund has increased, such Underlying Fund could experience a loss if such securities are not recovered.
Debt Investments May be Subject to Subordination. Certain debt investments acquired by an Underlying Fund will be subject to certain additional risks.  Such investments may be unsecured and structurally or contractually subordinated to substantial amounts of senior indebtedness, all or significant portion of which may be secured.  Moreover, such investments may not be protected by financial covenants or limitations upon additional indebtedness.
Delayed Funding Loans and Revolving Credit Facilities Involve a Variety of Risks. An Underlying Fund may also enter into, or acquire participations in, delayed funding loans and revolving credit facilities, in which a lender agrees to make loans up to a maximum amount upon demand by the borrower during a specified term. These commitments may have the effect of requiring an Underlying Fund to increase its investment in a company at a time when it might not otherwise decide to do so (including at a time when the company’s financial condition makes it unlikely that such amounts will be repaid). Delayed funding loans and revolving credit facilities are subject to credit, interest rate and liquidity risk and the risks of being a lender.
Risks Associated with Real Estate Focused Underlying Funds
Risks of Real Estate Investments.  Investments in real estate are subject to various risks, including adverse changes in regional, national and international economic conditions, adverse local market conditions, the financial condition of tenants, buyers and sellers of properties, changes in availability of debt financing, changes in interest rates, real estate tax rates and other operating expenses, environmental laws and regulations, zoning laws and other governmental rules and fiscal policies, environmental claims arising in respect of real estate acquired with undisclosed or unknown environmental problems or as to which inadequate reserves had been established, energy prices, changes in the relative popularity of property types and locations, risks due to dependence on cash flow and risks and operating problems arising out of the presence of certain construction materials, as well as acts of God, uninsurable losses and other factors which are beyond the control of the General Partner, the Investment Managers or the Underlying Fund Managers.  Investments in real estate securities are relatively illiquid, and therefore, the Investment Managers’ ability to vary the Fund’s portfolio promptly in response to changes in economic or other conditions may be limited as any such change will be made through the Fund’s investments in Underlying Funds, which would be subject to the same risks in the investing in real estate.  No assurance can be given that the fair market value of any investments held by an Underlying Fund will not decrease in the future or that an Underlying Fund will recognize full value for any investments disposed of by the Underlying Fund.
Risks of Investing in Real Estate Securities.  The Fund expects to invest in Underlying Funds that make investments in equity and debt securities and other financial instruments of real estate joint ventures and other real estate-related companies.  In addition to the risks attendant to investments in such securities and instruments, the Fund generally will be subject to risks associated with direct ownership of real estate.  As a result, the Fund’s investments will be subject to the following risks incident to investments in joint ventures and companies engaged in real estate activities generally:
(i)	risks associated with the ownership, acquisition, development, construction and operation of real estate properties, including potential environmental liabilities, the risk of uninsured losses, the perceptions of prospective tenants of the safety, convenience and attractiveness of the properties, the ability of the owner to provide adequate management, maintenance and insurance, the expenses of periodically renovating, repairing and reletting spaces, and increasing operating costs (including mortgage payments, real estate taxes, insurance, maintenance costs and utilities) which may not be passed through to tenants;
(ii)	general real estate investment considerations, such as the effect of local economic and other conditions on property cash flows and values, the need to relet space upon the expiration of current leases, dependence on major tenants and the possibility of tenant defaults, the ability of a property to generate revenue sufficient to meet debt service payments and other operating expenses, and periodic property supply and demand imbalances, all of which may affect a joint venture’s or a company’s ability to make expected distributions to its stakeholders;
(iii)	borrowing risks, such as the possibility that: (a) real estate joint ventures and companies will incur excessive debt obligations and not have sufficient funds available to make principal payments as they become due; (b) indebtedness may need to be refinanced on terms less favorable than existing indebtedness; and (c) the properties of a real estate joint venture or company may be subject to foreclosure if the entity is unable to make required mortgage payments;
(iv)	relative illiquidity of real estate investments which will tend to limit the ability of a real estate joint venture or company to vary its holdings promptly in response to changes in local economic or other conditions; and
(v)	risks associated with the management of properties owned by third parties, including the risk that management contracts, if cancellable on short term or without notice, will be terminated by the entity controlling the property or in connection with the sale of such property, that contracts may not be renewed upon expiration or may not be renewed on terms consistent with current terms, and that the rental revenues upon which management fees are based will decline as a result of general real estate market conditions or specific market factors.
Limited Disclosure of Risks.
The above discussions relating to various risks associated with the Fund and the Underlying Funds are not, and should not be construed as, a complete enumeration or explanation of the risks related to the Fund and the Underlying Funds.  Prospective investors should review each of this Memorandum, the Partnership Agreement and the Subscription Booklet in their entirety and should consult with their independent advisors before deciding whether to invest through the Fund.  In addition, as the investment program of the Underlying Funds or market conditions change or develop over time, the Fund may be subject to risk factors not currently contemplated or described in this Memorandum.
In view of the risks noted above, the Fund’s investment program should be considered speculative, and investors should allocate assets to it only if they can sustain a complete loss of their investment.  No guarantee or representation is made that the investment objective of the Fund or investment program of the Underlying Funds will be successful, that the Underlying Funds will produce positive returns or that the Fund will achieve its investment objective or avoid losses.
CONFLICTS OF INTEREST
The following inherent and potential conflicts of interest exist in respect of the General Partner, the Investment Managers, the Underlying Fund Managers and the Underlying Funds.    
By making an investment in the Fund, a Limited Partner is deemed to have acknowledged the actual and potential conflicts of interest relating to the Investment Manager Affiliates, the Underlying Fund Managers, the Underlying Funds and the Portfolio Investments, and to the operations of the Fund, the Underlying Fund Managers, the Underlying Funds and the Portfolio Investments and to have waived any claim with respect to any liability arising from the existence of any such conflicts of interest. 
Relationship of Certain Affiliates.
Certain affiliates of the General Partner, Investment Managers and the Underlying Fund Managers are engaged in a broad spectrum of activities, including financial advisory and investment banking activities, and have extensive investment activities that are independent from and may from time to time conflict with those of the Fund or the Underlying Funds. A number of such affiliates may be major investors in the markets in which the Underlying Funds are expected to invest. As such, some of such affiliates may be actively engaged in transactions in the same Portfolio Investments in which the Underlying Funds will invest or in other transactions with respect to certain Portfolio Investments in which the Underlying Funds will invest. Subject to applicable law, certain affiliates of the General Partner, the Investment Managers or the Underlying Fund Managers may purchase or sell the securities of, or otherwise invest in, finance or advise, issuers in which the Underlying Funds may have an interest. A number of such affiliates also have proprietary interests in, and may manage, advise, sponsor or invest in other investment vehicles, accounts or investment funds that have investment objectives similar or dissimilar to those of the Underlying Funds and which engage in transactions in the same types of securities and instruments as the Underlying Funds. No such affiliate is under any obligation to share any investment opportunity, idea or strategy with the General Partner, the Investment Managers, the Fund, the Underlying Funds, any Underlying Fund Manager or any Limited Partner. As a result, any number of such affiliates may compete with the Underlying Funds for appropriate investment opportunities. A number of affiliates of the General Partner, the Investment Managers or the Underlying Fund Managers may also take actions which may directly or indirectly affect the value of the Fund’s indirect investment in the Underlying Funds.  If both the Underlying Funds and other funds or accounts managed by one or more affiliates of an Underlying Fund Manager invest in certain Portfolio Investments, the allocation among such investors of investment opportunities presents certain conflicts of interest. (See “Other Clients; Allocation of Investment Opportunities” below).
The proprietary activities or portfolio strategies of entities directly or indirectly owned by one or more affiliates of the General Partner, the Investment Managers and/or the Underlying Fund Managers, or the activities or strategies used for accounts managed by one or more such affiliates for other customer accounts, could conflict with the transactions and strategies employed by the Underlying Fund Managers in managing the Underlying Funds and affect the prices and availability of the securities and instruments in which the Underlying Funds invest. Issuers of securities held by the Underlying Funds may have securities in which one or more affiliates of the Investment Managers or an Underlying Fund Manager is an investor or makes a market. The trading activities of such affiliates are carried out without reference to positions held directly or indirectly by the Underlying Funds and may have an effect on the value of the positions so held and may result in one or more such affiliates having an interest in the issuer adverse to that of the Underlying Funds (e.g., one or more such affiliates may have a short position in a security held long by the Underlying Funds). Records of this trading will not be available for inspection by the Fund or any Limited Partner.
To the extent permitted by applicable law, the Underlying Fund Managers may enter into transactions and invest in futures, securities or other instruments on behalf of the Underlying Funds in which one or more affiliates of the General Partner, the Investment Managers or an Underlying Fund Manager, acting as principal or agent for its customers, serves as the counterparty. One or more such affiliates may also act as a broker for both an Underlying Fund and for another person on the other side of a transaction. In any such event, one or more affiliates of the General Partner, the Investment Managers or an Underlying Fund Manager may receive commissions from, and have a potentially conflicting division of loyalties and responsibilities regarding both parties to, such a transaction.
Time Commitment.
Each Investment Manager, its affiliates, and each of their key personnel will devote as much of their time to the business of the Fund as in their judgment is reasonably required. However, each Investment Manager generally has very limited operating resources, relying on other Investment Manager Affiliates who are presently committed to and expect to be committed in the future to providing services for other clients (including other pooled accounts and funds) and engage in other business ventures in which the Fund, the Underlying Funds and the Limited Partners will have no interest. As a result of these separate business activities, each Investment Manager and the other Investment Manager Affiliates may have conflicts of interest in allocating management time, services and functions among the Fund and other business ventures or clients.  
Other Clients; Allocation of Investment Opportunities.
There are no restrictions on the ability of any Investment Manager Affiliate to manage accounts of clients following similar or different investment objectives, philosophies and strategies as those used for the Fund or the Underlying Funds.  The Fund or the Underlying Funds may or may not receive, but in any event will have no rights with respect to, such opportunities.  Each Investment Manager Affiliate has, and the Underlying Fund Managers may have, other investment advisory clients and investment vehicles and have discretion to allocate investment opportunities and dispositions among all clients or vehicles. An Underlying Fund Manager may determine that an investment opportunity is appropriate for another fund or account that it manages, but not for its Underlying Fund. Situations may arise in which private investment funds managed by one or more Investment Manager Affiliate or an Underlying Fund Manager or its respective affiliates have made investments that would have been suitable for investment by the Fund or the applicable Underlying Fund, as applicable, but, for various reasons, were not pursued by, or available to, the Fund or such Underlying Fund. 
In addition, one or more Investment Manager Affiliates may provide financing or enter into transactions with Limited Partners. Such arrangements create an inherent conflict of interest, since such financing and other transactions could, in certain circumstances, negatively affect the Fund if the terms were made less favorable, if they were reduced or terminated.  In addition, such Investment Manager Affiliate may keep any profits, commissions and fees accruing to it in connection with such activities.
Governance.
The Fund does not have an independent board of directors or similar governing body that is generally subject to election or removal by Limited Partners nor does the Fund have a limited partner advisory committee or similar representative body of the Limited Partners.
Limited Partner Due Diligence Information; No Legal, Accounting, Investment or Tax Advice.
The General Partner and the Investment Managers expect to share with each Limited Partner copies of the Underlying Fund Documents and any due diligence materials and findings regarding each Underlying Fund and Underlying Fund Manager; provided, that, notwithstanding the foregoing, the General Partner and the Investment Managers are under no obligation to (and may elect not to) do so, and may be prevented by confidentiality and other restrictions in the Underlying Fund Documents.  None of the Investment Manager Affiliates, the Fund, the General Partner or either of the Investment Managers makes, and each expressly disclaims, any representations or warranties of any kind whatsoever regarding the accuracy, completeness, fairness or suitability of that information.  None of the Fund, the General Partner or either of the Investment Managers is making any independent investment decision or analysis on behalf of any Limited Partner with respect to the substantive merits of a potential investment in the Fund or the Underlying Funds.  
In addition, the Fund, the General Partner, the Investment Managers and certain of their respective affiliates may be in possession of or may later acquire additional information regarding the Underlying Funds, the Underlying Fund Managers, the Portfolio Investments or proposed Portfolio Investments that may be deemed material by a prospective investor in the Fund, which information is generally not being made available to prospective investors in the Fund or to the Limited Partners.  It is possible that, if a prospective investor received such information, such prospective investor would deem it material to its investment decision.  
Accordingly, except to the extent required by law with respect to a prospective investor who is admitted to the Fund as a Limited Partner, or as otherwise required by applicable law, none of the Fund, the Investment Managers, the General Partner or any of their respective affiliates or representatives is acting as an advisor to such Limited Partner or has any fiduciary or other duty to such Limited Partner, in connection with an investment in the Fund.  Prospective investors should not rely on any other Investment Manager Affiliates having verified any information provided to it concerning any Underlying Fund or Underlying Fund Manager.  
As a result, prospective investors in the Fund are responsible for making, and must make, their own assessment (together with their advisors) of the merits and risks of investing in the Fund, including by performing their own legal, accounting and tax analysis of this offering.  Each investor in the Fund will represent in its completed Subscription Booklet that it is not relying, and agrees that it will not rely, on the Fund, the General Partner, the Investment Managers, any affiliate thereof, or any of their partners, members, officers, counsel, agents, or representatives for legal, accounting, investment or tax advice.
CERTAIN INCOME TAX CONSIDERATIONS
Importance of Obtaining Professional Advice.  
The following section is a summary of certain material tax considerations affecting the Limited Partners, the Fund, and the Fund’s proposed operations and does not purport to be a complete analysis of all relevant tax considerations, nor does it purport to be a complete listing of all potential tax risks inherent in purchasing or holding Interests in the Fund.  Prospective investors are strongly urged to consult with their own tax and legal advisers with specific reference to their own situations regarding the possible tax consequences to them of acquiring, holding, realizing, transferring or withdrawing Interests in the Fund.
Certain Material United States Federal Income Tax Considerations
This discussion outlines certain significant U.S. federal income and other tax principles that may apply to the Fund and the Limited Partners, given the anticipated nature of the activities of the Fund and the Underlying Funds. Except where specifically addressing considerations applicable to U.S. persons that are generally exempt from U.S. federal income tax (the “Tax-Exempt Limited Partners”) or Non-U.S. Limited Partners, the discussion assumes that the Limited Partner is a U.S. person for U.S. federal income tax purposes that is not a tax-exempt organization and that holds its Interest as a capital asset. For purposes of this discussion, a “U.S. person” generally is, as determined for U.S. federal income tax purposes (1) an individual citizen or resident of the United States; (2) a corporation (or other entity treated as a corporation for U.S. federal income tax purposes) created or organized in or under the laws of the United States, any state thereof or the District of Columbia; (3) an estate the income of which is subject to U.S. federal income taxation regardless of its source; or (4) a trust which either (i) is subject to the primary supervision of a court within the United States and one or more U.S. persons have the authority to control all substantial decisions of the trust or (ii) has a valid election in effect under applicable Treasury Regulations to be treated as a U.S. person. A U.S. person includes an entity whose income is not includable in gross income pursuant to Section 115 of the Code, including certain U.S. state or local pension trusts (“Section 115 Investors”).  Under Section 115 of the Code, gross income does not include income accruing to a State or any political subdivision thereof, or the District of Columbia or any government of any possession of the United States, or any political subdivision thereof, or public utilities or other entities performing essential governmental functions, including certain U.S. state or local pension trusts. The UBTI rules, discussed in more detail below, that apply to exempt entities typically do not apply to these governmental bodies. An investor which believes it qualifies for the Section 115 exclusion may not be subject to entity level tax by investing directly in the Fund. Each Section 115 Investor should consult with and rely exclusively on its own tax counsel as to the best method of investment.
A “Non-U.S. Limited Partner” is a beneficial owner of Interests that is an individual, corporation, trust or estate for U.S. federal income tax purposes and is not a U.S. person and is not subject to special treatment under the Code. 
The tax treatment of a Limited Partner that is treated as a partnership or other pass-through entity for U.S. federal income tax purposes, and of each partner or member thereof, will generally depend upon the status and activities of the entity and such partner or member. A prospective investor that is treated as a partnership or other pass-through entity for U.S. federal income tax purposes, or is a partner in such a partnership, or a member in such other pass-through entity, should consult its own tax advisor concerning the potential tax consequences of an investment in the Fund.
This discussion does not purport to address all of the U.S. federal income tax consequences that may be applicable to any particular investor, including an investor that may be subject to special rules (such as, but not limited to, banks or other financial institutions, insurance companies, dealers in securities, commodities, or derivatives, U.S. expatriates, investors whose functional currency is not the U.S. dollar, or persons who hold their Interests as part of a hedge, conversion transaction, straddle or other risk reduction transaction). In some cases, the activities of an investor other than its investment in the Fund may affect the tax consequences to such investor of an investment in the Fund. This discussion is limited to beneficial owners who purchase the Interests for cash at original issuance from the Fund.  
Each prospective investor is urged to consult its own tax advisor concerning the U.S. federal income tax consequences of an investment in the Fund in light of its own particular situation.
The discussion of U.S. federal income tax matters contained herein is based on existing law as contained in the Code, Treasury Regulations, administrative rulings, and court decisions as of the date of this Memorandum. No assurance can be given that future legislation, administrative rulings, or court decisions will not materially and adversely affect the consequences set forth in this discussion, possibly on a retroactive basis.
This disclosure is limited to the U.S. federal income tax issues addressed herein. Additional issues may exist that are not addressed in this disclosure and that could affect the U.S. federal income tax treatment related to investing in the Fund, including but not limited to the classification of the Underlying Funds for U.S. federal income tax purposes as well as the activities and investments of the Underlying Funds.    
Partnership Treatment. The U.S. federal income tax consequences of an investment in the Fund will depend on the classification of the Fund for U.S. federal income tax purposes. No application will be made to the United States Internal Revenue Service (the “IRS”) for a ruling on the classification of the Fund for tax purposes.
The Fund expects to be treated as a partnership for U.S. federal income tax purposes and not as a publicly traded partnership taxable as a corporation. An entity that would otherwise be classified as a partnership for U.S. federal income tax purposes may nonetheless be taxable as a corporation if it is a “publicly traded partnership.” A partnership which meets certain safe harbor requirements or certain other exceptions is not subject to the “publicly traded partnership” rules. There can be no assurance that the Fund will be able to qualify for safe harbor treatment or other exceptions in any given year.
If the Fund were treated as a corporation for U.S. federal income tax purposes, the consequences described elsewhere in this disclosure would not apply to the Fund and the Limited Partners.  Rather, if the Fund were treated as a corporation for U.S. federal income tax purposes, it would be subject to U.S. federal income tax, as well as any applicable state and local taxes, on all of its net income, and any non-liquidating distributions that it made would be taxable to the Limited Partners as dividends to the extent of the Fund’s earnings and profits (and, thereafter, as a recovery of basis followed by gain, if any). The economic return to the Limited Partners would likely be significantly reduced if the Fund were treated as a corporation. The following discussion is based on the assumption that the Fund will be treated as a partnership for U.S. federal income tax purposes.
Generally, a partnership, as an entity, is not subject to U.S. federal income tax. However, as described below under “Audits,” partnership audit procedures implemented by the Bipartisan Budget Act of 2015 effective for tax years beginning after December 31, 2017, may result in a partnership being subject to U.S. federal income tax in certain cases. The Fund will file a U.S. federal partnership income tax return reporting its operations for each taxable year. Each Limited Partner will be required to report on its U.S. federal income tax or information return, and thus to take into account in determining its own U.S. federal income tax liability, its share of the Fund’s income, gains, losses, deductions, and credits for the taxable year of the Fund ending within or with such Limited Partner’s taxable year. As a general matter, the income, gains, losses, deductions, and credits derived by the Fund will be attributable to the Fund’s indirect allocable share of income, gains, losses, deductions, and credits earned by the Underlying Funds.
A Limited Partner’s U.S. federal income tax liability will be determined with reference to its share of the Fund’s income, gains, losses, deductions, and credits, regardless of whether the Limited Partner receives any distributions from the Fund, which will in turn be determined by the Fund’s ratable share of such items as derived by the Underlying Funds. The Fund may, but will not be required to make distributions to the Limited Partners for the purpose of permitting the Limited Partners to satisfy their tax liabilities in respect of their investments in the Fund, and such distributions if made may be insufficient to fully defray a Limited Partner’s tax liabilities. Moreover, certain proceeds received by the Underlying Funds are expected to be reinvested, rather than distributed. In addition, certain portfolio investments are expected to cause the Underlying Funds, and therefore the Fund and the Limited Partners, to recognize income subject to tax prior to the Underlying Funds’ or the Fund’s receipt of any corresponding cash or other property. As a consequence, a Limited Partner’s taxable income or tax liability attributable to the Fund could exceed amounts distributed by the Fund to the Limited Partner in a particular year.
Allocations of Profits and Losses. For U.S. federal income tax purposes, separate “Capital Accounts” will be maintained for each Partner to reflect such Partner’s allocable share of the taxable income or loss of the Fund, and such Partner’s contributions to and distributions from the Fund. 
The Partnership Agreement provides that items of income, deduction, gain, loss, or credit actually recognized by the Fund for each fiscal year generally are to be allocated for U.S. federal income tax purposes among the Partners pursuant to the principles of the Treasury Regulations issued under Sections 704(b) and 704(c) of the Code. If the IRS were to review the Fund allocations and determine that they do not technically comply with such Regulations, such allocations would be determined “in accordance with each partner’s interest in the partnership (determined by taking into account all facts and circumstances).” The allocations under the Partnership Agreement should in most cases be substantially identical to each “partner’s interest in the partnership.” However, if the IRS were to successfully challenge the allocations set forth in the Partnership Agreement, the Limited Partners may be allocated different amounts of taxable income, gain, loss, deductions or credits than initially reported to such Limited Partners.

Nature of Income Derived by the Fund. The tax treatment of a Limited Partner’s shares of the Fund’s income, gains, losses, deductions, and credits (including the characterization of items as ordinary income, short-term capital gain, or long-term capital gain) will generally be determined at the Fund level. The income, gains, losses, deductions, and credits at the Fund level will, in turn, generally be attributable to the Fund’s ratable share of income, gains, losses, deductions, and credits earned by the Underlying Funds. 
Phantom Income Attributable to Certain Investments. Certain investments of the Underlying Funds are expected to cause the Fund, and therefore the Limited Partners, to recognize income subject to tax prior to the Fund’s receipt of any corresponding cash or other property.
Limitations on the Deductibility of Losses and Expenses. Various limitations may apply to restrict the Limited Partners’ ability to deduct their shares of losses realized, and expenses incurred, by the Fund and the Underlying Funds.  
Foreign Tax Credits. Certain income derived by the Underlying Funds may be subject to non-U.S. withholding or income taxes. A Limited Partner’s indirect share of these foreign taxes may not be fully creditable against the Limited Partner’s U.S. federal income tax liability, given the complex set of limitations and restrictions on the use of foreign tax credits.
Distributions. In general, when a Limited Partner receives a distribution from the Fund, the Limited Partner will recognize gain to the extent that any cash distributed exceeds the Limited Partner’s adjusted tax basis in its Interest. If a Limited Partner receives only cash, rather than an in-kind distribution of assets, on a complete withdrawal from the Fund, it will recognize a loss to the extent that its adjusted tax basis in its Interest exceeds such cash. If, however, a Limited Partner receives a distribution other than in complete withdrawal of its Interest, or if a Limited Partner receives any distribution of property other than cash in a complete withdrawal, the Limited Partner will not recognize a loss, if any, until its Interest is completely distributed and any such distributed property is disposed of in a taxable transaction. A Limited Partner’s tax basis in its Interest will be increased by its share of the Fund’s income and gain, as determined for U.S. federal income tax purposes, and decreased (but not below zero) by its share of the Fund’s losses and deductions, as determined for U.S. federal income tax purposes.
Generally, a Limited Partner will not recognize gain or loss as a direct consequence of receiving an in-kind distribution of assets from the Fund. However, under Section 731 of the Code, a distribution consisting of marketable securities generally is treated as a distribution of cash (rather than property) in an amount equal to the fair market value of such marketable securities as of the date of the distribution, unless the distributing partnership is an “investment partnership” within the meaning of Section 731(c)(3)(C)(i) of the Code and the recipient is an “eligible partner” within the meaning of Section 731(c)(3)(C)(iii) of the Code. The General Partner will determine at the appropriate time whether the Fund qualifies as an “investment partnership.”  Assuming the Fund so qualifies, if a Limited Partner is an “eligible partner,” which term should include a Limited Partner whose contributions to the Fund consisted solely of cash, the re-characterization rule described above may not apply.  Notwithstanding whether the Fund constitutes an “investment partnership,” a Limited Partner should generally recognize gain upon a distribution of marketable securities unless the fair market value of such distributed property exceeds that Limited Partner’s adjusted tax basis in its Interest.
Tax-Exempt Limited Partners. The Fund is expected to generate “unrelated business taxable income” (“UBTI”). In general, a Tax-Exempt Limited Partner is subject to U.S. federal income tax with respect to any UBTI it derives. A charitable remainder trust is subject to a one hundred percent (100%) tax on its UBTI. With exceptions for certain types of entities, UBTI is generally defined as income from a trade or business regularly carried on by a tax-exempt entity that is unrelated to its exempt purpose (including an unrelated trade or business regularly carried on by a partnership of which the entity is a partner).  UBTI can arise from incidental business activities such as the receipt of fee income or the sale of property held typically for sale. However, income may qualify for one of several exclusions from UBTI so long as it is not attributable to debt-financed property. Subject to certain exceptions, a Tax-Exempt Limited Partner generally is not permitted to utilize losses generated from one activity giving rise to UBTI to offset income generated from a separate activity giving rise to UBTI.  However, all income derived from certain pass-through entities and certain debt-financed income will be treated as arising from a single trade or business for purposes of the foregoing rule. The characterization of a portion of the Fund’s income as UBTI (including as a result of any UBTI generated by any pass-through entity directly or indirectly owned by the Fund, including the Underlying Funds) may have a significant effect on an investment by a Tax-Exempt Limited Partner and may make investment in the Fund inappropriate for certain tax-exempt entities sensitive to the incurrence of UBTI. Prospective tax-exempt investors should consult their own tax advisors regarding all aspects of UBTI.
Section 514 of the Code provides that UBTI includes a percentage of any gross income not otherwise treated as UBTI (less the same percentage of applicable deductions) that is derived from any property that is subject to “acquisition indebtedness” (i.e., “debt-financed property”).  Acquisition indebtedness includes the amount of any loan incurred to acquire property and debt incurred after the acquisition of any property if the debt would not have been incurred but for such acquisition and the incurrence of the debt was reasonably foreseeable at the time of the acquisition.  A Tax-Exempt Limited Partner may realize UBTI if it has “acquisition indebtedness” with respect to its Interest or if the Fund incurs “acquisition indebtedness” with respect to an investment.  The Fund has the ability to borrow funds for certain purposes, and thus may be treated as holding debt-financed property that may produce UBTI. Further, the Fund may be treated as holding debt-financed property as a result of acquisition indebtedness incurred by any pass-through entity directly or indirectly owned by the Fund, such as an Underlying Fund. None of the General Partner, the Investment Managers, or the Fund will have any obligation in the Partnership Agreement to minimize or reduce the incurrence of UBTI. Accordingly, income from an investment in the Fund may be treated as UBTI, and U.S. Tax-Exempt Limited Partners may realize UBTI if they invest in the Fund. 
In addition, Tax-Exempt Limited Partners may be subject to certain U.S. federal information reporting requirements in connection with their investments in the Fund. In particular, Tax-Exempt Limited Partners may be subject to U.S. information reporting requirements in connection with the Fund’s investment in the Underlying Funds and the Underlying Funds’ investments in entities that are organized outside of the United States.
Tax-exempt investors that are private foundations should consult their own tax advisors about the excise tax consequences to them of an investment in the Fund.
Non-U.S. Limited Partners. The U.S. federal income tax treatment applicable to a Non-U.S. Limited Partner investing in the Fund is highly complex and will vary depending on the particular circumstances of such investor and the effect of any applicable income tax treaties. Each Non-U.S. Limited Partner should consult its own tax advisor as to the advisability of investing in the Fund. 
The federal income tax treatment will generally depend on whether the Fund is deemed to be engaged in a U.S. trade or business.  This determination must be made annually. If the Fund were to invest in a fiscally transparent entity that is, directly or indirectly through one or more fiscally transparent entities, engaged in a U.S. trade or business, operating income derived from such investments by the Fund generally would, and gain from the disposition of such investments attributable to assets owned by the fiscally transparent entity would, be treated as effectively connected with such U.S. trade or business.  In addition, fee income actually received or deemed to be received by the Fund or the Limited Partners may cause the Fund and each Non-U.S. Limited Partner to be treated as being engaged in a U.S. trade or business and to be subject to U.S. federal income tax with respect to such fee income. The Code does not define what constitutes a U.S. trade or business; rather, this determination is based upon an examination of the facts and circumstances attending the Fund’s operations, investments, and activities.
The Fund may make investments that could generate income effectively connected with a U.S. trade or business (“ECI”) with respect to a Non-U.S. Limited Partner or that could give rise to foreign governments or instrumentalities of foreign governments earning “commercial activity income” (“CAI”), in each case including as a result of indirect investments through the Underlying Funds.  None of the General Partner, the Investment Managers, or the Fund will have any obligation in the Partnership Agreement to minimize or reduce the incurrence of ECI/CAI by any non-U.S. Limited Partner that invests in the Fund or through any Parallel or Feeder Fund, or alternative investment vehicle of the Fund, and there can be no assurance that a non-U.S. Limited Partner will not recognize ECI/CAI as a result of investing in the Fund (or, to the extent established, such Parallel or Feeder Fund, or alternative investment vehicle). The incurrence of ECI/CAI may have a significant effect on any investment by a Non-U.S. Limited Partner and may make investment in the Fund unsuitable for some Non-U.S. Limited Partners. Non-U.S. investors should consult their own tax advisors regarding a potential investment in the Fund and all aspects of ECI/CAI. 
If the Fund is not engaged in any trade or business during a tax year, a Non-U.S. Limited Partner would be subject to a 30% withholding tax (subject to reduction or elimination by applicable income tax treaties) with respect to its distributive share of certain items of Fund gross income, such as U.S. source interest, dividends, rents and other portfolio or investment income.  U.S-source interest paid to the Fund that is not ECI and that is allocable to a Non-U.S. Limited Partner will also be subject to a 30% withholding tax unless such interest qualifies as “portfolio interest,” another statutory exception applies, or a lower rate or exemption applies pursuant to an applicable income tax treaty.  Portfolio interest generally includes (with certain exceptions) interest paid on registered obligations with respect to which the beneficial owner provides a statement that it is not a U.S. person. The portfolio interest exemption is not available with respect to interest paid to a 10% shareholder of the issuer of the indebtedness and is subject to certain other limitations. A Non-U.S. Limited Partner who is resident for tax purposes in a country with which the United States has an income tax treaty may be eligible for a reduced rate of withholding on such Limited Partner’s distributive share of U.S.-source interest.
If in any year the Fund is deemed to be engaged in a U.S. trade or business, a Non-U.S. Limited Partner will also be considered to be engaged in a U.S. trade or business. The Fund generally will be required to withhold and pay over to the U.S. tax authorities federal income tax calculated at the highest applicable federal income tax rate of each Non-U.S. Limited Partner’s share of the Fund’s net ECI, and each Non-U.S. Limited Partner will be required to file U.S. federal income tax returns and pay U.S. tax on its share of the Fund’s net ECI. ECI realized by a Non-U.S. Limited Partner generally will be subject to U.S. income tax on a net basis at graduated rates applicable to U.S. persons. A Non-U.S. Limited Partner that is a corporation that is (or is deemed to be) engaged in a trade or business also may be subject to an additional branch profits tax of 30% (subject to reduction by any applicable tax treaty) on its effectively connected earnings and profits, adjusted as provided by law.
Under certain provisions of the Code commonly referred to as FIRPTA, Non-U.S. Limited Partners generally will be taxed on their allocable share of any gain derived from the disposition of U.S. real property interests (“USRPIs”) by the Fund, as well as any gain realized on the disposition of their Interests to the extent attributable to the Fund’s direct or indirect interests in USRPIs. USRPIs include interests in corporations that were classified as “United States real property holding corporations” (“USRPHCs”) on any determination date during the shorter of a non-U.S. person’s holding period in the interest, or the five-year period preceding the date the non-U.S. person disposes of the interest. Generally, USRPHCs include U.S. corporations the fair market value of whose USRPIs equals or exceeds 50% of the fair market value of the sum of their USRPIs, interests in real property located outside the U.S., and any other assets used or held for use in a trade or business. Under FIRPTA, Non-U.S. Limited Partners treat gain or loss from dispositions of USRPIs as ECI. Gain realized by a Non-U.S. Limited partner upon a disposition of its Interests will be treated as ECI subject to U.S. federal income tax to the extent attributable to USRPIs held by the Fund at the time of disposition. In addition, if (i) 50% or more of the Fund’s gross assets consist of USRPIs and (ii) 90% or more of the Fund’s gross assets consist of USRPIs and cash or cash equivalents, a purchaser will be required to withhold from the purchase price an amount equal to 15% of the amount realized by the Non-U.S. Limited Partner, which will include the Non-U.S. Limited Partner’s share of the Fund’s liabilities.
All or a portion of the gain realized on the disposition (including by redemption) by a Non-U.S. Limited Partner of its Interests will be treated as ECI to the extent such gain is attributable to assets of the Fund, other than USRPIs, that generate ECI, and if any portion of the gain on sale of Interests is attributable to assets, other than USRPIs, that generate ECI, a purchaser will be required to withhold from the purchase price an amount equal to 10% of the amount realized by the Non-U.S. Limited Partner, which will include the Non-U.S. Limited Partner’s share of the Fund’s liabilities. As noted above, ECI realized by a Non-U.S. Limited Partner generally will be subject to U.S. income tax on a net basis at graduated rates applicable to U.S. persons, and a non-U.S. Limited Partner that is a corporation that is (or is deemed to be) engaged in a trade or business may be subject to an additional branch profits tax of 30% (subject to reduction by any applicable tax treaty) on its effectively connected earnings and profits, adjusted as provided by law.
Non-U.S. Limited Partners that are foreign governments or instrumentalities of foreign governments should be aware that the IRS could assert that an investment in the Fund could give rise to the foreign government being treated as engaged in a “commercial activity” or earning CAI. In such a case (i) a foreign government would be subject to U.S. tax on any U.S.-source CAI, and/or (ii) a controlled entity of a foreign government through which such foreign government holds its Interest may be treated as being engaged in a commercial activity, which could disqualify the controlled entity from claiming the tax exemptions otherwise generally afforded to foreign governments under Section 892 of the Code with respect to income earned through such controlled entity (although, under proposed regulations, relief is available in certain circumstances).
In determining the advisability of an investment in the Fund, Non-U.S. Limited Partners should consult their own tax advisors concerning (i) whether they will be treated as being engaged in a U.S. trade or business or commercial activity, or having a permanent establishment in the United States, (ii) whether gain from the sale of Interests could generate income effectively connected with their conduct of a U.S. trade or business or income from a commercial activity in the United States, or income attributable to a permanent establishment in the United States, (iii) the income tax consequences relating to the ownership of Interests in their own particular circumstance, and (iv) the tax consequences of owning Interests under the internal tax laws of the foreign investor’s home country.
FATCA. Very generally and subject to certain exceptions, pursuant to Section 1471 through 1474 of the Code, as modified by Treasury Regulations, guidance from the IRS and intergovernmental agreements and subject to future guidance (collectively, “FATCA”), certain U.S. source payments, such as interest (including original issue discount and whether or not the interest would qualify as “portfolio interest”), dividends, compensation, and certain other amounts, and, on or after January 1, 2019, any gross proceeds from the sale or other disposition of any property that can produce U.S. source interest or dividends will, in general, be subject to a thirty percent (30%) withholding tax and certain reporting rules. As a general matter, the rules are designed to require certain U.S. persons’ direct and indirect ownership of non-U.S. accounts and certain non-U.S. entities to be reported to the IRS, and the thirty percent (30%) withholding tax applies if there is a failure to provide required information regarding U.S. ownership or otherwise comply with the requirements of FATCA. This withholding tax is currently in effect with respect to payments other than gross proceeds. The IRS has issued proposed regulations eliminating the requirement to withhold on gross proceeds from the sale or other disposition of property. While taxpayers can currently rely on such proposed regulations for dispositions after December 31, 2018, there can be no assurance that any applicable final Treasury Regulations will not reinstate this withholding requirement.
Withholding pursuant to FATCA may reduce returns to investors in the Fund. The requirements of and exceptions from FATCA are complex and remain potentially subject to material changes resulting from future guidance. In addition, certain other countries have passed or may in the future pass legislation similar to FATCA, which may impact the Fund, the Underlying Funds and investors in such entities. Each prospective investor is urged to consult with its own tax advisor regarding the applicability of the provisions of FATCA and any other reporting requirements with respect to the prospective investor’s own situation.  
Medicare Contribution Tax. The Code generally imposes a 3.8% Medicare contribution tax on the “net investment income” (as defined in Section 1411 of the Code) of individuals whose income exceeds certain threshold amounts and of certain trusts and estates under similar rules. Prospective investors are advised to consult their tax advisors regarding the possible implications of this additional tax on their investment in the Fund. 
Adjustments to Basis of Fund Assets. The Fund is authorized to make an election under Section 754 of the Code to adjust the tax basis of its assets in the event of a transfer of an interest in or of certain distributions by the Fund. Because of the accounting complexities and added expenses that can result from having such an election in effect, and because the election, once made, cannot be revoked without the consent of the IRS, the General Partner may determine not to cause the Fund to make this election. In certain circumstances, however, the Fund may be required to adjust the tax basis of its assets as a result of a transfer of an interest or as a result of certain distributions by the Fund, and transferors and transferees of Interests will in certain circumstances be required to provide information to enable the Fund and, if applicable, the transferee to comply with these requirements. The General Partner will have the authority to require any of the Limited Partners who engages in a transaction that gives rise to basis adjustments to bear the administrative and other costs incurred by the Fund in connection with the basis adjustments. These costs can be significant.
Taxation of Certain Foreign Investments. The Underlying Funds may invest in equity interests in non-U.S. entities, which could result in adverse tax consequences and additional reporting requirements. U.S. taxable Limited Partners generally are subject to U.S. federal income tax on their worldwide income, including their income from non-U.S. investments made by the Underlying Funds or the Fund, subject to the availability of a tax credit or tax deduction for foreign taxes.  In addition, if the Underlying Funds or the Fund invests outside the United States through a non-U.S. corporation, directly or indirectly, it is possible that the non-U.S. corporation will be treated as a “controlled foreign corporation” (a “CFC”) or a “passive foreign investment company” (a “PFIC”). If a foreign corporation is treated as a CFC or PFIC, certain additional U.S. federal income taxes may apply, taxable income may be accelerated and become payable prior to the disposition of the underlying investment, gain on disposition maybe recharacterized as ordinary income, and/or interest charges may apply. In the case of a foreign corporation that is a PFIC, a “qualified electing fund” election (a “QEF Election”) may be made to be taxed currently on the capital gains and ordinary income realized by the PFIC, whether or not distributed, rather than having income on dispositions and certain distributions recharacterized as ordinary income, with interest charges. Under recently proposed Treasury Regulations, a QEF Election with respect to PFIC shares owned by a domestic partnership (such as the Fund, the Underlying Funds or another underlying partnership) would be required to be made by the domestic partners in the partnership, rather than by the domestic partnership itself (under the current rules the applicable partnership would make such elections as the first direct or indirect shareholder of the PFIC). In addition, a partner making any such election would be required to notify the domestic partnership upon making any such election. Whether any such elections will be available will depend on the PFIC’s provision of all of the information necessary to make such elections. No assurance can be given that a PFIC will provide such information or that any of the Fund, the Underlying Funds, or another underlying partnership, if eligible, will make a QEF election with respect to a PFIC directly or indirectly owned by it. Prospective Investors should consult their own tax advisors regarding all aspects of these proposed Treasury Regulations as it affects their particular circumstance. The application of the PFIC and CFC rules are complex and can vary significantly based on a prospective Investor’s circumstances; prospective investors should consult their own tax advisors regarding the applicability of these provisions to their particular circumstances.
Original Issue Discount and Market Discount.  The Underlying Funds or the Fund may hold or acquire debt obligations that are issued with “original issue discount.” In such case, for each year in which the Fund directly or indirectly holds such debt instruments, Limited Partners would be required to include amounts in taxable income on a current basis even though receipt of such amounts may occur in a subsequent year.  The rules concerning original issue discount (Sections 1271 – 1275 of the Code) are complex, and a complete discussion of such rules is beyond the scope of this summary.  Generally, the term original issue discount means the excess of the stated redemption price at maturity of the debt obligation (i.e., all payments due under the debt obligation other than payments of stated interest meeting certain requirements) over its issue price, unless such discount is less than a de minimis threshold amount.  The amount of original issue discount required to be included in the gross income of the Limited Partners in a taxable year will equal the sum of the daily portions of original issue discount for each day during the taxable year in which the Fund directly or indirectly holds such debt instruments.  A Limited Partner will be required to include in income its allocable share of the amount of original issue discount accrued, on a constant-yield basis, with respect to a debt obligation directly or indirectly held by the Fund.  The Fund or an Underlying Fund may acquire debt securities to which the proper application of the original issue discount rules is uncertain.
The Fund or an Underlying Fund may also hold or acquire debt obligations subject to the “market discount” provisions contained in Sections 1276 – 1278 of the Code.  These rules generally provide that if a holder acquires a debt instrument at a discount from, in general, its stated redemption price at maturity, which discount equals or exceeds one-fourth of one percent (0.25%) of the principal amount multiplied by the number of remaining complete years to maturity, or weighted average maturity in some cases, and thereafter disposes of such an instrument, the lesser of (a) the gain realized or (b) the portion of the market discount which accrued while the debt instrument was held by such holder will be treated as ordinary income at the time of the disposition.  Any accrued market discount will also be recognized in the event that principal payments are made on the debt instrument.
The market discount rules also provide that the net direct interest expense with respect to any market discount bond is allowed as a deduction for the taxable year only to the extent that such expense exceeds the portion of the market discount allocable to the days during the taxable year on which such bond was held by the taxpayer (as determined under the rules of Section 1276(b) of the Code).
REIT Dividends.  The Fund or an Underlying Fund may invest in listed common or preferred stocks of real estate investment trusts (“REITs”) and/or other REIT securities.                
The federal income tax treatment of REIT distributions depends upon (i) the extent to which they are paid from the REIT’s current or accumulated earnings and profits and, accordingly, treated as dividends (with earnings and profits allocated to distributions on preferred stock before being allocated to distributions on common stock) and (ii) whether any portion of such distributions is designated as qualified dividend income or capital gain dividends, both of which are taxable at capital gains rates that do not exceed 20% for non-corporate U.S. Limited Partners. Distributions from REITs that are treated as dividends but are not designated as either qualified dividend income or capital gain dividends (“qualified REIT dividends”) are treated as ordinary income. For taxable years beginning before January 1, 2026, non-corporate taxpayers are entitled to a deduction of up to 20% of their qualified REIT dividends. The amount of the deduction may be up to 20% of the amount of the non-corporate taxpayer’s aggregate qualified dividend income but may be less than 20% of the amount of qualified REIT dividends if the taxpayer has losses from publicly traded partnerships or the taxpayer’s taxable income, not taking into account net capital gain, is less than the amount of the taxpayer’s qualified REIT dividends. In addition, Treasury Regulations under section 199A of the Code impose a minimum holding period for the 20% deduction that was not set forth in the Code. Under the Treasury Regulations, in order for a REIT dividend with respect to a share of REIT stock to be treated as a qualified REIT dividend, the taxpayer (i) must have held the share for more than 45 days during the 91-day period beginning on the date which is 45 days before the date on which such share becomes ex-dividend with respect to such dividend and (ii) cannot have been under an obligation to make related payments with respect to positions in substantially similar or related property, e.g., pursuant to a short sale.
Dividends received from a REIT may be treated as “qualified dividend income” eligible for the reduced tax rates to the extent that the REIT itself has received qualified dividend income from other corporations (such as taxable REIT subsidiaries). In addition, dividends received from a REIT in a taxable year may be treated as qualified dividend income in an amount equal to the sum of (i) the excess of the REIT’s “REIT taxable income” for the preceding taxable year over the corporate-level federal income tax payable by the REIT for such preceding taxable year and (ii) the excess of the REIT’s income that was subject to the REIT built-in gains tax in the preceding taxable year over the tax payable by the REIT on such income for such preceding taxable year.
REIT dividends are not eligible for the dividends-received deduction for corporations. 
REIT distributions in excess of the REIT’s positive current and accumulated earnings and profits will be treated first as a tax-free return of capital, reducing the shareholder’s tax basis in the REIT stock, and then any distribution in excess of such basis will be taxable to the shareholder as gain realized from the sale of its stock.
Dividends declared by a REIT in October, November or December of any year payable to shareholders of record on a specified date in any such month will be treated as received on December 31 of that year, if the REIT pays the dividends during January of the following calendar year.
Debt Restructuring. There are a number of uncertainties under U.S. federal income tax law relating to debt restructurings. In general, a “significant modification” of a debt obligation is treated as a taxable event, with the resulting gain or loss measured by the difference between the principal amount (or, in some cases, the fair market value) of the debt after the modification and the holder’s tax basis in such debt before the modification. Other than with respect to certain modifications specified in the Treasury Regulations, the determination of whether a modification is “significant” is based on all of the facts and circumstances. Therefore, it is possible that the IRS could take the position that a restructuring of a debt instrument acquired or held by the Fund or an Underlying Fund amounts to a “significant modification” that should be treated as a taxable event. A restructuring that results in a “significant modification” could also result in the conversion of market discount into original issue discount and cause holders to have to accrue discount income currently. If the Fund or an Underlying Fund were to acquire debt investments at significant discounts in the secondary market, debt restructurings could cause the Fund to recognize substantial gain (i.e., the excess of the principal amount of a restructured debt investment over the Fund’s direct or indirect purchase price) required to be currently included in income although no cash is likely to be received by the Fund in connection with debt restructurings.
Economic Substance. The Code contains a provision codifying the judicial economic substance doctrine, which has been traditionally used by the courts to deny tax benefits for transactions that lack economic substance.  A strict liability penalty is imposed for an understatement of tax liability due to a transaction’s failure to meet the requirements of the codified economic substance doctrine.
Information Returns and Schedules. The Fund will file IRS Form 1065, U.S. Return of Partnership Income and will provide annual tax information on IRS Form 1065 Schedule K-1 (and Schedules K-2 and K-3 (as applicable)) to the Limited Partners. Because the Fund may not receive all of the relevant information in a timely manner, Limited Partners should be prepared to obtain extensions of the filing date for their U.S. federal, state, and local income tax returns.
Audits. The General Partner will be designated as the “partnership representative” of the Fund and as such has considerable authority to make decisions affecting the tax treatment and procedural rights of the Limited Partners. 
If the Fund is audited by the IRS, any adjustments to items of income, gain, loss, deduction, or credit of the Fund for a taxable year (and any Limited Partner’s distributive share thereof) generally will be determined at the partnership level, and the Fund generally will be liable for paying an imputed underpayment of tax based on such adjustments and associated penalties and interest. Such imputed underpayment of tax might be calculated at a higher rate than would be applicable to individual Limited Partners if they calculated their tax liabilities on their individual tax returns for their allocable shares of such adjustment, generally would ignore Limited Partner-level attributes, and would be made in the year the adjustment is finalized rather than the year of audit. As a result, some or all of the Limited Partners (including, without limitation, Limited Partners who were not Limited Partners during the audited year) might economically bear a greater amount of imputed tax (and associated penalties and interest) than they would have borne if the adjustment had passed through to the Limited Partners who were Limited Partners during the audited year.
Under certain circumstances, the Fund might be able to demonstrate that the imputed underpayment of tax should be reduced with respect to specific Limited Partners. Establishing such a reduction might require that Limited Partners file amended returns, and pay tax, interest, and penalties. There can be no guarantee that the Fund will be able to (or if it is able to, will choose to) take any such actions to reduce the imputed underpayment of tax. Alternatively, the Fund may be able to elect to allocate adjustments to Limited Partners by issuing notices of adjustment, and in such case, the Limited Partners would be required to include their allocable share of such adjustments on their individual U.S. federal income tax returns in the taxable year in which the statement is provided. Limited Partners would be required to pay penalties and interest (at an increased rate) as a result of such adjustments. There can be no guarantee that the Fund would make such an election, or that such an election would not result in a greater economic cost for a particular Limited Partner. 
The partnership audit procedures described above will also apply mutatis mutandis to an audit of any partnership in which the Fund invests directly or indirectly (such as the Underlying Funds). 
All Limited Partners should consult their own tax advisers regarding possible implications of these rules. Each Partner will be required to indemnify the Fund and the General Partner for such Limited Partner’s share of any tax liability of the Fund that arises in connection with an audit of the Fund as determined by the General Partner.
Reporting Requirements. A direct or indirect participant in any “reportable transaction” must disclose its participation to the IRS on IRS Form 8886. Furthermore, a “material advisor” to a reportable transaction is required to maintain a list of each person with respect to whom such advisor acted as a material advisor and to disclose to the IRS certain other information regarding the transaction. For purposes of the disclosure rules, a Limited Partner may, if certain conditions are satisfied, be treated as a participant in a reportable transaction in which the Fund participates. It is possible that the Fund and the Underlying Funds will participate in one or more transactions that are required to be reported by the Fund, the Underlying Funds, and certain or all of the Limited Partners. In addition, a transfer of an Interest will be reportable by the transferor Limited Partner if the Limited Partner recognizes a loss on the transfer that equals or exceeds the applicable threshold amount. Failure to comply with the reporting requirements gives rise to substantial penalties. Certain states, including New York, have similar disclosure requirements.
Limited Partners may also be subject to other reporting requirements as a result of their investments in the Fund. For example, Limited Partners may be required to file IRS Form 926 in connection with investments by the Underlying Funds in certain non-U.S. companies and may be required to file information statements with respect to the Fund’s investment in the Underlying Funds and any investment by the Underlying Funds in a controlled foreign corporation or a passive foreign investment company. Prospective investors are urged to consult their tax advisors concerning the potential tax consequences of an investment in the Fund.
The General Partner decides how to report the partnership items on the Partnership’s tax returns, and all Partners are required under the Code to treat the items consistently on their own returns, unless they file a statement with the IRS disclosing the inconsistency. Given the uncertainty and complexity of the tax laws, it is possible that the IRS may not agree with the manner in which the Partnership’s items have been reported. In certain circumstances, the Partnership may be required to file a statement with the IRS disclosing one or more positions taken on its tax return, generally where the tax law is uncertain, or a position lacks clear authority.  The limitations period for assessment of deficiencies and claims for refunds with respect to items related to the Partnership is generally three years after the Partnership’s return for the taxable year in question is filed; however, the limitations period may in certain circumstances be longer, and the General Partner has the authority to, and may, extend such period with respect to all Limited Partners.  
State and Local Tax Considerations. In addition to the U.S. federal income tax consequences described above, prospective investors should consider the potential state and local tax consequences of an investment in the Fund. In particular, the Limited Partners may be subject to state and local taxes in jurisdictions in which certain of the Underlying Funds’ investments are located and may be required to file tax returns in those jurisdictions. The number of states in which a Limited Partner is required to file returns may be substantial. In certain jurisdictions, a withholding agent may be required to withhold certain state and local taxes on behalf of the Limited Partners.
State and local tax laws may differ from U.S. federal income tax laws with respect to the treatment of specific items of income, gain, loss, deduction, and credit. For example, certain states, including New York, disallow deductions otherwise allowable for U.S. federal income tax purposes.
Prospective investors are urged to consult their tax advisors concerning the potential state and local tax consequences of an investment in the Fund.
Non-U.S. Tax Considerations. This Memorandum does not attempt to summarize the potential tax consequences of investments that the Underlying Funds may make in non-U.S. entities. Various non-U.S. taxing jurisdictions may impose tax filing obligations and withholding and other taxes in respect of interest, dividends, gains from dispositions of investments, and other income generated by such investments. In some circumstances, a Limited Partner may be able to claim a reduced rate of non-U.S. tax under an applicable income tax treaty. 
All prospective investors are strongly urged to consult their own tax advisors, in light of their own particular circumstances and any special tax rules to which they may be subject, regarding the tax consequences of acquiring, holding and disposing of the Interests under the laws of their country of incorporation, establishment, citizenship, residence or domicile.
ANTI-MONEY LAUNDERING AND COUNTERING OF TERRORIST AND PROLIFERATION FINANCING
In order to comply with legislation or regulations aimed at the prevention of money laundering and the countering of terrorist and proliferation financing the Fund is required to adopt and maintain procedures, and may require prospective investors to provide evidence to verify their identity, the identity of their beneficial owners/controllers (where applicable) and source of funds.  Where permitted, and subject to certain conditions, the General Partner may also rely upon a suitable person for the maintenance of these procedures (including the acquisition of due diligence information) or otherwise delegate the maintenance of such procedures to a suitable person (a "Relevant AML Person").
The General Partner, or the Relevant AML Person on the General Partner's behalf, reserve the right to request such information as is necessary to verify the identity of a prospective investor (i.e. a subscriber for or a transferee of interests in the Fund) and the identity of their beneficial owners/controllers (where applicable), and their source of subscription funds.  Where the circumstances permit, the General Partner, or the Relevant AML Person on the General Partner's behalf, may be satisfied that full due diligence is not required upon subscription where a relevant exemption applies under applicable law.  However, detailed verification information may be required prior to the payment of any proceeds in respect of, or any transfer of, an interest in the Fund.
In the event of delay or failure on the part of the prospective investor in producing any information required for verification purposes, the General Partner, or the Relevant AML Person on the General Partner's behalf, may refuse to accept the application, or if the application has already occurred, may suspend or withdraw the interest, in which case any funds received will, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, be returned without interest to the account from which they were originally debited.
The General Partner, or the Relevant AML Person on the General Partner's behalf, also reserve the right to refuse to make any redemption or distribution payment to a holder of Fund interests if the General Partner or the Relevant AML Person on the General Partner's behalf suspect or are advised that the payment of redemption or distribution proceeds to such interest holder may be non-compliant with applicable laws or regulations, or if such refusal is considered necessary or appropriate to ensure the compliance by the Fund or the Relevant AML Person with any applicable laws or regulations.
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION
The Investment Managers will make available to any prospective investor, prior to the final closing of this offering, or its authorized representative, the opportunity to ask questions of, and receive answers from, the Investment Managers or a person acting on its behalf, concerning the mechanics of this offering, and to obtain any additional information, to the extent that the Investment Managers possess such information or can acquire it without unreasonable effort or expense, necessary to verify the accuracy or completeness of the information set forth herein. 
Due to the fact that different potential investors may ask different questions and request different information, the Investment Managers may provide certain information to one or more prospective investors that it does not provide to all of the prospective investors. None of the responses or additional information provided is or will be integrated into this Memorandum, and no prospective investor may rely on any such responses or information in making its decision to subscribe for Interests. 
This Memorandum is not a complete description of all of the terms relating to the Interests. For additional description, each prospective investor must review the Partnership Agreement.  Please contact your financial advisor or private wealth advisor for any additional information. 
APPENDIX A

FORM OF SUBSCRIPTION BOOKLET
[See attached]
 
 
APPENDIX B

NOTICES TO INVESTORS IN CERTAIN JURISDICTIONS
NOTICE TO ALL INVESTORS GENERALLY
THIS MEMORANDUM DOES NOT CONSTITUTE AN OFFER TO SELL, OR ANY SOLICITATION OF AN OFFER TO BUY, ANY INTERESTS BY ANY PERSON IN ANY JURISDICTION IN WHICH IT IS UNLAWFUL FOR SUCH PERSON TO MAKE SUCH AN OFFERING OR SOLICITATION. ACCORDINGLY, THE INTERESTS MAY NOT BE OFFERED OR SOLD, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, IN ANY JURISDICTION, EXCEPT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LEGAL REQUIREMENTS APPLICABLE IN SUCH JURISDICTION. INVESTORS SHOULD NOT CONSTRUE THE CONTENTS OF THIS APPENDIX AS LEGAL, INVESTMENT, TAX, OR OTHER ADVICE. EACH INVESTOR MUST RELY ON ITS OWN REPRESENTATIVES, INCLUDING ITS OWN LEGAL COUNSEL, AS TO APPLICABLE LEGAL REQUIREMENTS AND RESTRICTIONS IN ITS JURISDICTION PRIOR TO MAKING ANY INVESTMENT IN AN INTEREST. 
IT IS THE RESPONSIBILITY OF ALL INVESTORS WISHING TO SUBSCRIBE FOR THE INTERESTS TO INFORM THEMSELVES OF AND TO OBSERVE ALL APPLICABLE LAWS AND REGULATIONS OF ANY RELEVANT JURISDICTION, INCLUDING OBTAINING ANY REQUISITE GOVERNMENTAL OR OTHER CONSENT AND OBSERVING ANY FORMALITIES PRESCRIBED IN SUCH JURISDICTION. INVESTORS SHOULD INFORM THEMSELVES AS TO THE LEGAL REQUIREMENTS AND TAX CONSDEQUENCES WITHIN COUNTRIES OF THEIR CITIZENSHIP, RESIDENCE, DOMICILE, AND PLACE OF BUSINESS WITH RESPECT TO THE ACQUISITION, HOLDING, OR DISPOSAL OF THE INTERESTS, AND ANY EXCHANGE RESTRICTIONS THAT MAY BE RELEVANT THERETO. CERTAIN INFORMATION IS SET FORTH WITH RESPECT TO CERTAIN JURISDICTIONS. THE INFORMATION BELOW MAY BE SUPPLEMENTED BASED ON THE JURISDICTION OF ANY INVESTMENT ENTITY.
NEITHER THE DELIVERY OF THIS MEMORANDUM NOR ANY SALE MADE HEREUNDER OF THE INTERESTS SHALL UNDER ANY CIRCUMSTANCES IMPLY THAT THE INFORMATION HEREIN IS CORRECT AS OF ANY DATE SUBSEQUENT TO THE DATE HEREOF. IF THE RECIPIENT DOES NOT PURCHASE THE INTERESTS, OR THIS OFFERING IS TERMINATED, THE RECIPIENT AGREES TO RETURN THIS MEMORANDUM AND ALL DOCUMENTS DELIVERED HEREWITH TO THE GENERAL PARTNER.
NOTICE TO FLORIDA RESIDENTS
THE INTERESTS HAVE NOT BEEN REGISTERED UNDER THE FLORIDA SECURITIES ACT. PURCHASERS OF SECURITIES THAT ARE EXEMPTED FROM REGISTRATION BY SECTION 517.061(11) OF THE FLORIDA SECURITIES AND INVESTOR PROTECTION ACT HAVE THE RIGHT TO VOID THEIR PURCHASE WITHIN THREE (3) DAYS AFTER THE FIRST TENDER OF CONSIDERATION UNLESS SALES ARE MADE TO FEWER THAN FIVE (5) PURCHASERS IN FLORIDA.
FOR INVESTORS IN OTHER STATES OF THE UNITED STATES GENERALLY
IN MAKING AN INVESTMENT DECISION, INVESTORS MUST RELY ON THEIR OWN EXAMINATION OF THE ISSUER AND THE TERMS OF THE OFFERING, INCLUDING THE MERITS AND RISKS INVOLVED. THE INTERESTS HAVE NOT BEEN RECOMMENDED BY ANY U.S. FEDERAL OR STATE SECURITIES COMMISSION OR REGULATORY AUTHORITY. FURTHERMORE, THE FOREGOING AUTHORITIES HAVE NOT CONFIRMED THE ACCURACY OR DETERMINED THE ADEQUACY OF THIS MEMORANDUM. ANY REPRESENTATION TO THE CONTRARY IS A CRIMINAL OFFENSE.
THE INTERESTS ARE SUBJECT TO RESTRICTIONS ON TRANSFERABILITY AND RESALE AND MAY NOT BE TRANSFERRED OR RESOLD EXCEPT AS PERMITTED UNDER THE U.S. SECURITIES ACT OF 1933, AS AMENDED, AND THE APPLICABLE STATE SECURITIES LAWS, PURSUANT TO REGISTRATION OR EXEMPTION THEREFROM. INVESTORS SHOULD BE AWARE THAT THEY WILL BE REQUIRED TO BEAR THE FINANCIAL RISKS OF THIS INVESTMENT FOR AN INDEFINITE PERIOD OF TIME.
NOTICE TO NON-U.S. INVESTORS GENERALLY
IT IS THE RESPONSIBILITY OF ANY PERSONS WISHING TO SUBSCRIBE FOR THE INTERESTS TO INFORM THEMSELVES OF AND TO OBSERVE ALL APPLICABLE LAWS AND REGULATIONS OF ANY RELEVANT JURISDICTIONS. PROSPECTIVE INVESTORS SHOULD INFORM THEMSELVES AS TO THE LEGAL REQUIREMENTS AND TAX CONSEQUENCES WITHIN THE COUNTRIES OF THEIR CITIZENSHIP, RESIDENCE, DOMICILE AND PLACE OF BUSINESS WITH RESPECT TO THE ACQUISITION, HOLDING OR DISPOSAL OF THESE SECURITIES AND ANY FOREIGN EXCHANGE RESTRICTIONS THAT MAY BE RELEVANT THERETO.
TO THE EXTENT ANY OF THE CONFIDENTIALITY PROVISIONS CONTAINED IN ANY NON-U.S. LEGENDS BELOW IMPOSE GREATER CONFIDENTIALITY RESTRICTIONS THAN THOSE ALREADY IMPOSED HEREIN, SUCH ADDITIONAL CONFIDENTIALITY PROVISIONS SHALL BE INTERPRETED TO APPLY ONLY TO THE EXTENT THAT SUCH PROVISIONS ARE REASONABLY NECESSARY TO COMPLY WITH THE SECURITIES LAWS OF THE APPLICABLE JURISDICTION. IN THE EVENT THAT ANY NON-U.S. LEGEND BELOW APPLICABLE TO A NON-U.S. RESIDENT INVESTOR OR PROSPECTIVE INVESTOR DOES NOT CONTAIN ANY SPECIFIC CONFIDENTIALITY PROVISION, SUCH INVESTOR OR PROSPECTIVE INVESTOR MAY NOT REPRODUCE OR DISTRIBUTE THIS MEMORANDUM, IN WHOLE OR IN PART OR DISCLOSE ITS CONTENTS WHERE SUCH DISCLOSURE WOULD VIOLATE THE SECURITIES LAWS OF THE APPLICABLE JURISDICTION.
NOTICE TO RESIDENTS OF THE EUROPEAN ECONOMIC AREA
NEITHER THE GENERAL PARTNER NOR EITHER OF THE INVESTMENT MANAGER IS AUTHORIZED OR EXPECTED TO BECOME AUTHORIZED UNDER THE EUROPEAN UNION’S DIRECTIVE 2011/61/EU ON ALTERNATIVE INVESTMENT FUND MANAGERS (THE “AIFM DIRECTIVE”) AS OF THE DATE OF THIS MEMORANDUM, AND THE SUBSTANTIVE REQUIREMENTS APPLICABLE TO AN AUTHORIZED “ALTERNATIVE INVESTMENT FUND MANAGER” (AN “AIFM”) UNDER THE AIFM DIRECTIVE OR ANY NATIONAL IMPLEMENTING LAW ARE NOT APPLICABLE TO THE GENERAL PARTNER OR THE INVESTMENT MANAGERS. NEITHER THE GENERAL PARTNER NOR EITHER OF THE INVESTMENT MANAGERs INTEND TO MARKET INTERESTS TO ANY PROSPECTIVE INVESTOR RESIDENT OR DOMICILED OR WITH A REGISTERED OFFICE IN OR ORGANIZED UNDER THE LAWS OF A RELEVANT MEMBER STATE (EACH, A “MEMBER STATE”) OF THE EUROPEAN ECONOMIC AREA WHEN SUCH MARKETING ACTIVITY IS REASONABLY LIKELY TO GIVE RISE TO A RISK THAT ANY REQUIREMENT OF THE AIFM DIRECTIVE WILL APPLY TO EITHER FUND OR TO THE GENERAL PARTNER OR THE INVESTMENT MANAGERS.

